2*
MOCK-PE-EN-DAG-A-WIN:
OR,
CHECKERED CLOUD, THE MEDICINE WOMAN.
[1]
[1]
A medicine woman is a female doctor or juggler. No man or woman can
assume this office without previous initiation by authority. The medicine
dance is a sacred rite, in honor of the souls of the dead; the mysteries of
this dance are kept inviolable; its secrets have never been divulged by its
members. The medicine men and women attend in cases of sickness. The
Sioux have the greatest faith in them. When the patient recovers, it
redounds
to the honor of the doctor; if he die, they say The time had come
that he should die, or that the medicine of the person who cast a spell upon
the sick person was stronger than the doctor's. They can always find a
satisfactory
solution of the failure of the charm.
Within
a few miles of Fort Snelling lives Checkered
Cloud. Not that she has any settled habitation; she is far too
important a character for that. Indeed she is not often two
days in the same place. Her wanderings are not, however,
of any great extent, so that she can always be found when
wanted. But her wigwam is about seven miles from the fort,
and she is never much farther off. Her occupations change
with the day. She has been very busy of late, for Check
ered Cloud is one of the medicine women of the
Dahcotahs
;
and as the Indians have had a good deal of sickness
among them, you might follow her from teepee to teepee, as
she proceeds with the sacred rattle
[2]
[2]
Sacred rattle. This is generally a gourd, but is sometimes made of bark.
Small beads are put into it. The Sioux suppose that this rattle, in the hands
of one of their medicine men or women, possesses a certain virtue to charm
away sickness or evil spirits. They shake it over a sick person, using a
circular
motion. It is never, however, put in requisition against the worst
spirits
with which the Red Man has to contend.
in her hand, charming
away the animal that has entered the body of the
Dahcotah
to steal his strength.
Then, she is the great legend-teller of the Dahcotahs.
If there is a merry-making in the village, Checkered
Cloud must be there, to call to the minds of the revellers
the traditions that have been handed down from time
immemorial
.
Yesterday, wrapped in her blanket, she was seated on
the St. Peters, near a hole which she had cut in the ice, in
order to spear the fish as they passed through the water;
and to-daybut while I am writing of her, she approaches
the house; even now, her shadow falls upon the room as
she passes the window. I need not listen to her step, for
her mocassined feet pass noiselessly through the hall. The
door is slowly opened, and she is before me!
How tall she is! and with what graceful dignity she
offers her hand. Seventy winters have passed over her, but
the brightness of her eye is undimmed by time. Her
brow speaks of intellectand the white hair that is parted
over it falls unplaited on her shoulders. She folds her
blanket round her and seats herself; she has a request to
make, I know, but Checkered Cloud is not a beggar, she
never asks aught but what she feels she has a right to
claim.
Long ago, she says, the Dahcotah owned lands that
the white man now claims; the trees, the rivers, were all
our own. But the Great Spirit has been angry with his
children; he has taken their forests and their hunting
grounds, and given them to others.
When I was young, I feared not wind nor storm. Days
have I wandered with the hunters of my tribe, that they
might bring home many buffalo for food, and to make our
wigwams. Then, I cared not for cold and fatigue, for I
was young and happy. But now I am old; my children
have gone before me to the `House of Spirits'the tender
boughs have yielded to the first rough wind of autumn,
while the parent tree has stood and borne the winter's
storm.
My sons have fallen by the tomahawk of their
enemies
;
my daughter sleeps under the foaming waters of the
Falls.
Twenty winters were added to my life on that day. We
had encamped at some distance above the Falls, and our
hunters had killed many deer. Before we left our village
to go on the hunt, we sacrificed to the Spirit of the woods,
and we prayed to the Great Spirit. We lifted up our
hands and said, `Father, Great Spirit, help us to kill deer.'
The arrows of our hunters never missed, and as we made
ready for our return we were happy, for we knew we should
not want for food. My daughter's heart was light, for
Haparm
was with her, and she never was sad but when he was
away.
Just before we arrived at the Falls, she became sick; her
hands were burning hot, she refused to eat. As the canoe
passed over the Mississippi, she would fill her cup with its
waters, to drink and throw over her brow. The medicine
men were always at her side, but they said some evil spirit
hated her, and prevented their spells from doing her good.
When we reached the Falls, she was worse; the women
left their canoes, and prepared to carry them and the rest
of the baggage round the Falls.
But what should we do with We-no-nah? the flush
of fever was on her cheek; she did not know me when
I spoke to her; but she kept her eyes fixed upon her
lover.
`We will leave her in the canoe,' said her father; `and
with a line we can carry her gently over the Rapids.' I
was afraid, but with her brothers holding the line she must
be safe. So I left my child in her canoe, and paddled with
the others to the shore.
As we left her, she turned her eyes towards us, as if
anxious to know what we were about to do. The men held
the line steadily, and the canoe floated so gently that I
began
to feel less anxiousbut as we approached the rapids,
my heart beat quickly at the sound of the waters.
Carefully
did her brothers hold the line, and I never moved my
eyes from the canoe in which she lay. Now the roaring
of the waters grew louder, and as they hastened to the rocks
over which they would fall they bore with them my child
I saw her raise herself in the canoe, I saw her long hair as
it fell on her bosomI saw no more!
My sons bore me in their arms to the rest of the party.
The hunters had delayed their return that they might seek
for the body of my child. Her lover called to her, his voice
could be heard above the sound of the waters. `Return
to me, Wenonah, I will never love maiden but you; did you
not promise to light the fires in my wigwam?' He would
have thrown himself after her, had not the young men
prevented
him. The body rests not in the cold waters; we
found it and buried it, and her spirit calls to me in the
silence
of the night! Her lover said he would not remain
long on the earth; he turned from the Dahcotah maidens
as they smiled upon him. He died as a warrior should
die!
The Chippeways had watched for us, they longed to
carry the scalp of a Dahcotah home. They did sobut we
were avenged.
Our young men burst in upon them when they were
sleeping; they struck them with their tomahawks, they
tore their scalps reeking with blood from their heads.
We heard our warriors at the village as they returned
from their war party; we knew by their joyful cries that
they had avenged their friends. One by one they entered
the village, bearing twenty scalps of the enemy.
Only three of the Dahcotahs had fallen. But who
were the three? My sons, and he who was as dear as a
son to me, the lover of my child. I fled from their cries
of triumphI longed to plunge the knife into my own heart.
I have lived on. But sorrow and cold and hunger have
bowed my spirit; and my limbs are not as strong and
active
as they were in my youth. Neither can I work with
porcupine as I used tofor age and tears have dimned my
sight. I bring you venison and fish, will you not give me
clothes to protect me from the winter's cold?
Ah! Checkered Cloudhe was a prophet who named
you. Though the cloud has varied, now passing away,
now returning blacker than beforethough the cheering
light of the sun has for a moment dispelled the gloom
'twas but for a moment! for it was sure to break in terrors
over your head. Your name is your history, your life has
been a checkered cloud! But the storm of the day has
yielded to the influence of the setting sun. The thunder
has ceased to roll, the wind has died away, and the golden
streaks that bound the horizon promise a brighter morning.
So with Checkered Cloud, the storm and strife of the earth
have ceased; the battle of life is fought, and she has
conquered. For she hopes to meet the beloved of earth in
the heaven of the Dahcotahs.
And who will say that our heaven will not be hers? The
God of the Dahcotahs is ours, though they, less happy than
we, have not been taught to know him. Christians! are
you without blame? Have you thought of the privations,
the wants of those who once owned your country, and would
own it still but for the strong hand? Have you
remembered
that their souls are dear in His sight, who suffered
for them, as well as for you? Have you given bright gold
that their children might be educated and redeemed from
their slavery of soul? Checkered Cloud will die as she has
lived, a believer in the religion of the Dahcotahs. The
traditions of her tribe are written on her heart. She
worships a spirit in every forest tree, or every running
stream. The features of the favored Israelite are hers;
she is perchance a daughter of their lost tribe. When
she was young, she would have listened to the missionary
as he told her of Gethsemane and Calvary. But age yields
not like youth to new impressions; the one looks to the
future
,
the other clings to the past. See! she has put by
her pipe and is going, but she is coming oft again to talk
to me of her people, that I may tell to my friends the
bravery of the Dahcotah warrior, and the beauty of the
maiden! the legends of their rivers and sacred islesthe
traditions of their rocks and hills!
If I cannot, in recounting the wild stories of this
prophetess
of the forest, give her own striking words, I shall at
least be faithful to the spirit of her recitals. I shall let
Indian life speak for itself; these true pictures of its course
will tell its whole simple story better than any labored
exposition
of mine. Here we may see, not the red man of
the novel or the drama, but the red man as he appears to
himself, and to those who live with him. His better
characteristics
will be found quite as numerous as ought to be
expected under the circumstances; his faults and his
sufferings
should appeal to the hearts of those who hold the
means of his salvation. No intelligent citizen of these
United States can without blame forget the aborigines of
his country. Their wrongs cry to heaven; their souls
will be required of us. To view them as brutes is an
insult
to Him who made them and us. May this little work
do something towards exciting an interest in a single tribe
out of the many whose only hope is in the mercy of the
white man!
RED EARTH;
OR,
MOCKA-DOOTA-WIN.
Good Road
is one of the Dahcotah chiefshe is fifty
years old and has two wives, but these two have given a deal
of trouble; although the chief probably thinks it of no
importance
whether his two wives fight all the time or not,
so that they obey his orders. For what would be a
calamity
in domestic life to us, is an every day affair among
the Dahcotahs.
Good Road's village is situated on the banks of the St.
Peter's about seven miles from Fort Snelling. And like
other Indian villages it abounds in variety more than
anything
else. In the teepee the farthest from us, right on the
edge of the shore, there are three young men carousing.
One is inclined to go to sleep, but the other two will not let
him; their spirits are raised and excited by what has made
him stupid. Who would suppose they were human beings?
See their bloodshot eyes; hear their fiendish laugh and
horrid yells; probably before the revel is closed, one of the
friends will have buried his knife in the other's heart.
We will pass on to the next teepee. Here we witness a
scene almost as appalling. Iron Arms, one of the most
valiant warriors of the band, is stretched in the agonies of
death. Old Spirit Killer, the medicine man, is gesticulating
by his side, and accompanying his motions with the most
horrid noises. But all in vain; the spirit of Iron Arms,
the man of strength, is gone. The doctor says that his
medicine was good, but that a prairie dog had entered into
the body of the Dahcotah, and he thought it had been a
mud-hen. Magnanimous doctor! All honor, that you can
allow yourself in error.
While the friends of the dead warrior are rending the air
with their cries, we will find out what is going on in the
next wigwam. What a contrast!
The Whirlpool is seated on the ground smoking;
gazing
as earnestly at the bright coals as if in them he could
read the future or recall the past; and his young wife,
whose face, now merry, now sad, bright with smiles at one
moment, and lost in thought the next, gained for her the
name of The Changing Countenance, is hushing her child
to sleep; but the expression of her features does not change
nowas she looks on her child, a mother's deep and
devoted
love is pictured on her face.
In another, The Dancing Woman is wrapped in her
blanket pretending to go to sleep. In vain does The
Flying
Cloud play that monotonous courting tune on the flute.
The maiden would not be his wife if he gave her all the
trinkets in the world. She loves and is going to marry
Iron Lightning, who has gone to bring herwhat? a
broocha new blanket? no, a Chippeway's scalp, that she
may be the most graceful of those who dance around it.
Her mother is mending the mocassins of the old man who
sleeps before the fire.
And we might go round the village and find every
family differently employed. They have no regular hours
for eating or sleeping. In front of the teepees, young men are
lying on the ground, lazily playing checkers, while their
wives and sisters are cutting wood and engaged in laborious
household duties.
I said Good Road had two wives, and I would now
observe
that neither of them is younger than himself. But
they are as jealous of each other as if they had just turned
seventeen, and their lord and master were twenty instead
of fifty. Not a day passes that they do not quarrel, and
fight too. They throw at each other whatever is most
convenient
,
and sticks of wood are always at hand. And then,
the sons of each wife take a part in the battle; they first
fight for their mothers, and then for themselvesso that the
chief must have been reduced to desperation long ago if it
were not for his pipe and his philosophy. Good Road's
second wife has Chippeway blood in her veins. Her mother
was taken prisoner by the Dahcotahs; they adopted her,
and she became the wife of a Dahcotah warrior. She
loved her own people, and those who had adopted her too;
and in course of time her daughter attained the honorable
station of a chief's second wife. Good Road hates the
Chippeways, but he fell in love with one of their
descendants
,
and married her. She is a good wife, and the white
people have given her the name of Old Bets.
Last summer Old Bets narrowly escaped with her life.
The Dahcotahs having nothing else to do, were amusing
themselves by recalling all the Chippeways had ever done
to injure them; and those who were too lazy to go out on
a war party, happily recollected that there was Chippeway
blood near themno farther off than their chief's wigwam;
and eight or ten braves vowed they would make an end of
Old Bets. But she heard of their threats, left the
village
for a time, and after the Dahcotahs had gotten over
their mania for shedding blood, she returned, and right glad
was Good Road to see her. For she has an open, good
humored countenance; the very reverse of that of the first
wife, whose vinegar aspect would frighten away an army
of small children.
After Old Bets returned, Good Road could not
conceal
his satisfaction. His wife's trip had evidently improved
her good looks, for the chief thought she was the
handsomest
squaw in the village. Her children were always
taunting the sons of the first wife, and so it went on, until
at last Good Road said he would stand it no longer; he told
his oldest wife to gothat he would support her no longer.
And for her children, he told them the prairies were large;
there were deer and other gamein short, he disinherited
themcut them off with their last meal.
For the discarded wife, life had now but one hope. The
only star that shone in the blackness of her heaven, was
the undefined prospect of seeing her rival's blood flow.
She would greatly have preferred taking her life herself;
and as she left the wigwam of the chief, she grasped the
handle of her knifehow quick her heart beat! it might
be now or never.
But there were too many around to protect Old Bets.
The time would comeshe would watch for hershe would
tear her heart from her yet.
The sons of the old hag did not leave the village; they
would keep a watch on their father and his Chippeway
wife. They would not easily yield their right to the
chieftainship
.
While they hunted, and smoked, and played at
cards, they were ever on the look-out for revenge.
CHAPTER II.
Red Earth
sits by the door of her father's teepee;
while the village is alive with cheerfulness, she does not join
in any of the amusements going on, but seems to be
occupied
with what is passing in her own mind.
Occasionally she throws a pebble from the shore far into
the river, and the copper-colored children spring after it, as
if the water were their own element, striving to get it
before
it sinks from their view.
Had she been attentive to what is passing around her, she
would not have kept her seat, for Shining Iron, the son
of Good Road's second wife, approaches her; and she loves
him too little to talk with him when it can be avoided.
Why are you not helping the women to make the
teepee
,
Red Earth? said the warrior. They are laughing
while they sew the buffalo-skin together, and you are sitting
silent and alone. Why is it so? Are you thinking of
`Fiery Wind?'
There are enough women to make the teepee, replied
Red Earth, and I sit alone because I choose to do so.
But it I am thinking of `Fiery Wind' I do righthe is a
great warrior!
Tell me if you love Fiery Wind? said the young man,
while his eyes flashed fire, and the veins in his temple
swelled almost to bursting.
I do not love you, said the girl, and that is enough.
And you need never think I will become your wife; your
spells cannot make me love you.
[3]
[3]
The Sioux have great faith in spells. A lover will take gum, and after
putting some medicine in it, will induce the girl of his choice to chew it, or put
it in her way so that she will take it up of her own accord. It is a long time
before an Indian lover will take a refusal from the woman he has chosen for
a wife.
Where are Fiery Wind
and his relations? driven from the wigwam of the Chief by
you and your Chippeway mother. But they do not fear
youneither do I!
And Red Earth looked calmly at the angry face of her
lover. For Shining Iron did love her, and he had loved her
long. He had loaded her with presents, which she always
refused; he had related his honors, his brave acts to her,
but she turned a deaf ear to his words. He promised her
he would always have venison in her teepee, and that he
never would take another wife; she was the only woman
he could ever love. But he might as well have talked to
the winds. And he thought so himself, for, finding he
could not gain the heart of the proud girl, he determined
she should never be the wife of any other man, and he told
her so.
You may marry Fiery Wind, said the angry lover,
but if you do, I will kill him.
Red Earth heard, but did not reply to his threats; she
feared not for herself, but she trembled at the prospect of
danger to the man she loved. And while she turned the
bracelets on her small wrists, the warrior left her to her
own thoughts. They were far from being pleasant; she
must warn her lover of the threats of his rival. For a
while she almost determined she would not marry Fiery
Wind, for then his life would be safe; but she would not
break her promise. Besides, it was hard for her to destroy
all the air-built castles which she had built for her happy
future.
She knew Shining Iron's bravery, and she doubted not
he would fulfil his promise; for a moment prudence
suggested
that she had better marry him to avoid his revenge.
But she grasped the handle of her knife, as if she would
plunge it into her own bosom for harboring the dark thought.
Never should she be unfaithful; when Fiery Wind
returned
she would tell him all, and then she would become
his wife, and she felt that her own heart was true enough
to guard him, her own arm strong enough to slay his
enemy.
All women are wilful enough, but Dahcotah women are
particularly so. Slaves as they are to their husbands, they
lord it over each other, and it is only when they become
grandmothers that they seem to feel their dependence, and
in many instances yield implicit obedience to the wills of
their grandchildren.
They take great delight in watching over and instructing
their children's children; giving them lessons in morality,
[4]
[4]
The idea is ridiculed by some, that an Indian mother troubles herself about
the morals of her children; but it is nevertheless true, that she talks to them,
and, according to her own ideas of right and wrong, tries to instil good
principles
into their minds. The grandmothers take a great deal of care of their
grandchildren.
and worldly wisdom. Thus while Red Earth was making
her determination, her old grandmother belonging to the
village was acting upon hers.
This old woman was a perfect viragoan embodied
storm. In her time she had cut off the hands and feet of
some little Chippeway children, and strung them, and worn
them for a necklace. And she feasted yet at the pleasant
recollections this honorable exploit induced.
But so tender was she of the feelings of her own flesh
and blood, that the thought of their suffering the slightest
pain was death to her.
Her son ruled his household very well for a Dahcotah.
He had a number of young warriors and hunters growing
up around him, and he sometimes got tired of their
disturbances
,
and would use, not the rod but a stick of wood to
some purpose. Although it had the good effect of quelling
the refractory spirits of the young, it invariably fired the
soul of his aged mother. The old woman would cry and
howl, and refuse to eat, for days; till, finding this had no
effect upon her hard-hearted son, she told him she would
do something that would make him sorry, the next time he
struck one of his children.
But the dutiful son paid no attention to her. He had
always
considered women as being inferior to dogs, and he
would as soon have thought of giving up smoking, as of
minding his mother's threats.
But while Red Earth was thinking of her absent lover,
Two Stars was beating his sons againand when the
maiden was left alone by Shining Iron after the warning
he had given her, she was attracted by the cries of one of
the old women of the village, who was struggling 'mid
earth and heaven, while old and young were running to
the spot, some to render assistance, others to see the fun.
And glorious fun it was! the grandmother had almost
hung herselfthat is, she seriously intended to do it. But
she evidently did not expect the operation to be so painful.
When her son, in defiance of her tears and threats,
commenced
settling his household difficulties in his own way
she took her head-strap,
[5]
[5]
The head-strap is made of buffalo skin. It is from eight to ten, or
sometimes
twenty-four feet long. The women fasten their heavy burdens to this
strap, which goes around the forehead; the weight of the burden falls upon
the head and back. This occasions the figures of the Indian women to stoop,
since they necessarily lean forward in order to preserve their balance.
went to a hill just above the
village
,
and deliberately made her preparations for hanging,
as coolly too as if she had been used to being hung for a
long time. But when, after having doubled the strap four
times to prevent its breaking, she found herself choking,
her courage gave wayshe yelled frightfully; and it was
well that her son and others ran so fast, for they had well
nigh been too late. As it was, they carried her into the
teepee, where the medicine man took charge of her case;
and she was quite well again in an hour or two. Report
says (but there is a sad amount of scandal in an Indian
village) that the son has never offended the mother since;
so, like many a wilful woman, she has gained her point.
Red Earth witnessed the cutting down of the old woman,
and as she returned to her teepee, her quick ear warned
her of coming footsteps. She lingered apart from the
others
,
and soon she saw the eagle feathers of her warrior as
he descended the hill towards the village. Gladly would
she have gone to meet him to welcome him home, but she
knew that Shining Iron was watching her motions, and she
bent her steps homeward. She was quite sure that it would
not be long before he would seek her, and then she would
tell him what had passed, and make arrangements for their
course of conduct for the future.
3
Fiery Wind was the nephew of Good Road, but he, like
the sons, was in disgrace with the chief, and, like them, he
had vowed vengeance against Old Bets.
CHAPTER III.
The
gun is now generally used among the Dahcotahs as
a weapon of warfare. But those bands in the
neighborhood
of Fort Snelling considered it as a necessary part of
their war implements, before the distant bands were at all
acquainted with its use.
Some time ago, one of the Mun-da-wa-kan-tons gave a
gun to a Sisse-ton, who, proud of the gift, went out
immediately
to use it. On his return to his village he came up
with a drove of buffaloes. His first impulse was to use his
bow and arrow, but a moment's thought reminded him of
the gift of his friend. He loaded the gun, saying at the
same time to it, Now, the Dahcotahs call you `wah-kun'
(supernatural), kill me the fattest cow in the drove. He
waited a few moments to see his orders executed, but the
gun was not wah-kun enough to fire by order alone.
Seeing that it did not go off, the Sisse-ton flew into a rage
and broke the gun into pieces. I suppose, said he that
if a Mun-da-wah-can-ton had told you to kill a buffalo, you
would have done it, but you do not regard what a
Sisse-ton
says. So he threw the pieces of the gun away, and
found his bow and arrows of far more service.
However naturally the usages of warfare may come to
the Indians, they are also made a part of their education.
The children are taught that it is wicked to murder
without
a cause; but when offence has been given, they are in
duty bound to retaliate.
The day after the return of Fiery Wind, the boys of the
village were to attack a hornet's nest. This is one of the
ways of training their sons to warfare. One of the old
warriors had seen a hornet's nest in the woods, and he
returned
to the village, and with the chief assembled all the
boys in the village. The chief ordered the boys to take off
all their clothes, and gave them each a gun. He then told
them how brave their forefathers werethat they never
feared pain or dangerand that they must prove
themselves
worthy sons of such ancestors. One of these days
you will be men, and then you will go on war parties and
kill your enemies, and then you will be fit to join in the dog
feast. Be brave, and do not fear the sting of the hornet,
for if you do, you will be cowards instead of warriors, and
the braves will call you women and laugh at you.
This was enough to animate the courage of the boys
some of them not more than five years old pushed ahead of
their elder brothers, eager to show to their fathers, who
accompanied them, how little they feared their enemies, as
they termed the hornets. And formidable enemies they
were toofor many of the little fellows returned sadly
stung, with swollen limbs, and closed eyes; but they bore
their wounds as well as brave men would have endured
their pain on a battle-field.
After leaving their village, they entered the woods farther
from the banks of the river. The guide who had seen the
nest led the way, and the miniature warriors trod as lightly
as if there was danger of rousing a sleeping foe. At last
the old man pointed to the nest, and without a moment's
hesitation, the young Dahcotahs attacked it. Out flew the
hornets in every direction. Some of the little boys cried
out with the pain from the stings of the hornets on their
unprotected limbsbut the cries of Shame! shame! from
one of the old men soon recalled them to their duty, and
they marched up again not a whit discomfited. Good Road
cheered them on. Fight well, my warriors, said he;
you will carry many scalps home, you are brave men.
It was not long before the nest was quite destroyed, and
then the old men said they must take a list of the killed
and wounded. The boys forced a loud laugh when they
replied that there were no scalps taken by the enemy, but
they could not deny that the list of the wounded was quite
a long one. Some of them limped, in spite of their efforts
to walk upright, and one little fellow had to be assisted
along by his father, for both eyes were closed; and, although
stung in every direction and evidently suffering agony, the
brave boy would not utter a complaint.
When they approached the village, the young warriors
formed into Indian file, and entered as triumphantly as
their fathers would have done, had they borne twenty
Chippeway scalps with them.
The mothers first applauded the bravery of their sons;
and then applied herbs to their swollen limbs, and the
mimic war furnished a subject of amusement for the
villages
for the remainder of the day.
CHAPTER IV.
It
would be well for the Dahcotahs if they only sought
the lives of their enemies. But they are wasting in
numbers
far more by their internal dissensions than from other
causes. Murder is so common among them, that it is even
less than a nine days' wonder; all that is thought necessary
is to bury the dead, and then some relative must avenge his
quarrel.
Red Earth told her lover of the threat of Shining Iron,
and the young man was thus put on his guard. The sons
f Good Road's first wife were also told of the state of
things, and they told Fiery Wind that they would take up
his quarrel, glad of an opportunity to avenge their own and
their mother's wrongs. It was in the month of April, or
as the Dahcotahs say in the moon that geese lay, that
Red Earth took her place by the side of her husband, thus
asserting her right to be mistress of his wigwam. While she
occupied herself with her many duties, she never for a
moment
forgot the threat of Shining Iron. But her cares and
anxieties for her husband's safety were soon over. She had
not long been a wife before her enemy lay a corpse; his life
was a forfeit to his love for her, and Red Earth had a
woman's heart. Although she could but rejoice that the
fears which had tormented her were now unnecessary, yet
when she remembered how devotedly the dead warrior had
loved her, how anxiously he had tried to please her, she
could not but shed a few tears of sorrow for his death. But
they were soon wiped awaynot for the world would she
have had her husband see them.
The oldest sons of Good Road were true to their word
and the son of Old Bets was not the only subject for their
vengeance. His sister was with him at the moment that
they chose to accomplish their purpose; and when an
Indian
commences to shed blood, there is no knowing how
soon he will be satisfied. Shining Iron died instantly,
but the sister's wounds were not fatalshe is slowly
recovering
.
It was but yesterday that we visited the grave of the
dead warrior. On a hill near the St. Peters his body is
buried. The Indians have enclosed the grave, and there is
a Wah-kun stone, to which they sacrifice, at his head. No
one reposes near him. Alone he lies, undisturbed by aught
except the winds that sigh over him. The first flowers of
Spring are blooming on the spot where he played in
childhood
,
and here, where he reposes, he often sat to mourn the
unkindness of Red Earth, and vow vengeance on his
successful
rival.
But he is not unwatched. His spirit is ever near, and
perhaps he will again live on earth.
[6]
[6]
The Sioux believe in the transmigration of souls. Many of the Indians
near Fort Snelling say they have lived before on earth. The jugglers
remember
many incidents that occurred during some former residence on earth,
and they will tell them to you with all the gravity imaginable.
His friends believe
that he may hold communion with Unk-ta-he,that from
that God he will learn the mysteries of the Earth and
Water; and when he lives again in another form, he will
instruct the Dahcotahs in their religion, and be a great
medicine man.
Good Road is quite reconciled to his sons, for he says it
was a brave deed to get rid of an enemy. In vain does
Old Bets ask for vengeance on the murderers. Good Road
reminds her that Shining Iron had made a threat, and it
was not proper he should live; and the chief insisted more
upon this, when he added that these children of her's were
by a former husband, and it was natural his sons should
resent their father's preference for them.
So after all Old Bets doubts whether she, or the Chief's
first wife, has got the best of it; and as she dresses the
wounds of her daughter, she wishes that the Dahcotahs had
killed her mother instead of adopting herlamenting, too,
that she should ever have attained to the honor of being
Good Road's wife.
WENONA;
OR,
THE VIRGIN'S FEAST.
Never
did the sun shine brighter than on a cold day in
December, when the Indians at Little Crow's village
were preparing to go on a deer hunt. The Mississippi was
frozen, and the girls of the village had the day before
enjoyed
one of their favorite amusementsa ball-play on the
ice. Those who owned the bright cloths and calicoes which
were hung up before their eyes, as an incentive to win the
game, were still rejoicing over their treasures; while the
disappointed ones were looking sullen, and muttering of
partiality being shown to this one because she was
beautiful
,
and to that, because she was the sister of the chief.
Look at my head! said Harpstenah; Wenona
knew that I was the swiftest runner in the band, and as I
stooped to catch the ball she struck me a blow that stunned
me, so that I could not run again.
But the head was so ugly, and the face too, that there
was no pity felt for her; those dirty, wrinkled features
bore witness to her contempt for the cleansing qualities of
water. Her uncombed hair was hanging in masses about
her ears and face, and her countenance expressed cruelty
and passion. But Harpstenah had nothing to avenge;
when she was young she was passed by, as there was
nothing in her face or disposition that could attract; and
now in the winter of life she was so ugly and so desolate,
so cross and so forlorn, that no one deemed her worthy even
of a slight. But for all that, Harpstenah could hate, and
with all the intensity of her evil heart did she hate
Wenona
,
the beautiful sister of the chief.
Yesterday had been as bright as to-day, and Grey Eagle,
the medicine man, had hung on a pole the prizes that were
to be given to the party that succeeded in throwing the ball
into a space marked off.
The maidens of the village were all dressed in their
gayest
clothing, with ornaments of beads, bracelets, rings, and
ribbons in profusion. They cared not half so much for the
prizes, as they rejoiced at the opportunity of displaying their
graceful persons. The old women were eager to commence
the game, for they longed to possess the cloth for their
leggins, and the calico for their okendokendas.
[7]
[7]
Okendokendas. This is the Sioux word for calico. It is used as the
name for a kind of short gown, which is worn by the Sioux women, made
generally of calico, sometimes of cloth.
The women, young and old, were divided into two
parties
;
but as one party threw the ball towards the space
marked off, the others threw it back again far over their
heads, and then all ran back, each party endeavoring to
reach it first, that they might succeed in placing the ball in
the position which was to decide the game.
But the ball is not thrown by the hand, each woman has
a long stick with a circular frame at the end of it; this
they call a bat stick, and, simple as it looks, it requires
great skill to manage it.
3*
Wenona was the swiftest runner of one party, and
Harpstenah, old and ugly as she was, the best of the other.
How excited they are! the snow-covered hills, majestic and
silent, look coldly enough upon their sport; but what care
they? the prize will soon be won.
The old medicine man cheered them on. Run fast,
Wenona! take care that Harpstenah does not win the
game. Ho, Harpstenah! if you and your leggins are old,
you may have the cloth yet.
Now Wenona's party is getting on bravely, but the ball
has been caught and thrown back by the other party. But
at last it is decided. In the struggle for the ball,
Harpstenah
received a blow from an old squaw as dismal looking
as herself, and Wenona catches the ball and throws it into
the appointed place. The game is ended, and the medicine
man comes forward to distribute the prizes.
The warriors have looked on, admiring those who were
beautiful and graceful, and laughing at the ugly and
awkward
.
But Wenona cared little for the prizes. She was a
chief's sister, and she was young and beautiful. The
handsomest presents were given her, and she hardly looked
at the portion of the prizes which fell to her lot.
Smarting with pain from the blow she had received, (and
she spoke falsely when she said Wenona had struck her,)
stung with jealousy at the other party having won the
game, Harpstenah determined on revenge. If I am old,
she said, I will live long enough to bring misery on her;
ugly as I may be, I will humble the proud beauty. What
do I eat? the worthless heads of birds are given to the old
woman for whom nobody cares, but my food will be to see
the eye of Wenona fall beneath the laugh of scorn. I will
revenge the wrongs of my life on her.
Commend me to a Dahcotah woman's revenge! Has
she been slighted in love? blood must be shed; and if she
is not able to accomplish the death of her rival, her own life
will probably pay the forfeit. Has disgrace or insult been
heaped upon her? a life of eighty years is not long enough
to bring down vengeance on the offender. So with
Harpstenah
.
Her life had not been a blessing to herselfshe
would make it a curse to others.
CHAPTER II.
In
the preparations for the deer hunt, the ball-play has
been forgotten. The women are putting together what will
be necessary for their comfort during their absence, and the
men are examining their guns and bows and arrows. The
young girls anticipate amusement and happiness, for they
will assist their lovers to bring in the deer to the camp; and
the jest and merry laugh, and the words of love are spoken
too. The ball-play has been forgotten by all but
Harpstenah
.
But it is late in the afternoon; and as they do not start
till the morning, something must be done to pass the long
evening. If this were full, said a young hunter, kicking
at the same time an empty keg that had once contained
whiskey, if this were full, we would have a merry night
of it.
Yes, said Grey Iron, whose age seemed to have brought
him wisdom, the night would be merry, but where would
you be the day after. Did you not, after drinking that
very whiskey, strike a white woman, for which you were
taken to the fort by the soldiers, and kept as a prisoner?
The young man's look of mortification at this reproof
did not save him from the contemptuous sneer of his
companions
,
for all despise the Dahcotah who has thus been
punished. No act of bravery can wipe away his
disgrace
.
But Wenona sat pale and sad in her brother's wigwam.
The bright and happy looks of yesterday were all gone.
Her sister-in-law has hushed her child to sleep, and she is
resting from the fatigues of the day. Several old men,
friends of Little Crow's father, are sitting round the fire;
one has fallen asleep, while the others talk of the wonderful
powers of their sacred medicine.
Why are you sad, Wenona, said the chief, turning
to her; why should the eyes of a chief's sister be filled
with tears, and her looks bent on the ground?
You need not ask why I am not happy, said
Wenona
:
Red Cloud brought presents to you yesterday; he
laid them at the door of your wigwam. He wants to buy
me, and you have received his gifts; why do you not return
them? you know I do not love him.
Red Cloud is a great warrior, replied the chief; he
wears many feathers of honor; you must marry him.
The girl wrapped herself in her blanket and lay down.
For a time her sighs were heardbut at length sleep came
to her relief, and her grief was forgotten in dreams. But
morn has come and they are to make an early start. Was
ever such confusion? Look at that old hag knocking the
very senses out of her daughter's head because she is not
ready! and the girl, in order to avoid the blows, stumbles
over an unfortunate dog, who commences a horrible barking
and whining, tempting all the dogs of the village to
out-bark
and outwhine him.
There goes White Buffalo with his two wives, the first
wife with the teepee on her back and her child on the top of it.
No wonder she looks so cross, for the second wife walks
leisurely on. Now is her time, but let her beware! for
White Buffalo is thinking seriously of taking a third.
But they are all off at last. Mothers with children, and
corn, and teepees, and children with dogs on their backs.
They are all gone, and the village looks desolate and
forsaken
.
CHAPTER III.
The
party encamped about twenty miles from the
village
.
The women plant the poles of their teepees firmly
in the ground and cover them with a buffalo skin. A fire
is soon made in the centre and the corn put on to boil.
Their bread is kneaded and put in the ashes to bake, but
flour is not very plenty among them.
The next day parties were out in every direction; tracks
of deer were seen in the snow, and the hunters followed
them up. The beautiful animal flies in terror from the death
which comes surer and swifter than her own light footsteps.
The hunter's knife is soon upon her, and while warmth and
even life are left, the skin is drawn off.
After the fatigues of the day comes the long and
pleasant
evening. A bright fire burned in the wigwam of the
chief, and many of the Indians were smoking around it, but
Wenona was sad, and she took but little part in the
laughter
and merriment of the others.
Red Cloud boasted of his bravery and his deeds of valor;
even the old men listened to him with respect, for they
knew that his name was a terror to his enemies. But
Wenona turned from him! she hated to hear the sound of
his voice.
The old men talked of the mighty giant of the
Dahcotahs
,
he who needed not to take his gun to kill the game
he wanted; the glance of his eye would strike with death
the deer, the buffalo, or even the bear.
The song, the jest, the legend, by turns occupied them
until they separated to sleep. But as the warriors stepped
into the open air, why does the light of the moon fall upon
faces pale with terror? See! said the chief, how flash
the mysterious lights! there is danger near, some dreadful
calamity is threatening us.
We will shoot at them, said Red Cloud; we will
destroy their power. And the Indians discharged their
guns in quick succession towards the northern horizon,
which was brilliantly illuminated with the Aurora
Borealis
;
thus hoping to ward off coming danger.
The brother and sister were left alone at the door of the
teepee. The stern warrior's looks expressed superstitious
terror, while the maiden's face was calm and fearless.
Do you not fear the power of the woman who sits in the
north, Wenona? she shows those flashes of light to tell us
of coming evil.
What should I fear, said Wenona; I, who will soon
join my mother, my father, my sisters, in the land of
spirits
?
Listen to my words, my brother: there are but two of
us; strife and disease have laid low the brave, the good,
the beautiful; we are the last of our family; you will soon
be alone.
Before the leaves fell from the trees, as I sat on the banks
of the Mississippi, I saw the fairy of the water. The moon
was rising, but it was not yet bright enough for me to see
her figure distinctly. But I knew her voice; I had often
heard it in my dreams. `Wenona,' she said, (and the
waves were still that they might hear her words), `Wenona,
the lands of the Dahcotah are green and beautifulbut
there are fairer prairies than those on earth. In that bright
country the forest trees are ever green, and the waves of
the river flow on unchilled by the breath of winter. You
will not long be with the children of the earth. Even now
your sisters are calling you, and your mother is telling
them that a few more months will bring you to their side!
The words were true, my brother, but I knew not that
your harshness would hasten my going. You say that I
shall marry Red Cloud; sooner will I plunge my knife into
my heart; sooner shall the waves of the Mississippi roll
over me. Brother, you will soon be alone!
Speak not such words, my sister, said the chief; it
shall be as you will. I have not promised Red Cloud. I
thought you would be happy if you were his wife, and you
shall not be forced to marry him. But why should you
think of death? you saw our braves as they shot at the
lights in the north. They have frightened them away.
Look! they flash no more. Go in, and sleep, and
to-morrow
I will tell Red Cloud that you love him not.
And the cloudless moon shone on a happy face, and the
bright stars seemed more bright as Wenona gazed upon
them; but as she turned to enter the wigwam, one star
was seen falling in the heavens, and the light that followed
it was lost in the brightness of the others. And her dreams
were not happy, for the fairy of the water haunted them.
Even as that star, Wenona, thou shalt pass from all that
thou lovest on earth; but weep not, thy course is upward!
The hunters were so successful that they returned to
their village soon. The friends of Wenona rejoiced in her
happy looks, but to Harpstenah they were bitterness and
gall. The angry countenance of Red Cloud found an
answering chord in her own heart.
Ha! said she to him, as he watched Wenona and
her lover talking together, what has happened? Did
you not say you would marry the chief's sisterwhy then
are you not with her? Red Cloud is a great warrior, why
should he be sad because Wenona loves him not? Are
there not maidens among the Dahcotahs more beautiful
than she? She never loved you; her brother, too, has
treated you with contempt. Listen to my words, Red
Cloud; the Virgin's Feast is soon to be celebrated, and she
will enter the ring for the last time. When she comes
forward
,
tell her she is unworthy. Is she not a disgrace to
the band? Has she not shamed a brave warrior? Will
you not be despised when another is preferred to you?
The words of the tempter are in his earmadness and
hatred are in his heart.
I said I would take her life, but my revenge will be
deeper. Wenona would die rather than be disgraced.
And as he spoke Harpstenah turned to leave him, for she
saw that the poison had entered his soul.
CHAPTER IV.
Among
the Dahcotahs, women are not excluded from
joining in their feasts or dances; they dance the scalp dance
while the men sit round and sing, and they join in
celebrating
many of the customs of their tribe. But the
Virgin's
Feast has reference to the women alone; its object is
not to celebrate the deeds of the warrior, but rather to put
to the test the virtue of the maiden.
Notice was given among the Indians that the Virgin's
Feast was to be celebrated at Little Crow's village; the
time was mentioned, and all who chose to attend were
welcome to do so.
The feast was prepared in the neighborhood of the village.
The boiled corn and venison were put in wooden bowls, and
the Indians sat round, forming a ring. Those who were to
partake of the feast were dressed in their gayest apparel;
their long hair plaited and falling over their shoulders.
Those who are conscious of error dare not approach the
feast, for it is a part of the ceremony that they shall be
exposed by any one present. Neither rank nor beauty must
interpose to prevent the punishment. Nay, sometimes the
power of innocence and virtue itself is not sufficient to
guard the Dahcotah maiden from disgrace.
And was Wenona unworthy? The white snow that
covered the hills was not more pure than she. But Red
Cloud cared not for that. She had refused to be the light
of his wigwam, and thus was he avenged.
Wenona advanced with the maidens of the village.
Who can describe her terror and dismay when Red Cloud
advances and leads her from the sacred ring? To whom
shall the maiden turn for help? To her brother? his angry
countenance speaks not of comfort. Her friends? the
smile of scorn is on their lips. Her lover? he has left the
feast.
Her determination is soon made; her form is seen as she
flies to the woods. Death is the refuge of the friendless
and the wronged.
But as night came on the relatives of Wenona wondered
that she did not return. They sought her, and they found
her lifeless body; the knife was deep in her heart.
She knew she was innocent, but what did that avail her?
She was accused by a warrior, and who would believe her
if she denied the charge?
And why condemn her that she deprived herself of life,
which she deemed worthless, when embittered by unmerited
contempt. She knew not that God has said, Thou shalt
do no murder. The command had never sounded in her
ears.
She trusted to find a home in the House of Spiritsshe
may have found a heaven in the mercy of God.
The fever of the following summer spared neither age
nor youth, and Red Cloud was its first victim. As the
dying Harpstenah saw his body carried out to be placed
upon the scaffoldHe is dead, she cried, and Wenona
was innocent! He hated her because she slighted him; I
hated her because she was happy. He had his revenge,
and I mine; but Wenona was falsely accused, and I told
him to do it! and the eyes were closedthe voice was
hushed in death.
Wenona was innocent; and when the Virgin's Feast
shall be celebrated in her native village again, how will the
maidens tremble as they approach the sacred ring! Can
they forget the fate of their beautiful companion?
And when the breath of summer warms to life the
prairie flowerswhen the long grass shall wave under the
scaffold where repose the mortal remains of the chief's
sisterhow often will the Dahcotah maidens draw near
to contrast the meanness, the treachery, the falsehood of
Red Cloud, with the constancy, devotion, and firmness of
Wenona!
THE DAHCOTAH CONVERT.
Tell
me, said, Hiatu-we-noken-chah, or `woman of
the night,' the Great Spirit whom you have taught me to
fear, why has he made the white woman rich and happy,
and the Dahcotah poor and miserable? She spoke with
bitterness when she remembered the years of sorrow that
had made up the sum of her existence.
But how with the missionary's wife? had her life been
one bright dreamhad her days been always full of
gladness
her
nights quiet and free from care? Had she never
longed for the time of repose, that darkness might cover her
as with a mantleand when `sleep forsook the wretched,
did she not pray for the breaking of the day, that she might
again forget all in the performance of the duties of her
station
?
Could it be that the Creator had balanced the
happiness
of one portion of his children against the
wretchedness
of the rest? Let her story answer.
Her home is now among the forests of the west. As a
child she would tremble when she heard of the savage
whose only happiness was in shedding the blood of his
fellow
creatures. The name of an Indian when uttered by
her nurse would check the boisterous gayety of the day or
the tedious restlessness of the night.
As she gathered flowers on the pleasant banks of the
Sciota, would it not have brought paleness to her cheek to
have whispered her that not many years would pass over
her, before she would be far away from the scenes of her
youth?
And as she uttered the marriage vow, how little did she
think that soon would her broken spirit devote time,
energies
,
life, to the good of others; as an act of duty and, but
for the faith of the Christian, of despair. For several
years she only wept with others when they sorrowed; fair
children followed her footsteps, and it was happiness to guide
their voices, as they, like the morning stars, sang together;
or to listen to their evening prayer as they folded their
hands in childlike devotion ere they slept.
And when the father returned from beside the bed of
death, where his skill could no longer alleviate the parting
agonies of the sufferer: how would he hasten to look upon
the happy faces of his children, in order to forget the scene
he had just witnessed. But, man of God as he was, there
was not always peace in his soul; yet none could see that
he had cause for care. He was followed by the blessings
of those who were ready to perish. He essayed to make
the sinner repent, and to turn the thoughts of the dying to
Him who suffered death on the cross.
But for months the voice of the Spirit spake to his heart;
he could not forget the wordsGo to the wretched
Dahcotahs
,
their bodies are suffering, and their souls, immortal
like thine, are perishing. Soothe their temporal cares, and
more, tell them the triumphs of the Redeemer's love.
But it was hard to give up friends, and all the comforts
with which he was surrounded: to subject his wife to the
hardships of a life in the wilderness, to deprive his children
of the advantages of education and good influences, and
insteadto show them life as it is with those who know not
God. But the voice said, Remember the Dahcotahs.
Vainly did he struggle with the conflict of duty against
inclination
.
The time has come when the parents must weep for
themselves. No longer do the feet of their children tread
among the flowers; fever has paralyzed their strength, and
vainly does the mother call upon the child, whose eyes
wander
in delirium, who knows not her voice from a stranger's.
Nor does the Destroyer depart when
one
has sunk into a
sleep from which there is no awakening until the morn of
the resurrection. He claims another, and who shall resist
that claim!
As the father looks upon the still forms of his children,
as he sees the compressed lips, the closed eyes of the beings
who were but a few days ago full of life and happiness, the
iron enters his soul; but as the Christian remembers who
has afflicted him, his spirit rises above his sorrow. Nor is
there now any obstacle between him and the path of duty.
The one child that remains must be put in charge of those
who will care for her, and he will go where God directs.
But will the mother give up the last of her children? it
matters not now where she lives, but she must part with
husband or child! Self has no part in her schemes;
secure
in her trust in God she yields up her child to her
friend, and listens not to the suggestions of those who
would induce her to remain where she would still enjoy
the comforts of life. Nothing should separate her from her
husband. Entreat me not to leave thee; where thou
goest
I will go, where thou diest I will die, and there will I be
buried.
And as the Dahcotah woman inquires of the justice of
God, the faces of her children rise up before herfirst in
health, with bright eyes and lips parted with smiles, and then
as she last saw themtheir hands white to transparency,
the hue of death upon their features; the shrouds, the little
coffins, the cold lips, as she pressed them for the last time.
The Dahcotah looked in astonishment at the grief which
for a few moments overcame the usual calmness of her kind
friend; and as she wondered why, like her, she should shed
bitter tears, she heard herself thus addressed
Do not think that you alone have been unhappy. God
afflicts all his children. There is not a spot on the earth
which is secure from sorrow. Have I not told you why?
This world is not your home or mine. Soon will our bodies
lie down in the earthand we would forget this, if we were
always happy.
And you should not complain though your sorrows
have been great. Do not forget the crown of thorns which
pressed the brow of the Saviour, the cruel nails that pierced
his hands and feet, the desertion of his friends, his fear that
God his Father had forsaken him. And remember that
after death the power of those who hated him ceased; the
grave received but could not keep his body. He rose from
the dead, and went to Heaven, where he has prepared a
place for all who love him; for me and mine, I trust, and
for you too, if you are careful to please him by serving him
yourself, and by endeavoring to induce your friends to give
up their foolish and wicked superstitions, and to worship
the true God who made all things.
CHAPTER II.
The Dahcotahs believe in the existence of a Great Spirit,
but they have very confused ideas of his attributes. Those
who have lived near the missionaries, say that the Great
Spirit lived forever, but their own minds would never have
conceived such an idea. Some say that the Great Spirit
has a wife.
They say that this being created all things but thunder
and wild rice; and that he gave the earth and all animals
to them, and that their feasts and customs were the laws by
which they are to be governed. But they do not fear the
anger of this deity after death.
Thunder is said to be a large bird; the name that they
give to thunder is the generic term for all animals that
fly. Near the source of the St. Peters is a place called
Thunder-trackswhere the footpsrint of the thunder-bird
are seen in the rocks, twenty-five miles apart.
The Dahcotahs believe in an evil spirit as well as a good,
but they do not consider these spirits as opposed to each
other; they do not think that they are tempted to do wrong
by this evil spirit; their own hearts are bad. It would be
impossible to put any limit to the number of spirits in
whom the Dahcotahs believe; every object in nature is full
of them. They attribute death as much to the power of
these subordinate spirits as to the Great Spirit, but most
frequently they suppose death to have been occasioned by
a spell having been cast upon them by some enemy.
The sun and moon are worshipped as emblems of their
deity.
Sacrifice is a religous ceremony among them; but no
missionary has yet been able to find any reference to the
one great Atonement made for sin; none of their customs
or traditions authorize any such connection. They
sacrifice
to all the spirits; but they have a stone, painted red,
which they call Grandfather, and on or near this, they
place their most valuable articles, their buffalo robes, dogs,
and even horses; and on one occasion a father killed a
child as a kind of sacrifice. They frequently inflict severe
bruises or cuts upon their bodies, thinking thus to propitiate
their gods.
The belief in an evil spirit is said by some not to be a
part of the religion of the Dahcotahs. They perhaps
obtained
this idea from the whites. They have a far greater
fear of the spirits of the dead, especially those whom they
have offended, than of Wahkon-tun-kah, the Great Spirit.
One of the punishments they most dread is that of the
body of an animal entering theirs to make them sick. Some
of the medicine men, the priests, and the doctors of the
Dahcotahs, seem to have an idea of the immortality of the
soul but intercourse with the whites may have originated
this. They know nothing of the resurrection.
They have no custom among them that indicates the
belief that man's heart should be holy. The faith in spirits,
dreams, and charms, the fear that some enemy, earthly or
spiritual, may be secretly working their destruction by a
spell, is as much a part of their creed, as the existence of
the Great Spirit.
4
A good dream will raise their hopes of success in
whatever
they may be undertaking to the highest pitch; a bad
one will make them despair of accomplishing it. Their
religion
is a superstition, including as few elements of truth
and reason as perhaps any other of which the particulars are
known. They worship they know not what, and this
from the lowest motives.
When they go out to hunt, or on a war party, they pray
to the Great SpiritFather, help us to kill the buffalo.
Let us soon see deeror, Great Spirit help us to kill
our enemies.
They have no hymns of praise to their Deity; they fast
occasionally at the time of their dances. When they
dance in honor of the sun, they refrain from eating for two
days.
The Dahcotahs do not worship the work of their hands;
but they consider every object that the Great Spirit has
made, from the highest mountain to the smallest stone, as
worthy of their idolatry.
They have a vague idea of a future state; many have
dreamed of it. Some of their medicine men pretend to
have had revelations from bears and other animals; and
they thus learned that their future existence would be
but a continuation of this. They will go on long hunts
and kill many buffalo; bright fires will burn in their
wigwams
as they talk through the long winter's night of the
traditions of their ancients; their women are to tan
deer-skin
for their mocassins, while their young children learn
to be brave warriors by attacking and destroying wasps' or
hornets' nests; they will celebrate the dog feast to show
how brave they are, and sing in triumph as they dance
round the scalps of their enemies. Such is the Heaven of
the Dahcotahs! Almost every Indian has the image of an
animal or bird tattooed on his breast or arm, which can
charm away an evil spirit, or prevent his enemy from
bringing
trouble or death upon him by a secret shot. The power
of life rests with mortals, especially with their medicine
men; they believe that if an enemy be shooting secretly at
them, a spell or charm must be put in requisition to
counteract
their power.
The medicine men or women, who are initiated into the
secrets of their wonderful medicines, (which secret is as
sacred with them as free-masonry is to its members) give the
feast which they call the medicine feast.
Their medicine men, who profess to administer to the
affairs of soul and body are nothing more than jugglers,
and are the worst men of the tribe: yet from fear alone
they claim the entire respect of the community.
There are numerous clans among the Dahcotahs each
using a different medicine, and no one knows what this
medicine is but those who are initiated into the mysteries
of the medicine dance, whose celebration is attended with
the utmost ceremony.
A Dahcotah would die before he would divulge the secret
of his clan. All the different clans unite at the great
medicine
feast.
And from such errors as these must the Dahcotah turn
if he would be a Christian! And the heart of the
missionary
would faint within him at the work which is before
him, did he not remember who has said Lo, I am with you
always!
And it was long before the Indian woman could give up the
creed of her nation. The marks of the wounds in her face
and arms will to the grave bear witness of her belief in the
faith of her fathers, which influenced her in youth. Yet
the subduing of her passions, the quiet performance of her
duties, the neatness of her person, and the order of her
house, tell of the influence of a better faith, which sanctifies
the sorrows of this life, and rejoices her with the hope of
another and a better state of existence.
But such instances are rare. These people have resisted
as encroachments upon their rights the efforts that have
been made for their instruction. Kindness and patience,
however, have accomplished much, and during the last year
they have, in several instances, expressed a desire for the
aid and instructions of missionaries. They seem to wish
them to live among them; though formerly the lives of
those who felt it their duty to remain were in constant
peril.
They depend more, too, upon what the ground yields
them for food, and have sought for assistance in
ploughing
it.
There are four schools sustained by the Dahcotah
mission
;
in all there are about one hundred and seventy
children
;
the average attendance about sixty.
The missionaries feel that they have accomplished
something
,
and they are encouraged to hope for still more. They
have induced many of the Dahcotahs to be more
temperate
;
and although few, comparatively, attend worship at
the several stations, yet of those few some exhibit hopeful
signs of conversion.
There are five mission stations among the Dahcotahs; at
Lac qui parle, on the St. Peter's river, in sight of the
beautiful lake from which the station takes its name; at
Travers des Sioux about eighty miles from Fort
Snelling
;
at Xapedun, Oak-grove, and Kapoja, the last three
being within a few miles of Fort Snelling.
There are many who think that the efforts of those
engaged in instructing the Dahcotahs are thrown away.
They cannot conceive why men of education, talent, and
piety, should waste their time and attainments upon a
people
who cannot appreciate their efforts. If the
missionaries
reasoned on worldly principles, they would doubtless
think so too; but they devote the energies of soul and body
to Him who made them for His own service.
They are pioneers in religion; they show the path that
others will walk in far more easily at some future day;
they undertake what others will carry on,what God
himself
will accomplish. They have willingly given up the
advantages of this life, to preach the gospel to the degraded
Dahcotahs. They are translating the Bible into Sioux;
many of the books are translated, and to their exertions it
is owing that the praise of God has been sung by the
children
of the forest in their own language.
CHAPTER III.
However
absurd may be the religion of the Dahcotahs,
they are zealous in their devotion to it. Nothing is allowed
to interfere with it. Are their women planting corn, which
is to be in a great measure depended upon for food during
the next winter? whatever be the consequences, they
stop to celebrate a dance or a feast, either of which is a
part of their religion. How many Christians satisfy their
consciences by devoting one day of the week to God,
feeling
themselves thus justified in devoting the other six
entirely
to the world! But it is altogether different with the
Dahcotahs, every act of their life is influenced by their
religion
,
such as it is.
They believe they are a great people, that their country
is unrivalled in beauty, their religion without fault. Many
of the Dahcotahs, now living near Fort Snelling, say
that they have lived on the earth before in some region far
distant, that they died, and for a time their spirits
wandered
through the world seeking the most beautiful and
delightful country to live in, and that after examining all
parts of the earth they fixed upon the country of the
Dahcotahs
.
In fact, dreams, spells and superstitious fears, constitute
a large part of the belief of the Dahcotahs. But of all their
superstitious notions the most curious is the one which
occasions
the dance called Ho-saw-kah-u-tap-pe, or Fish
dance, where the fish is eaten raw.
Some days since, an Indian who lives at Shah-co-pee's
village dreamed of seeing a cormorant, a bird which feeds
on fish. He was very much alarmed, and directed his friend
to go out and catch a fish, and to bring the first one he
caught to him.
The Indian did so, and the fish, which was a large pike,
was painted with blue clay. Preparations were
immediately
made to celebrate the Fish dance, in order to ward off
any danger of which the dream might have been the omen.
A circle was formed of brush, on one side of which the
Indians pitched a wigwam. The war implements were
then brought inside the ring, and a pole stuck up in the
centre, with the raw fish, painted blue, hung upon it.
The men then enter the ring, almost naked; their bodies
painted black, excepting the breast and arms, which are
varied in color according to the fancy of each individual.
Inside the ring is a bush for each dancer; in each bush a
nest, made to resemble a cormorant's nest; and outside the
ring is an Indian metamorphosed for the occasion into a
wolfthat is, he has the skin of a wolf drawn over him,
and hoops fixed to his hands to enable him to run easier
on all fours; and in order to sustain the character which he
has assumed, he remains outside, lurking about for food.
All being ready, the medicine men inside the wigwam
commence beating a drum and singing. This is the
signal
for all the cormorants (Indians), inside the ring, to
commence
quacking and dancing and using their arms in
imitation
of wings, keeping up a continual flapping. Thus
for some time they dance up to and around the fishwhen
the bravest among them will snap at the fish, and if he have
good teeth will probably bite off a piece, if not, he will slip
his hold and flap off again.
Another will try his luck at this delicious food, and so
they continue, until they have made a beginning in the
way of eating the fish. Then each cormorant flaps up
and takes a bite, and then flaps off to his nest, in which
the piece of fish is concealed, for fear the wolves may
get it.
After a while, the wolf is seen emerging from his retreat,
painted so hideously as to frighten away the Indian children.
The cormorants perceive the approach of the wolf, and a
general quacking and flapping takes place, each one
rushing
to his nest to secure his food.
This food each cormorant seizes and tries to swallow,
flapping his wings and stretching out his neck as a young
bird will when fed by its mother.
After the most strenuous exertions they succeed in
swallowing
the raw fish. While this is going on, the wolf
seizes the opportunity to make a snap at the remainder of
the fish, seizes it with his teeth, and makes his way out of the
ring, as fast as he can, on all fours. The whole of the fish,
bones and all, must be swallowed; not the smallest portion
of it can be left, and the fish must only be touched by the
mouthnever with the hands. This dance is performed by
the men alonetheir war implements must be sacred from
the touch of women.
Such scenes are witnessed every day at the Dahcotah
villages. The missionary sighs as he sees how determined is
their belief in such a religion. Is it not a source of rejoicing
to be the means of turning one fellow-creature from a faith
like this?
A few years ago and every Dahcotah woman reverenced
the fish-dance as holy and sacredeven too sacred for her
to take a part in it. She believed the medicine women
could foretell future events; and, with an injustice hardly to
be accounted for, she would tell you it was lawful to beat
a girl as much as you chose, but a sin to strike a boy!
She gloried in dancing the scalp danceaye, even
exulted
at the idea of taking the life of an enemy herself.
But there are instances in which these things are all laid
aside beneath the light of Christianity; instances in which
the poor Dahcotah woman sees the folly, the wickedness of
her former faith; blesses God who inclined the missionary
to leave his home and take up his abode in the country of
the savage; and sings to the praise of God in her own
tongue as she sits by the door of her wigwam. She smiles
as she tells you that her face is dark, but that she hopes
her heart has been changed; and that she will one day sing
in heaven, where the voices of the white people and of the
converted Dahcotahs, will mingle in a song of love to Him
`who died for the whole world.'
4*
WABASHAW.
CHAPTER I.
Wabashaw
, (or The Leaf,) is the name of one of the
Dahcotah Chiefs. His village is on the Mississippi river,
1,800 miles from its mouth.
The teepees are pitched quite near the shore, and the
many bluffs that rise behind them seem to be their
perpetual
guards.
The present chief is about thirty-five years oldas yet
he has done not much to give him a reputation above the
Dahcotahs about him. But his father was a man whose
life and character were such as to influence his people to a
great degree.
Wabashaw the elder, (for the son inherits his father's
name,) is said by the Dahcotahs to have been the first chief
in their tribe.
Many years ago the English claimed authority over the
Dahcotahs, and an English traveller having been murdered
by some Dahcotahs of the band of which Wabashaw was a
warrior, the English claimed hostages to be given up until
the murderer could be found.
The affairs of the nation were settled then by men who,
having more mind than the others, naturally influenced their
inferiors. Their bravest men, their war chief too, no doubt
exercised a control over the rest.
Wabashaw was one of the hostages given up in
consequence
of the murder, and the Governor of Canada required
that these Dahcotahs should leave the forests of the west,
and remain for a time as prisoners in Canada. Little as is
the regard for the feelings of the savage now, there was still
less then.
Wabashaw often spoke of the ill treatment he received
on his journey. It was bad enough to be a prisoner, and
to be leaving home; it was far worse to be struck, for the
amusement of idle men and childrento have the war
eagle's feather rudely torn from his head to be trampled
uponto have the ornaments, even the pipes of the nation,
taken away, and destroyed before his eyes.
But such insults often occurred during their journey,
and the prisoners were even fettered when at last they
reached Quebec.
Here for a long time they sighed to breathe the
invigorating
air of the prairies; to chase the buffalo; to celebrate
the war dance. But when should they join again in the
ceremonies of their tribe? When? Alas! they could
not even ask their jailer when; or if they had, he would
only have laughed at the strange dialect that he could not
comprehend. But the Dahcotahs bore with patience their
unmerited confinement, and Wabashaw excelled them all.
His eye was not as bright as when he left home, and there
was an unusual weakness in his limbsbut never should
his enemies know that he suffered. And when those high
in authority visited the prisoners, the haughty dignity of
Wabashaw made them feel that the Dahcotah warrior was
a man to be respected.
But freedom came at last. The murderers were given
up; and an interpreter in the prison told Wabashaw that
he was no longer a prisoner; that he would soon again
see the Father of many waters; and that more, he had
been made by the English a chief, the first chief of the
Dahcotahs.
It was well nigh too late for Wabashaw. His limbs
were thin, and his strength had failed for want of the fresh
air of his native hills.
Little did the prisoners care to look around as they
retraced
their steps. They knew they were going home.
But when the waters of the Mississippi again shone before
them, when the well-known bluffs met their eager gaze;
when the bending river gave to view their native village,
then, indeed, did the new-made chief cast around him the
quiet of a loving eye. Then, too, did he realize what he
had suffered.
He strained his sightfor perhaps his wife might have
wearied of waiting for himperhaps she had gone to the
Land of spirits, hoping to meet him there.
His children toothe young warriors, who were wont to
follow him and listen to his voice, would they welcome him
home?
As he approached the village a cloud had come between
him and the sun. He could see many upon the shore, but
who were they? The canoe swept over the waters,
keeping
time to the thoughts of those who were wanderers no
longer.
As they neared the shore, the cloud passed away and the
brightness of the setting sun revealed the faces of their
friends; their cries of joy rent the airto the husband, the
son, the brother, they spoke a welcome home!
Wabashaw, by the command of the English Governor,
was acknowledged by the Dahcotahs their first chief; and
his influence was unbounded. Every band has a chief,
and the honor descends from father to son; but there has
never been one more honored and respected than
Wabashaw
.
CHAPTER II.
Wabashaw's
village is sometimes called Keusca. This
word signifies to break through, or set aside; it was given
in consequence of an incident which occurred some time
ago, in the village.
Sacred Wind was a daughter of one of the most
powerful
families among the Dahcotahs; for although a chief lives
as the meanest of his band, still there is a great difference
among the families. The number of a family constitutes
its importance; where a family is small, a member of it can
be injured with little fear of retaliation; but in a large
family there are sure to be found some who will not let an
insult pass without revenge. Sacred Wind's father was
living
;
a stalwart old warrior, slightly bent with the weight
of years. Though his face was literally seamed with
wrinkles, he could endure fatigue, or face danger, with the
youngest and hardiest of the band.
Her mother, a fearfully ugly old creature, still mended
mocassins and scolded; bidding fair to keep up both trades
for years to come. Then there were tall brothers, braving
hardships and danger, as if a Dahcotah was only born to be
scalped, or to scalp; uncles, cousins, too, there were, in
abundance, so that Sacred Wind did belong to a powerful
family.
Now, among the Dahcotahs, a cousin is looked upon as a
brother; a girl would as soon think of marrying her
grandfather
,
as a cousin. I mean an ordinary girl, but Sacred
Wind was not of that stamp; she was destined to be a
heroine. She had many lovers, who wore themselves out
playing the flute, to as little purpose as they braided their
hair, and painted their faces. Sacred Wind did not love
one of them.
Her mother, was always trying to induce her to accept
some one of her lovers, urging the advantages of each
match; but it would not do. The girl was eighteen years
old, and not yet a wife; though most of the Dahcotah
women are mothers long before that.
Her friends could not imagine why she did not marry.
They were wearied with arguing with her; but not one of
them ever suspected the cause of her seeming coldness of
heart.
Her grandmother was particularly officious. She could
not do as Sacred Wind wished her,attend to her own
affairs, for she had none to attend to; and grandmothers,
among the Sioux, are as loving and devoted as they are
among white people; consequently, the old lady beset the
unfortunate girl, day and night, about her obstinacy.
Why are you not now the mother of warriors, she said,
and besides, who will kill game for you when you are old?
The Bear, has been to the traders; he has bought many
things, which he offers your parents for you; marry him
and then you will make your old grandmother happy.
I will kill myself, she replied, if you ask me to
marry the Bear. Have you forgotten the Maiden's rock?
There are more high rocks than one on the banks of the
Mississippi, and my heart is as strong as Wenona's. If you
torment me so, to marry the Bear, I will do as she didin
the house of spirits I shall have no more trouble.
This threat silenced the grandmother for the time. But
a young girl who had been sitting with them, and listening
to the conversation, rose to go out; and as she passed Sacred
Wind, she whispered in her ear, Tell her why you will
not marry the Bear; tell her that Sacred Wind loves her
cousin; and that last night she promised him she never
would marry any one but him.
Had she been struck to the earth she could not have been
paler. She thought her secret was hid in her own heart. She
had tried to cease thinking of The Shield; keeping away
from him, dreading to find true what she only suspected.
She did not dare acknowledge even to herself that she loved
a cousin.
But when the Shield gave her his handsomest trinkets;
when he followed her when she left her laughing and noisy
companions to sit beside the still waterswhen he told her
that she was the most beautiful girl among the Dahcotahs
when he whispered her that he loved her dearly; and would
marry her in spite of mothers, grandmothers, customs and
religion toothen she found that her cousin was dearer to
her than all the worldthat she would gladly die with
himshe could never live without him.
But still, she would not promise to marry him. What
would her friends say? and the spirits of the dead would
torment her, for infringing upon the sacred customs of her
tribe. The Shield used many arguments, but all in vain.
She told him she was afraid to marry him, but that she
would never marry any one else. Sooner should the waves
cease to beat against the shores of the spirit lakes, than she
forget to think of him.
But this did not satisfy her cousin. He was determined
she should be his wife; he trusted to time and his
irresistible
person to overcome her fears.
The Shield's name was given to him by his father's friends.
Shields were formerly used by the Sioux; and the
Eyanktons
and Sissetons still use them. They are made of
buffalo
skin, of a circular form; and are used as a protection
against the arrows of their enemies.
You need not fear your family, Sacred Wind, said her
cousin, nor the medicine men, nor the spirits of the dead.
We will go to one of the villages, and when we are
married
,
we will come back. Let them be angry, I will stand
between you and them, even as my father's shield did
between
him and the foe that sought his life.
But she was firm, and promised nothing more than that
she would not marry the Bear, or any one else; and they
returned to her father's teepee, little thinking that any one
had overheard their conversation. But the Swan had
heard every word of it.
She loved the Shield, and she had seen him follow his
cousin. After hearing enough to know that her case was a
hopeless one, she made up her mind to make Sacred Wind
pay dearly for the love which she herself could not obtain.
She did not at once tell the news. She wanted to
amuse herself with her victim before she destroyed her;
and she had hardly yet made up her mind as to the way
which she would take to inform the family of Sacred Wind
of the secret she had found out.
But she could not resist the temptation of whispering to
Sacred Wind her knowledge of the true reason why she
would not marry the Bear. This was the first blow, and
it struck to the heart; it made a wound which was long
kept open by the watchful eye of jealousy.
The grandmother, however, did not hear the remark; if
she had she would not have sat still smokingnot she! she
would have trembled with rage that a Dahcotah maiden,
and her grandchild, should be guilty of the enormous crime
of loving a cousin. An eruption of Vesuvius would have
given but a faint idea of her fury.
Most fortunately for herself, the venerable old medicine
woman died a few days after. Had she lived to know of
the fatal passion of her granddaughter, she would have
longed to seize the thunderbolts of Jupiter (if she had been
aware of their existence) to hurl at the offenders; or like
Niobe, have wept herself to stone.
Indeed the cause of her death showed that she could not
bear contradiction.
There was a war party formed to attack the Chippeways,
and the Eagle that Screams as she Flies, (for that was
the name of Sacred Wind's grandmother) wanted to go
along.
She wished to mutilate the bodies after they were scalped.
Yes, though near ninety years old, she would go through
all the fatigues of a march of three hundred miles, and think
it nothing, if she could be repaid by tearing the heart from
one Chippeway child.
There were, however, two old squaws who had applied
first, and the Screaming Eagle was rejected.
There were no bounds to her passion. She attempted to
hang herself and was cut down; she made the village
resound
with her lamentations; she called upon all the spirits
of the lakes, rivers, and prairies, to torment the war party;
nothing would pacify her. Two days after the war party
left, the Eagle that Screams as she Flies expired, in a fit of
rage!
When the war-party returned, the Shield was the
observed
of all observers; he had taken two scalps.
Sacred Wind sighed to think he was her cousin. How
could she help loving the warrior who had returned the
bravest in the battle?
The Swan saw that she loved in vain. She knew that
she loved the Shield more in absence; why then hope that
he would forget Sacred Wind when he saw her no more?
When she saw him enter the village, her heart beat fast
with emotion; she pressed her hand upon it, but could not
still its tumult. He has come, she said to herself, but
will his eye seek mine? will he tell
me
that the time has
been long since he saw the woman he loved?
She follows his footstepsshe watches his every glance,
as he meets his relations. Alas! for the Swan, the wounded
bird feels not so acutely the arrow that pierces, as she
that look of recognition between the cousins!
But the unhappy girl was roused from a sense of her
griefs, to a recollection of her wrongs. With all the
impetuosity
of a loving heart, she thought she had a right to
the affections of the Shield. As the water reflected her
features, so should his heart give back the devoted love of
hers.
But while she lived, she was determined to bring sorrow
upon her rival; she would not sing in dying. That very
evening did she repeat to the family of Sacred Wind the
conversation she had overheard, adding that the love of the
cousins was the true cause of Sacred Wind's refusing to
marry.
Time would fail me to tell of the consequent sufferings
of Sacred Wind. She was scolded and watched, shamed,
and even beaten. The medicine men threatened her with
all their powers; no punishment was severe enough for the
Dahcotah who would thus transgress the laws of their
nation.
The Shield was proof against the machinations of his
enemies, for he was a medicine man, and could counteract
all the spells that were exerted against him. Sacred Wind
bore everything in patience but the sight of the Bear. She
had been bought and sold, over and over again; and the
fear of her killing herself was the only reason why her
friends did not force her to marry.
One evening she was missing, and the cries of her mother
broke upon the silence of night; canoes were flying across
the water; friends were wandering in the woods, all seeking
the body of the girl.
But she was not to be found in the river, or in the woods.
Sacred Wind was not dead, she was only married.
She was safe in the next village, telling the Shield how
much she loved him, and how cordially she hated the Bear;
and although she trembled when she spoke of the medicine
men, her husband only laughed at her fears, telling her, that
now that she was his wife, she need fear nothing.
But where was the Swan? Her friends were assisting
in the search for Sacred Wind. The father had forgotten
his child, the brother his sister. And the mother, who
would have first missed her, had gone long ago, to the land
of spirits.
The Swan had known of the flight of the loversshe
watched them as their canoe passed away, until it became
a speck in the distance, and in another moment the waters
closed over her.
Thus were strangely blended marriage and death. The
Swan feared not to take her own life. Sacred Wind, with
a nobler courage, a more devoted love, broke through the
customs of her nation, laid aside the superstitions of the
tribe, and has thus identified her courage with the name of
her native village.
THE DAHCOTAH BRIDE.
The
valley of the Upper Mississippi presents many
attractions
to the reflecting mind, apart from the admiration
excited by its natural beauty. It is at once an old country
and a newthe home of a people who are rapidly passing
awayand of a nation whose strength is ever advancing.
The white man treads upon the footsteps of the Dahcotah
the war dance of the warrior gives place to the march of
civilizationand the saw-mill is heard where but a few
years ago were sung the deeds of the Dahcotah braves.
Years ago, the Dahcotah hunted where the Mississippi
takes its risethe tribe claiming the country as far south
as St. Louis. But difficulties with the neighboring tribes
have diminished their numbers and driven them farther
north and west; the white people have needed their lands,
and their course is onward. How will it end? Will this
powerful tribe cease to be a nation on the earth? Will
their mysterious origin never be ascertained? And must
their religion and superstitions, their customs and feasts
pass away from memory as if they had never been?
Who can look upon them without interest? hardly the
philosophersurely not the Christian. The image of God
is defaced in the hearts of the savage. Cain-like does the
child of the forest put forth his hand and stain it with a
brother's blood. But are there no deeds of darkness done in
our own favored land?
But the country of the Dahcotah,let it be new to those
who fly at the beckon of gainwho would speculate in the
blood of their fellow-creatures, who for gold would, aye do,
sell their own souls,it is an old country to me. What
say the boundless prairies? how many generations have
roamed over them? when did the buffalo first yield to the
arrow of the hunter? And look at the worn bases of the
rocks that are washed by the Father of waters. Hear the
Dahcotah maiden as she tells of the lover's leapand the
warrior as he boasts of the victories of his forefathers over
his enemies, long, long before the hated white man had
intruded
upon their lands, or taught them the fatal secret of
intoxicating drink.
The Dahcotahs feel their own weaknessthey know
they cannot contend with the power of the white man.
Yet there are times when the passion and vehemence of
the warriors in the neighborhood of Fort Snelling can hardly
be brought to yield to the necessity of control; and were
there a possibility of success, how soon would the pipe of
peace be thrown aside, and the yell and whoop of war be
heard instead! And who would blame them? Has not the
blood of our bravest and best been poured out like water
for a small portion of a countrywhen the whole could
never make up for the loss sustained by one desolate widow
or fatherless child?
The sky was without a cloud when the sun rose on the
Mississippi. The morning mists passed slowly away as
if they loved to linger round the hills. Pilot Knob rose
above them, proud to be the burial place of her warrior
children, while on the opposite side of the Mine Soto
[8]
[8]
Mine Soto, or Whitish Water, the name that the Sioux give to the St.
Peter's River. The mud or clay in the water has a whitish look.
the
frowning walls of Fort Snelling, told of the power of their
enemies. Not a breath disturbed the repose of nature, till
the voice of the song birds rose in harmony singing the
praise of the Creator.
But a few hours have passed away, and how changed
the scene. Numbers of canoes are seen rapidly passing over
the waters, and the angry savages that spring from them
as hastily ascending the hill. From the gates of the fort,
hundreds of Indians are seen collecting from every
direction
,
and all approaching the house of the interpreter. We
will follow them.
Few have witnessed so wild a scene. The house of the
interpreter employed by government is near the fort, and
all around it were assembled the excited Indians. In front
of the house is a piazza, and on it lay the body of a young
Dahcotah; his black hair plaited, and falling over his
swarthy
face. The closed eye and compressed lips proclaimed
the presence of death. Life had but recently yielded to the
sway of the stern conqueror. A few hours ago Beloved
Hail had eaten and drank on the very spot where his body
now reposed.
Bending over his head is his wife; tears fall like rain
from her eyes; and as grief has again overcome her efforts
at composure, see how she plunges her knife into her arm:
and as the warm blood flows from the wound calls upon the
husband of her youth!
My son! my son! bursts from the lips of his aged
mother, who weeps at his feet; while her bleeding limbs
bear witness to the wounds which she had inflicted upon
herself in the agony of her soul. Nor are these the only
mourners. A crowd of friends are weeping round his body.
But the mother has turned to the warriors as they press
through the crowd; tears enough have been shed, it is time
to think of revenge. Look at your friend, she says,
look how heavily lies the strong arm, and see, he is still,
though his wife and aged mother call upon him. Who has
done this? who has killed the brave warrior? bring me the
murderer, that I may cut him in pieces.
It needed not to call upon the warriors who stood around.
They were excited enough. Bad Hail stood near, his eyes
bloodshot with rage, his lip quivering, and every trembling
limb telling of the tempest within. Shah-co-pee, the orator
of the Dahcotahs, and The Nest, their most famous
hunter; the tall form of the aged chief Man in the cloud
leaned against the railing, his sober countenance strangely
contrasting with the fiend-like look of his wife; Grey Iron
and Little Hill, with brave after brave, all crying vengeance
to the foe, death to the Chippeway!
CHAPTER II.
But
yesterday the Dahcotahs and Chippeways, foes from
time immemorial, feasted and danced together, for there
was peace between them. They had promised to bury the
hatchet; the Chippeways danced near the fort, and the
Dahcotahs presented them with blankets and pipes, guns
and powder, and all that the savage deems valuable.
Afterwards
,
the Dahcotahs danced, and the generous Chippeways
exceeded them in the number and value of their gifts. As
evening approached, the bands mingled their amusements
together they contended in the foot-race, or, stretching
themselves upon the grass, played at checkers.
The Chippeways had paid their annual visit of
friendship
at Fort Snelling, and, having spent their time happily,
they were about to return to their homes. Their wise men
said they rejoiced that nothing had occurred to disturb the
harmony of the two tribes. But their vicinity to the Fort
prevented any outbreak; had there been no such restraint
upon their actions, each would have sought the life of his
deadly foe.
Hole in the Day was the chief of the Chippeways.
He owed his station to his own merit; his bravery and
firmness
had won the respect and admiration of the tribe when
he was but a warrior, and they exalted him to the honor of
being their chief. Deeds of blood marked his course, yet
were his manners gentle and his voice low. There was a
dignity and a courtesy about his every action that would
have well befitted a courtier.
He watched with interest the trials of strength between
the young men of his own tribe and the Dahcotahs. When
the latter celebrated one of their national feasts, when they
ate the heart of the dog while it was warm with life, just torn
from the animal, with what contempt did he gaze upon them!
The amusements of the dog feast, or dance, have closed,
and the Chippeway chief has signified to his warriors that
they were to return home on the following day. He
expressed
5
a wish to see several of the chiefs of the Daheotahs,
and a meeting having been obtained, he thus addressed
them
Warriors! it has been the wish of our great father
that we should be friends; blood enough has been shed on
both sides. But even if we preferred to continue at war,
we must do as our great father says. The Indian's glory
is passing away; they are as the setting sun; while the
white man is as the sun rising in all his power. We are
the falling leaves; the whites are the powerful horses that
trample them under foot. We are about to return home,
and it is well that nothing has happened to occasion strife
between us. But I wish you to know that there are two
young men among us who do not belong to my band. They
are pillagers, belonging to another band, and they may be
troublesome. I wish you to tell your young men of this,
that they may be on their guard.
After smoking together, the chiefs separated. Hole in
the Day having thus done all that he deemed proper,
returned
with his warriors to his teepee.
Early in the morning the Chippeways encamped near
St. Anthony's falls; the women took upon themselves all
the fatigue and labor of the journey, the men carrying only
the implements of war and hunting. The Chippeway
chief was the husband of three wives, who were sisters;
and, strange to say, when an Indian fancies more than one
wife, he is fortunate if he can obtain sisters, for they
generally
live in harmony, while wives who are not related are
constantly quarreling; and the husband does not often
interfere, even if words are changed to blows.
In the mean time, the two pillagers were lurking about;
now remaining a short time with the camp of the Chippeways,
now absenting themselves for a day or two. But while
the Chippeways were preparing to leave the Falls, the
pillagers
were in the neighborhood of Fort Snelling. They
had accompanied Hole in the Day's band, with the
determination
of killing an enemy. The ancient feud still
rankled in their hearts; as yet they had had no opportunity
of satisfying their thirst for blood; but on this morning they
were concealed in the bushes, when Red Boy and Beloved
Hail, two Dahcotahs, were passing on horseback. It was
but a momentand the deed was done. Both the
Chippeways
fired, and Beloved Hail fell.
Red Boy was wounded, but not badly; he hurried in to
tell the sad news, and the two Chippeways were soon out
of the power of their enemies. They fled, it is supposed,
to Missouri.
The friends of the dead warrior immediately sought his
body, and brought it to the house of the interpreter. There
his friends came together; and as they entered one by one,
on every side pressing forward to see the still, calm, features
of the young man; they threw on the body their blankets,
and other presents, according to their custom of honoring
the dead.
Troops are kept at Fort Snelling, not only as a protection
to the whites in the neighborhood, but to prevent, if
possible
,
difficulties between the different bands of Indians; and
as every year brings the Chippeways to Fort Snelling,
either to transact business with the government or on a
visit of pleasure, the Chippeways and Dahcotahs must be
frequently thrown together. The commanding officer of
the garrison notifies the two bands, on such occasions, that
no hostilities will be permitted; so there is rarely an
occurrence
to disturb their peace.
But now it is impossible to restrain the excited passions
of the Dahcotahs. Capt. B, who was then in
command
at Fort Snelling, sent word to the Chippeway chief
of the murder that had been committed, and requested him
to bring all his men in, as the murderer must be given up.
But this did not satsfy the Dahcotahs; they longed to
raise the tomahawk which they held in their hands. They
refused to wait, but insisted upon following the Chippeways
and revenging themselves; the arguments of the agent and
other friends of the Dahcotahs were unavailing; nothing
would satisfy them but blood. The eyes, even of the
women
,
sparkled with delight, at the prospect of the scalps
they would dance round; while the mother of Beloved Hail
was heard to call for the scalp of the murderer of her son!
Seeing the chiefs determined on war, Capt. B
told them he would cease to endeavor to change their
intentions
;
but as soon said he, as you attack the
Chippeways
,
will I send the soldiers to your villages; and who
will protect your wives and children?
This had the desired effect, and the warriors, seeing the
necessity of waiting for the arrival of the Chippeways,
became
more calm.
Hole in the Day with his men came immediately to the
Fort, where a conference was held at the gate. There
were assembled about three hundred Dahcotahs and seventy
Chippeways, with the officers of the garrison and the Indian
agent.
It was ascertained that the murder had been committed
by the two pillagers, for none of the other Chippeway
warriors
had been absent from the camp. Hole in the Day,
however, gave up two of his men, as hostages to be kept at
Fort Snelling until the murderers should be given up.
The Dahcotahs, being obliged for the time to defer the
hope of revenge, returned to their village to bury their
dead.
CHAPTER III.
We
rarely consider the Indian as a member of a family
we associate him with the tomahawk and scalping-knife.
But the very strangeness of the customs of the Dahcotahs
adds to their interest; and in their mourning they have all
the horror of death without an attendant solemnity.
All the agony and grief that a Christian mother feels
when she looks for the last time at the form which will so
soon moulder in the dust, an Indian mother feels also. The
Christian knows that the body will live again; that the
life-giving breath of the Eternal will once more re-animate
the helpless clay; that the eyes which were brilliant and
beautiful in life will again look brightly from the now
closed lidswhen the dead shall livewhen the beloved
child shall rise again.
The Dahcotah woman has no such hope. Though she
believes
that the soul will live forever in the city of spirits,
yet the infant she has nursed at her bosom, the child she
loved and tended, the young man whose strength and beauty
were her boast, will soon be ashes and dust.
And if she have not the hope of the Christian, neither
has she the spirit. For as she cuts off her hair and tears
her clothes, throwing them under the scaffold, what joy
would it bring to her heart could she hope herself to take
the life of the murderer of her son.
Beloved Hail was borne by the Indians to his native
village
,
and the usual ceremonies attending the dead
performed
,
but with more than usual excitement, occasioned
by the circumstances of the death of their friend.
The body of a dead Dahcotah is wrapped in cloth or
calico, or sometimes put in a box, if one can be obtained,
and placed upon a scaffold raised a few feet from the
ground. All the relations of the deceased then sit round it
for about twenty-four hours; they tear their clothes; run
knives through the fleshy parts of their arms, but there is
no sacrifice which they can make so great as cutting off
their hair.
The men go in mourning by painting themselves black
and they do not wash the paint off until they take the scalp
of an enemy, or give a medicine-dance.
While they sit round the scaffold, one of the nearest
relations
commences a doleful crying, when all the others
join in, and continue their wailing for some time. Then
for awhile their tears are wiped away. After smoking for
a short time another of the family commences again, and
the others join in. This is continued for a day and night,
and then each one goes to his own wigwam.
The Dahcotahs mourned thus for Beloved Hail. In the
evening the cries of his wife were heard as she called for
her husband, while the rocks and the hills echoed the wail.
He will return no moreand who will hunt the deer for
his wife and her young children!
The murderers were never found, and the hostages, after
being detained for eighteen months at Fort Snelling, were
released. They bore their confinement with admirable
patience, the more so as they were punished for the fault
of others. When they were released, they were furnished
with guns and clothing. For fear they would be killed by
the Dahcotahs, their release was kept a secret, and the
Dahcotahs knew not that the two Chippeways were released,
until they were far on their journey home. But one of
them never saw his native village again. The long
confinement
had destroyed his health, and being feeble when
he set out, he soon found himself unequal to the journey.
He died a few days before the home was reached; and the
welcome that his companion received was a sad one, for he
brought the intelligence of the death of his comrade.
CHAPTER IV.
But
we will do as the Dahcotahs didturn from the
sadness
and horror of an Indian's death, to the gayety and
happiness
of an Indian marriage. The Indians are philosophers,
after allthey knew that they could not go after the
Chippeways
,
so they made the best of it and smoked. Beloved
Hail was dead, but they could not bring him to life, and
they smoked again: besides, Walking Wind was to be
married to The War Club, whereupon they smoked
harder than ever.
There are two kinds of marriages among the Dahcotahs,
buying a wife and stealing one. The latter answers to our
runaway matches, and in some respects the former is the
ditto of one conducted as it ought to be among ourselves.
So after all, I suppose, Indian marriages are much like
white people's.
But among the Dahcotahs it is an understood thing that,
when the young people run away, they are to be forgiven
at any time they choose to return, if it should be the next
day, or six months afterwards. This saves a world of
trouble. It prevents the necessity of the father looking
daggers at the son-in-law, and then loving him violently;
the mother is spared the trial of telling her daughter that
she forgives her though she has broken her heart; and,
what is still better, there is not the slightest occasion
whatever
for the bride to say she is wretched, for having done
what she certainly would do over again to-morrow, were it
undone.
So that it is easy to understand why the Dahcotahs have
the advantage of us in runaway matches, or as
they
say in
stealing a wife; for it is the same thing, only more
honestly stated.
When a young man is unable to purchase the girl he
loves best, or if her parents are unwilling she should marry
him, if he have gained the heart of the maiden he is safe.
They appoint a time and place to meet; take whatever
will be necessary for their journey; that is, the man takes
his gun and powder and shot, and the girl her knife and
wooden bowl to eat and drink out of; and these she intends
to hide in her blanket. Sometimes they merely go to the
next village to return the next day. But if they fancy a
bridal tour, away they go several hundred miles with the
grass for their pillow, the canopy of heaven for their
curtains
,
and the bright stars to light and watch over them.
When they return home, the bride goes at once to
chopping
wood, and the groom to smoking, without the least
form or parade.
Sometimes a young girl dare not run away; for she has
a miserly father or mother who may not like her lover
because
he had not enough to give them for her; and she
knows they will persecute her and perhaps shoot her
husband
.
But this does not happen often. Just as, once in a
hundred years in a Christian land, if a girl will run away
with a young man, her parents run after her, and in spite
of religion and common sense bring her back, have her
divorced
,
and then in either case the parties must, as a
matter
of course, be very miserable.
But the marriage that we are about to witness, is a
marriage in high life among the Dahcotahs, and the
bride is regularly bought, as often occurs with us.
Walking Wind is not pretty; even the Dahcotahs, who
are far from being connoisseurs in beauty, do not consider
her pretty. She is, however, tall and well made, and her
feet and hands (as is always the case with the Dahcotah
women) are small. She has a quantity of jet-black hair,
that she braids with a great deal of care. Her eyes are
very black, but small, and her dark complexion is relieved
by more red than is usually seen in the cheeks of the
daughters of her race. Her teeth are very fine, as
everybody
knowsfor she is always laughing, and her laugh is
perfect music.
Then Walking Wind is, generally speaking, so good
tempered
.
5*
She was never known to be very angry but once,
when Harpstenah told her she was in love with The War
Club; she threw the girl down and tore half the hair out
of her head. What made it seem very strange was, that
she was over head and ears in love with The War Club
at that very time; but she did not choose anybody should
know it.
War Club was a flirtyes, a male coquetteand he
had broken the hearts of half the girls in the band.
Besides
being a flirt, he was a fop. He would plait his hair
and put vermilion on his cheeks; and, after seeing that his
leggins were properly arranged, he would put the war eagle
feathers in his head, and folding his blanket round him,
would walk about the village, or attitudinize with all the
airs of a Broadway dandy. War Club was a great warrior
too, for on his blanket was marked the Red Hand, which
showed he had killed his worst enemyfor it was his
father's enemy, and he had hung the scalp up at his
father's grave. Besides, he was a great hunter, which
most of the Dahcotahs are.
No one, then, could for a moment doubt the pretensions of
War Club, or that all the girls of the village should fall in
love with him; and he, like a downright flirt, was
naturally
very cold and cruel to the poor creatures who loved
him so much.
Walking Wind, besides possessing many other
accomplishments
,
such as tanning deer-skin, making mocassins,
&c., was a capital shot. On one occasion, when the young
warriors were shooting at a mark, Walking Wind was
pronounced
the best shot among them, and the War Club
was quite subdued. He could bear everything else; but
when Walking Wind beat him shootingwhythe point
was settled; he must fall in love with her, and, as a
natural
consequence, marry her.
Walking Wind was not so easily won. She had been
tormented so long herself, that she was in duty bound to
pay back in the same coin. It was a Duncan Gray affair
only reversed. At last she yielded; her lover gave her
so many trinkets. True, they were brass and tin; but
Dahcotah
maidens cannot sigh for pearls and diamonds, for they
never even heard of them; and the philosophy of the thing
is just the same, since everybody is outdone by somebody.
Besides, her lover played the flute all night long near her
father's wigwam, and, not to speak of the pity that she felt
for him, Walking Wind was confident she never could sleep
until that flute stopped playing, which she knew would be
as soon as they were married. For all the world knows
that no husband, either white or copper-colored, ever troubles
himself to pay any attention of that sort to his wife,
however
devotedly romantic he may have been before
marriage
.
Sometimes the Dahcotah lover buys his wife without her
consent; but the War Club was more honorable than that:
he loved Walking Wind, and he wanted her to love him.
When all was settled between the young people, War
Club told his parents that he wanted to marry. The old
people were glad to hear it, for they like their ancient and
honorable names and houses to be kept up, just as well as
lords and dukes do; so they collected everything they
owned for the purpose of buying Walking Wind. Guns
and blankets, powder and shot, knives and trinkets, were in
requisition instead of title-deeds and settlements. So, when
all was ready, War Club put the presents on a horse, and
carried them to the door of Walking Wind's wigwam.
He does not ask for the girl, however, as this would not
be Dahcotah etiquette. He lays the presents on the ground
and has a consultation, or, as the Indians say, a talk
with the parents, concluding by asking them to give him
Walking Wind for his wife.
And, what is worthy to be noticed here is, that, after
having
gone to so much trouble to ask a question, he never for
a moment waits for an answer, but turns round, horse and
all, and goes back to his wigwam.
The parents then consult for a day or two, although they
from the first moment have made up their minds as to what
they are going to do. In due time the presents are taken
into the wigwam, which signifies to the lover that he is a
happy man. And on the next day Walking Wind is to be
a bride.
CHAPTER V.
Early
in the morning, Walking Wind commenced her
toiletand it was no light task to deck the Indian bride in
all her finery.
Her mocassins were worked with porcupine, and fitted
closely her small feet; the leggins were ornamented with
ribbons of all colors; her cloth shawl, shaped like a
mantilla
,
was worked with rows of bright ribbons, and the
sewing
did honor to her own skill in needle-work. Her breast
was covered with brooches, and a quantity of beads hung
round her neck. Heavy ear-rings are in her earsand on
her head is a diadem of war eagle's feathers. She has a
bright spot of vermilion on each cheek, andbehold an
Indian
bride!
When she is ready, as many presents as were given for
her are collected and put on a horse; and the bride,
accompanied
by three or four of her relations, takes the road to
the wigwam of the bridegroom.
When they arrive within a hundred yards of the
wigwam
,
Walking Wind's father calls for the War Club to
come out. He does not come, but sends one of his
relations
to receive the bride. Do not suppose that Walking
Wind's father takes offence at the bridegroom's not coming
when he is called; for it is as much a part of the ceremony,
among the Dahcotahs, for one of the bride's relations to call
for the bridegroom, and for the groom to refuse to come, as
it is for us to have the ring put upon the third finger of the
left hand.
As soon as the warrior deputed by the husband elect to
receive the bride makes his appearance, the Indians raise a
shout of applause, and all run towards him as he approaches
them, and while they are running and shouting they are
firing off their guns too.
But the ceremony is not over yet. Walking Wind, in
order to complete the ceremonies, to be a wife, must jump
upon the back of her husband's relative, and be thus carried
into the wigwam of which she is to be the mistress.
What a situation for a bride! Walking Wind seriously
thinks of rebelling; she hesitateswhile the man stands
ready to start for the wigwam so soon as the luggage is on.
The bride draws back and pouts a little, when some of her
friends undertake to reason with her; and she, as if to avoid
them, springs upon the back of the Dahcotah, who carries
her into the wigwam.
But where on earth is the bridegroom? Seated on the
ground in the teepee, looking as placid and unconcerned as
if nothing was going on. Of course he rises to receive his
bride? Not he; but Walking Wind is on her feet again,
and she takes her seat, without any invitation, by the side
of him, who is literally to be her lord and masterand
they are man and wife. As much so, as if there were a
priest and a ring, pearls and bride-cake. For the
Dahcotah
reveres the ceremony of marriage, and he thinks with
solemn awe of the burial rites of his nation, as we do.
These rites have been preserved from generation to
generation
,
told from father to son, and they will be handed
down until the Dahcotahs are no more, or until religion
and education take the place of superstition and ignorance
until God, our God, is known and worshipped among a
people who as yet have hardly heard His name.
SHAH-CO-PEE;
THE ORATOR OF THE SIOUX.
Shah-co-pee
(or Six) is one of the chiefs of the Dahcotahs;
his village is about twenty-five miles from Fort Snelling.
He belongs to the bands that are called Men-da-wa-can-ton,
or People of the Spirit Lakes.
No one who has lived at Fort Snelling can ever forget
him, for at what house has he not called to shake hands and
smoke; to say that he is a great chief, and that he is
hungry and must eat before he starts for home? If the
hint is not immediately acted upon, he adds that the sun is
dying fast, and it is time for him to set out.
Shah-co-pee is not so tall or fine looking as Bad Hail, nor
has he the fine Roman features of old Man in the Cloud.
His face is decidedly ugly; but there is an expression of
intelligence
about his quick black eye and fine forehead, that
makes him friends, notwithstanding his many troublesome
qualities.
At present he is in mourning; his face is painted black.
He never combs his hair, but wears a black silk
handkerchief
tied across his forehead.
When he speaks he uses a great deal of gesture, suiting
the action to the word. His hands, which are small and
well formed, are black with dirt; he does not descend to the
duties of the toilet.
He is the orator of the Dahcotahs. No matter how
trifling the occasion, he talks well; and assumes an air of
importance that would become him if he were discoursing
on matters of life and death.
Some years ago, our government wished the Chippeways
and Dahcotahs to conclude a treaty of peace among
themselves
.
Frequently have these two bands made peace, but
rarely kept it any length of time. On this occasion many
promises were made on both sides; promises which would
be broken by some inconsiderate young warrior before long,
and then retaliation must follow.
Shah-co-pee has great influence among the Dahcotahs, and
he was to come to Fort Snelling to be present at the council
of peace. Early in the morning he and about twenty
warriors
left their village on the banks of the St. Peters, for the
Fort.
When they were very near, so that their actions could
be distinguished, they assembled in their canoes, drawing
them close together, that they might hear the speech which
their chief was about to make them.
They raised the stars and stripes, and their own flag,
which is a staff adorned with feathers from the war eagle;
and the noon-day sun gave brilliancy to their gay dresses,
and the feathers and ornaments that they wore.
Shah-co-pee stood straight and firm in his canoeand
not the less proudly that the walls of the Fort towered
above him.
My boys, he said (for thus he always addressed his
men), the Dahcotahs are all braves; never has a coward
been known among the People of the Spirit Lakes. Let the
women and children fear their enemies, but we will face
our foes, and always conquer.
We are going to talk with the white men; our great
Father wishes us to be at peace with our enemies. We
have long enough shed the blood of the Chippeways; we
have danced round their scalps, and our children have
kicked their heads about in the dust. What more do we
want? When we are in council, listen to the words of the
Interpreter as he tells us what our great Father says, and
I will answer him for you; and when we have eaten and
smoked the pipe of peace, we will return to our village.
The chief took his seat with all the importance of a
public
benefactor. He intended to have all the talking to
himself
,
to arrange matters according to his own ideas; but he
did it with the utmost condescension, and his warriors were
satisfied.
Besides being an orator, Shah-co-pee is a beggar, and one
of a high order too, for he will neither take offence nor a
refusal. Tell him one day that you will not give him pork
and flour, and on the next he returns, nothing daunted,
shaking hands, and asking for pork and flour. He always
gains his point, for you are obliged to give in order to get
rid of him. He will take up his quarters at the
Interpreter's
,
and come down upon you every day for a week
just at meal timeand as he is always blessed with a
ferocious
appetite, it is much better to capitulate, come to
terms by giving him what he wants, and let him go. And
after he has once started, ten to one if he does not come
back to say he wants to shoot and bring you some ducks;
you must give him powder and shot to enable him to do so.
That will probably be the last of it.
CHAPTER II.
It
was a beautiful morning in June when we left Fort
Snelling to go on a pleasure party up the St. Peters, in a
steamboat, the first that had ever ascended that river.
There were many drawbacks in the commencement, as
there always are on such occasions. The morning was
rather cool, thought some, and as they hesitated about
going
,
of course their toilets were delayed to the last moment.
And when all were fairly in the boat, wood was yet to
be found. Then something was the matter with one of
the wheelsand the mothers were almost sorry they had
consented to come; while the children, frantic with joy,
were in danger of beign drowned every moment, by the
energetic movements they made near the sides of the boat,
by way of indicating their satisfaction at the state of
things.
In the cabin, extensive preparations were making in case
the excursion brought on a good appetite. Everybody
contributed
loaf upon loaf of bread and cake; pies, coffee
and sugar; cold meats of every description; with milk and
cream in bottles. Now and then, one of these was broken
or upset, by way of adding to the confusion, which was
already intolerable.
Champaigne and old Cogniac were brought by the young
gentlemen, only for fear the ladies should be sea-sick; or,
perhaps, in case the gentlemen should think it positively
necessary to drink the ladies' health.
When we thought all was ready, there was still another
delay. Sha-co-pee and two of his warriors were seen
coming
down the hill, the chief making an animated appeal to
some one on board the boat; and as he reached the shore
he gave us to understand that his business was concluded,
and that he would like to go with us. But it was very
evident that he considered his company a favor.
The bright sun brought warmth, and we sat on the
upper deck admiring the beautiful shores of the St. Peter's.
Not a creature was to be seen for some distance on the
banks, and the birds as they flew over our heads seemed to
be the fit and only inhabitants of such a region.
When tired of admiring the scenery, there was enough
to employ us. The table was to be set for dinner; the
children had already found out which basket contained the
cake, and they were casting admiring looks towards it.
When we were all assembled to partake of some
refreshments
,
it was delightful to find that there were not enough
chairs for half the party. We borrowed each other's knives
and forks too, and etiquette, that petty tyrant of society,
retired from the scene.
Shah-co-pee found his way to the cabin, where he
manifested
strong symptoms of shaking hands over again; in
order to keep him quiet, we gave him plenty to eat. How
he seemed to enjoy a piece of cake that had accidentally
dropped into the oyster-soup! and with equal gravity would
he eat apple-pie and ham together. And then his cry of
wakun
[9]
[9]
Mysterious.
when the cork flew from the champaigne
bottle
across the table!
How happily the day passedhow few such days occur
in the longest life!
As Shah-co-pee's village appeared in sight, the chief
addressed
Col. D, who was at that time in command
of Fort Snelling, asking him why we had come on such an
excursion.
To escort you home was the ready reply; you are
a great chief, and worthy of being honored, and we have
chosen this as the best way of showing our respect and
admiration
of you.
The Dahcotah chief believed all; he never for a moment
thought there was anything like jesting on the subject of
his own high merits; his face beamed with delight on
receiving
such a compliment.
The men and women of the village crowded on the shore
as the boat landed, as well they might, for a steamboat
was a new sight to them.
The chief sprang from the boat, and swelling with pride
and self admiration he took the most conspicuous station
on a rock near the shore, among his people, and made them
a speech.
We could but admire his native eloquence. Here, with
all that is wild in nature surrounding him, did the untaught
orator address his people. His lips gave rapid utterance to
thoughts which did honor to his feelings, when we consider
who and what he was.
He told them that the white people were their friends;
that they wished them to give up murder and
intemperance
,
and to live quietly and happily. They taught them
to plant corn, and they were anxious to instruct their
children
.
When we are suffering, said he, during the
cold weather, from sickness or want of food, they give us
medicine and bread.
And finally he told them of the honor that had been paid
him. I went, as you know, to talk with the big Captain
of the Fort, and he, knowing the bravery of the Dahcotahs,
and that I was a great chief, has brought me home, as you
see. Never has a Dahcotah warrior been thus honored!
Never indeed! But we took care not to undeceive him.
It was a harmless error, and as no efforts on our part
could have diminished his self importance, we listened with
apparent, indeed with real admiration of his eloquent
speech. The women brought ducks on board, and in
exchange
we gave them bread; and it was evening as we
watched the last teepee of Shah-co-pee's village fade away
in the distance.
But sorrow mingles with the remembrance of that bright
day. One of those who contributed most to its pleasures
is gone from usone whom all esteemed and many loved,
and justly, for never beat a kinder or a nobler heart.
CHAPTER III.
Shah-co-pee
has looked rather grave lately. There is
trouble in the wigwam.
The old chief is the husband of three wives, and they and
their children are always fighting. The first wife is old as
the hills, wrinkled and haggard; the chief cares no more for
her than he does for the stick of wood she is chopping.
She quarrels with everybody but him, and this prevents
her from being quite forgotten.
The day of the second wife is past too, it is of no use for
her to plait her hair and put on her ornaments; for the old
chief's heart is wrapped up in his third wife.
The girl did not love him, how could she? and he did
not succeed in talking her into the match; but he induced
the parents to sell her to him, and the young wife went
weeping to the teepee of the chief.
Hers was a sad fate. She hated her husband as much
as he loved her. No presents could reconcile her to her
situation
.
The two forsaken wives never ceased annoying
her, and their children assisted them. The young wife had
not the courage to resent their ill treatment, for the loss of
her lover had broken her heart. But that lover did not
seem to be in such despair as she washe did not quit the
village, or drown himself, or commit any act of
desperation
.
He lounged and smoked as much as ever. On one
occasion when Shah-co-pee was absent from the village the
lovers met.
They had to look well around them, for the two old
wives were always on the look out for something to tell of
the young one; but there was no one near. The wind
whistled keenly round the bend of the river as the
Dahcotah
told the weeping girl to listen to him.
When had she refused? How had she longed to hear
the sound of his voice when wearied to death with the long
boastings of the old chief.
But how did her heart beat when Red Stone told her that
he loved her stillthat he had only been waiting an
opportunity
to induce her to leave her old husband, and go with
him far away.
She hesitated a little, but not long; and when
Shah-co-pee
returned to his teepee his young wife was goneno
one had seen her departno one knew where to seek for
her. When the old man heard that Red Stone was gone
too, his rage knew no bounds. He beat his two wives
almost to death, and would have given his handsomest
pipe-stem to have seen the faithless one again.
His passion did not last long; it would have killed him
if it had. His wives moaned all through the night, bruised
and bleeding, for the fault of their rival; while the chief
had recourse to the pipe, the never-failing refuge of the
Dahcotah.
I thought, said the chief, that some calamity was
going to happen to me (for, being more composed, he
began
to talk to the other Indians who sat with him in his
teepee, somewhat after the manner and in the spirit of Job's
friends). I saw Unk-a-tahe, the great fish of the water,
and it showed its horns; and we know that that is always a
sign of trouble.
Ho! replied an old medicine man, I remember when
Unk-a-tahe got in under the falls (of St. Anthony) and
broke up the ice. The large pieces of ice went swiftly
down, and the water forced its way until it was frightful
to see it. The trees near the shore were thrown down, and
the small islands were left bare. Near Fort Snelling there
was a house where a white man and his wife lived. The
woman heard the noise, and, waking her husband, ran out;
but as he did not follow her quick enough, the house was
soon afloat and he was drowned.
There was an Indian camp near this house, for the body
of Wenona, the sick girl who was carried over the Falls,
was found here. It was placed on a scaffold on the shore,
near where the Indians found her, and Checkered Cloud
moved her teepee, to be near her daughter. Several other
Dahcotah families were also near her.
But what was their fright when they heard the ice
breaking
,
and the waters roaring as they carried everything
before
them? The father of Wenona clung to his daughter's
scaffold, and no entreaties of his wife or others could induce
him to leave.
Unk-a-tahe has done this, cried the old man, and I
care not. He carried my sick daughter under the waters,
and he may bury me there too. And while the others fled
from the power of Unk-a-tahe, the father and mother clung
to the scaffold of their daughter.
They were saved, and they lived by the body of Wenona
until they buried her. The power of Unk-a-tahe is great!
so spoke the medicine man, and Shah-co-pee almost forgot
his loss in the fear and admiration of this monster of the
deep, this terror of the Dahcotahs.
He will do well to forget the young wife altogether; for
she is far away, making mocassins for the man she loves.
She rejoices at her escape from the old man, and his two
wives; while he is always making speeches to his men,
commencing by saying he is a great chief, and ending with
the assertion that Red Stone should have respected his old
age, and not have stolen from him the only wife he loved.
CHAPTER IV.
SHAH-CO-PEE
came, a few days ago, with twenty other
warriors, some of them chiefs, on a visit to the commanding
officer of Fort Snelling.
The Dahcotahs had heard that the Winnebagoes were
about to be removed, and that they were to pass through
their hunting grounds on their way to their future homes.
They did not approve of this arrangement. Last summer
the Dahcotahs took some scalps of the Winnebagoes, and
it was decided at Washington that the Dahcotabs should
pay four thousand dollars of their annuities as an atonement
for the act. This caused much suffering among the
Dahcotas
;
fever was making great havoc among them, and
to deprive them of their flour and other articles of food
was only enfeebling their constitutions, and rendering them
an easy prey for disease. The Dahcotahs thought this very
hard at the time; they have not forgotten the
circumstance
,
and they think that they ought to be consulted
before their lands are made a thoroughfare by their
enemies
.
They accordingly assembled, and, accompanied by the
Indian agent and the interpreter, came to Fort Snelling to
make their complaint. When they were all seated, (all on
the floor but one, who looked most uncomfortable, mounted
on a high chair), the agent introduced the subject, and it
was discussed for a while; the Dahcotahs paying the most
profound attention, although they could not understand a
6
word of what was passing; and when there was a few
moments' silence, the chiefs rose each in his turn to protest
against the Winnebagoes passing through their country.
They all spoke sensibly and well; and when one finished,
the others all intimated their approval by crying Ho! as a
kind of chorus. After a while Shah-co-pee rose; his
manner
said I am Sir Oracle. He shook hands with the
commanding officer, with the agent and interpreter, and
then with some strangers who were visiting the fort.
His attitude was perfectly erect as he addressed the
officer.
We are the children of our great Father, the President
of the United States; look upon us, for we are your
children
too. You are placed here to see that the Dahcotahs
are protected, that their rights are not infringed upon.
While the Indians cried Ho! ho! with great emphasis,
Shah-co-pee shook hands all round again, and then resumed
his place and speech.
Once this country all belonged to the Dahcotahs.
Where had the white man a place to call his own on our
prairies? He could not even pass through our country
without our permission!
Our great Father has signified to us that he wants our
lands. We have sold some of them to him, and we are
content to do so, but he has promised to protect us, to be a
friend to us, to take care of us as a father does of his
children.
When the white man wishes to visit us, we open the
door of our country to him; we treat him with hospitality.
He looks at our rocks, our river, our trees, and we do not
disturb him. The Dahcotah and the white man are
friends.
But the Winnebagoes are not our friends, we suffered
for them not long ago; our children wanted food; our
wives were sick; they could not plant corn or gather the
Indian potato. Many of our nation died; their bodies are
now resting on their scaffolds. The night birds clap their
wings as the winds howl over them!
And we are told that our great Father will let the
Winnebagoes make a path through our hunting grounds:
they will subsist upon our game; every bird or animal they
kill will be a loss to us.
The Dahcotah's lands are not free to others. If our
great Father wishes to make any use of our lands, he
should pay us. We object to the Winnebagoes passing
through our country; but if it is too late to prevent this,
then we demand a thousand dollars for every village they
shall pass.
Ho! cried the Indians again; and Shah-co-pee, after
shaking hands once more, took his seat.
I doubt if you will ever get the thousand dollars a
village
,
Shah-co-pee; but I like the spirit that induces you
to demand it. May you live long to make speeches and
beg breadthe unrivalled orator and most notorious beggar
of the Dahcotahs!
OYE-KAR-MANI-VIM;
THE TRACK-MAKER.
CHAPTER I.
It
was in the summer of 183-, that a large party of
Chippeways visited Fort Snelling. There was peace
between
them and the Sioux. Their time was passed in
feasting and carousing; their canoes together flew over the
waters of the Mississippi. The young Sioux warriors
found strange beauty in the oval faces of the Chippeway
girls; and the Chippeways discovered (what was actually
the case) that the women of the Dahcotahs were far more
graceful than those of their own nation.
But as the time of the departure of the Chippeways
approached, many a Chippeway maiden wept when she
remembered how soon she would bid adieu to all her hopes
of happiness. And Flying Shadow was saddest of them all.
She would gladly have given up everything for her lover.
What were home and friends to her who loved with all the
devotion of a heart untrammeled by forms, fresh from the
hand of nature? She listened to his flute in the still
evening
,
as if her spirit would forsake her when she heard it no
more. She would sit with him on the bluff which hung
over the Mississippi, and envy the very waters which would
remain near him, when she was far away. But her lover
loved his nation even more than he did her; and though he
would have died to have saved her from sorrow, yet he
knew she could never be his wife. Even were he to marry
her, her life would ever be in danger. A Chippeway could
not long find a home among the Dahcotahs.
The Track-maker bitterly regretted that they had ever
met, when he saw her grief at the prospect of parting.
Let us go, he said, to the Falls, where I will tell you
the story you asked me.
The Track-maker entered the canoe first, and the girl
followed; and so pleasant was the task of paddling her lover
over the quiet waters, that it seemed but a moment before
they were in sight of the torrent.
It was there, said the Sioux, that Wenona and her
child found their graves. Her husband, accompanied by
some other Dahcotahs, had gone some distance above the
falls to hunt. While there, he fell in love with a young girl
whom he thought more beautiful than his wife. Wenona
knew that she must no longer hope to be loved as she had
been.
The Dahcotahs killed much game, and then broke up
their camp and started for their homes. When they reached
the falls, the women got ready to carry their canoes and
baggage round.
But Wenona was going on a longer journey. She would
not live when her husband loved her no more, and, putting
her son in her canoe, she soon reached the island that divides
the falls.
Then she put on all her ornaments, as if she were a
bride; she dressed her boy too, as a Dahcotah warrior; she
turned to look once more at her husband, who was helping
his second wife to put the things she was to carry, on her
back.
Soon her husband called to her; she did not answer him,
but placed her child high up in the canoe, so that his father
could see him, and getting in herself she paddled towards
the rapids.
Her husband saw that Unk-tahe would destroy her, and
he called to her to come ashore. But he might have called
to the roaring waters as well, and they would have heeded
him as soon as she.
Still he ran along the shore with his arms uplifted,
entreating
her to come ashore.
Wenona continued her course towards the rapidsher
voice was heard above the waters as she sang her death
song. Soon the mother and child were seen no morethe
waters covered them.
But her spirit wanders near this place. An elk and fawn
are often seen, and we know they are Wenona and her
child.
Do you love me as Wenona loved? continued the
Sioux, as he met the looks of the young girl bent upon
him.
I will not live when I see you no more, she replied.
As the flowers die when the winter's cold falls upon them,
so will my spirit depart when I no longer listen to your
voice. But when I go to the land of spirits I shall be happy.
My spirit will return to earth; but it will be always near
you.
Little didst thou dream that the fate of Wenona would
be less sad than thine. She found the death she sought, in
the waters whose bosom opened to receive her. But thou
wilt bid adieu to earth in the midst of the battlein the
very presence of him, for whose love thou wouldst
venture
all. Thy spirit will flee trembling from the shrieks of
the dying mother, the suffering child. Death will come to
thee as a terror, not as a refuge.
CHAPTER II.
When
the Chippeways broke up their camp near Fort
Snelling, they divided into two parties, one party returning
home by the Mississippi, the other by way of the St.
Croix.
They parted on the most friendly terms with the Sioux,
giving presents, and receiving them in return.
Some pillagers, who acknowledge no control, had
accompanied
the Chippeways. These pillagers are in fact
high-waymen
or privateershaving no laws, and acting from
the impulses of their own fierce hearts.
After the Chippeways had left, the pillagers concealed
themselves in a path near Lake Calhoun. This lake is
about seven miles from Fort Snelling.
Before they had been concealed one hour, two
Dahcotahs
passed, father and son. The pillagers fired, and
the father was killed instantly; but the son escaped, and
made his way home in safety. The boy entered the
village
calling for his mother, to tell her the sad news; her
cries of grief gave the alarm, and soon the death of the
Sioux was known throughout the village. The news flew
from village to village on the wings of the wind; Indian
runners were seen in every direction, and in twenty-four
hours there were three hundred warriors on foot in pursuit
of the Chippeways.
Every preparation was made for the death-strife. Not
a Sioux warrior but vowed he would with his own arm
avenge the death of his friend. The very tears of the wife
were dried when the hope of vengeance cheered her heart.
The Track-maker was famous as a warrior. Already
did the aged Dahcotahs listen to his words; for he was both
wise and brave. He was among the foremost to lead the
Dahcotahs against the Chippeways; and though he longed
to raise his tomahawk against his foes, his spirit sunk
within him when he remembered the girl he loved. What
will be her fate! Oh! that he had never seen her. But
it was no time to think of her. Duty called upon him to
avenge the death of his friend.
CHAPTER III.
Woe
to the unsuspecting Chippeways! ignorant of the
murder that had been committed, they were leisurely
turning
their steps homeward, while the pillagers made their
escape with the scalp of the Dahcotah.
The Sioux travelled one day and night before they came
up with the Chippeways. Nothing could quench their
thirst but blood. And the women and children must suffer
first. The savage suffers a twofold death; before his own
turn comes, his young children lie breathless around him,
their mother all unconscious by their side.
The Chippeways continued their journey, fearing
nothing
.
They had camped between the falls of St. Anthony
and Rum river; they were refreshed, and the men
proceeded
first, leaving their women and children to follow.
They were all looking forward with pleasure to seeing
their homes again. The women went leisurely along;
the infant slept quietlywhat should it fear close to its
mother's heart! The young children laughed as they hid
themselves behind the forest trees, and then emerged
suddenly
to frighten the others. The Chippeway maidens
rejoiced when they remembered that their rivals, the
Dahcotah
girls, would no longer seduce their lovers from their
allegiance.
Flying Shadow wept, there was nothing to make her
happy
,
she would see the Track-maker no more, and she looked
forward to death as the end of her cares. She concealed
in her bosom the trinkets he had given her; every feature
of his face was written on her heartthat heart that beat
only for him, that so soon would cease to beat at all!
But there was a fearful cry, that banished even him from
her thoughts. The war-whoop burst suddenly upon the
defenceless women.
Hundreds of Dahcotah warriors rose up to blind the
eyes of the terror-stricken mothers. Their children are
scalped before their eyes; their infants are dashed against
the rocks, which are not more insensible to their cries than
their murderers.
It is a battle of strength against weakness. Stern war
6*
rior, it needs not to strike the mother that blow! she dies
in the death of her children.
[10]
[10]
The Dahcotahs believe, or many of them believe, that each body has four
souls. One wanders about the earth and requires food; a second watches
over the body; the third hovers round its native village, while the fourth goes
to the land of spirits.
The maidens clasp their small handsa vain appeal to
the merciless wretches, who see neither beauty nor grace,
when rage and revenge are in their hearts. It is blood they
thirst for, and the young and innocent fall like grass before
the mower.
Flying Shadow sees her lover! he is advancing towards
her! What does his countenance say? There is sadness
in his face, and she hopesaye, more than hopesshe
knows he will save her. With all a woman's trust she
throws herself in his arms. Save me! save me! she
cries; do not let them slay me before your eyes; make
me your prisoner!
When the Sioux are tired of killing, they sometimes take their victims
prisoners, and, generally speaking, treat them with great
kindness.
you said that you loved me, spare
my life!
Who shall tell his agony? For a moment he thought he
would make her his prisoner. Another moment's reflection
convinced him that that would be of no avail. He knew
that she must die, but he could not take her life.
Her eyes were trustingly turned upon him; her soft
hand grasped his arm. But the Sioux warriors were
pressing upon them, he gave her one more look, he touched
her with his spear,
When a Dahcotah touches an enemy with his spear, he is privileged to
wear a feather of honor, as if he had taken a scalp.
and he was gone.
And Flying Shadow was dead. She felt not the blow that
sent her reeling to the earth. Her lover had forsaken her
in the hour of danger, and what could she feel after that?
The scalp was torn from her head by one of those who
had most admired her beauty; and her body was trampled
upon by the very warriors who had so envied her lover.
The shrieks of the dying women reached the ears of their
husbands and brothers. Quickly did they retrace their
steps, and when they reached the spot, they bravely stood
their ground; but the Dahcotahs were too powerful for
them,terrible was the struggle!
The Dahcotahs continued the slaughter, and the
Chippeways
were obliged at last to give way. One of the
Chippeways seized his frightened child and placed him
upon his back. His wife lay dead at his feet; with his
child clinging to him, he fought his way through.
Two of the Dahcotahs followed him, for he was flying
fast; and they feared he would soon be out of their power.
They thought, as they nearly came up to him, that he would
loose his hold on his child; but the father's heart was strong
within him. He flies, and the Sioux are close upon his
heels! He fires and kills one of them. The other Sioux
follows: he has nothing to encumber himhe must be victor
in such an unequal contest. But the love that was stronger
than death nerved the father's arm. He kept firing, and
the Sioux retreated. The Chippeway and his young son
reached their home in safety, there to mourn the loss of
others whom they loved.
The sun set upon a bloody field; the young and old lay
piled together; the hearts that had welcomed the breaking
of the day were all unconscious of its close.
The Sioux were avenged; and the scalps that they
brought home (nearly one hundred when the party joined
them from the massacre at Saint Croix) bore witness to
their triumph.
The other party of Sioux followed the Chippeways who
had gone by way of the St. Croix. While the
Chippeways
slept, the war-cry of the Sioux aroused them.
And though they fought bravely, they suffered as did their
friends, and the darkness of night added terror to the scene.
The Dahcotahs returned with the scalps to their villages,
and as they entered triumphantly, they were greeted with
shouts of applause. The scalps were divided among the
villages, and joyful preparations were made to celebrate the
scalp-dance.
The scalps were stretched upon hoops, and covered with
vermilion, ornamented with feathers, ribbons and trinkets.
On the women's scalps were hung a comb, or a pair of
scissors, and for months did the Dahcotah women dance
around them. The men wore mourning for their enemies,
as is the custom among the Dahcotahs.
When the dancing was done, the scalps were buried with
the deceased relatives of the Sioux who took them.
And this is Indian, but what is Christian warfare? The
wife of the hero lives to realize her wretchedness; the honors
paid by his countrymen are a poor recompense for the loss
of his love and protection. The life of the child too, is safe,
but who will lead him in the paths of virtue, when his
mother has gone down to the grave.
Let us not hear of civilized warfare! It is all the work
of the spirits of evil. God did not make man to slay his
brother, and the savage alone can present an excuse. The
Dahcotah dreams not that it is wrong to resent an injury
to the death; but the Christian knows that God has said,
Vengeance is mine!
CHAPTER IV.
The
Track-maker had added to his fame. He had taken
many scalps, and the Dahcotah maidens welcomed him as
a heroas one who would no longer refuse to acknowledge
the power of their charms. They asked him eagerly of the
fightwhom he had killed firstbut they derived but little
satisfaction from his replies. They found he resisted their
advances, and they left him to his gloomy thoughts.
Every scene he looked upon added to his grief. Memory
clung to him, recalling every word and look of Flying
Shadow. But that last look, could he ever forget it?
He tried to console himself with the thoughts of his
triumph. Alas! her smile was sweeter than the
recollection
of revenge. He had waded in the blood of his
enemies
;
he had trampled upon the hearts of the men he
hated; but he had broken the heart of the only woman he
had ever loved.
In the silence of the night her death-cry sounded in his
ear; and he would start as if to flee from the sound. In
his dreams he saw again that trustful face, that look of
appealand then the face of stone, when she saw that she
had appealed in vain.
He followed the chase, but there he could not forget the
battle scene. Save me! save me! forever whispered
every forest leaf, or every flowing wave. Often did he hear
her calling him, and he would stay his steps as if he hoped
to meet her smile.
The medicine men offered to cure his disease; but he
knew that it was beyond their art, and he cared not how
soon death came, nor in what form.
He met the fate he sought. A war party was formed
among the Dahcotahs to seek more scalps, more revenge.
But the Track-maker was weary of glory.
He went with the party, and never returned. Like
her
,
he died in battle; but the death that she sought to avert,
was a welcome messenger to him. He felt that in the
grave all would be forgotten.
ETA KEAZAH;
OR,
SULLEN FACE.
Wenona
was the light of her father's wigwamthe pride
of the band of Sissetons, whose village is on the shores of
beautiful Lake Travers. However cheerfully the fire might
burn in the dwelling of the aged chief, there was darkness
for him when she was awayand the mother's heart was
always filled with anxiety, for she knew that Wenona had
drawn upon her the envy of her young companions, and
she feared that some one of them would cast a spell
[11]
[11]
The Indians fear that from envy or jealousy some person may cast a fatal
spell upon them to produce sickness, or even death. This superstition seems
almost identical with the Obi or Obeat of the West India negroes.
upon
her child, that her loveliness might be dimmed by sorrow
or sickness.
The warriors of the band strove to outdo each other in
noble deeds, that they might feel more worthy to claim her
hand;while the hunters tried to win her good will by
presents of buffalo and deer. But Wenona thought not
yet of love. The clear stream that reflected her form told
her she was beautiful; yet her brother was the bravest
warrior of the Sissetons; and her aged parents toowas
not their love enough to satisfy her heart! Never did
brother and sister love each other more; their features
5*
were the same, yet man's sternness in him was changed to
woman's softness in her. The glance of the falcon in
his eye was the gaze of the dove in hers. But at times
the expression of his face would make you wonder that you
ever could have thought him like his twin sister.
When he heard the Sisseton braves talk of the hunts
they had in their youth, before the white man drove them
from the hunting-grounds of their forefathers;when
instead
of the blanket they wore the buffalo robe;when
happiness and plenty were in their wigwamsand when
the voices of weak women and famished children were
never heard calling for food in vainthen the longing for
vengeance that was written on his countenance, the
imprecations
that were breathed from his lips, the angry
scowl, the lightning from his eye, all made him unlike
indeed
to his sister, the pride of the Sissetons!
When the gentle breeze would play among the prairie
flowers, then would she win him from such bitter thoughts.
Come, my brother, we will go and sit by the banks of
the lake, why should you be unhappy! the buffalo is still
to be found upon our hunting-groundsthe spirit of the
lake watches over uswe shall not want for food.
He would go, because she asked him. The quiet and
beauty of nature were not for him; rather would he have
stood alone when the storm held its sway; when the
darkness
was only relieved by the flash that laid the tall trees of
the forest low; when the thunder bird clapped her wings as
she swept through the clouds above him. But could he
refuse to be happy when Wenona smiled? Alas! that
her gentle spirit should not always have been near to
soften his!
But as the beauty and warmth of summer passed away,
so did Wenona's strength begin to fail; the autumn wind,
that swept rudely over the prairie flowers, so that they could
not lift their heads above the tall grass, seemed to pass in
anger over the wigwam of the old manfor the eye of the
Dahcotah maiden was losing its brightness, and her step
was less firm, as she wandered with her brother in her
native woods. Vainly did the medicine men practice their
cherished ritesthe Great Spirit had calledand who
could refuse to hear his voice? she faded with the leaves
and the cries of the mourners were answered by the
wailing winds, as they sang her requiem.
A few months passed away, and her brother was alone.
The winter that followed his sister's death, was a severe
one. The mother had never been strong, and she soon
followed
her daughterwhile the father's age unfitted him to
contend with sorrow, infirmity, and want.
Spring returned, but winter had settled on the heart of
the young Sisseton; she was gone who alone could drive
away the shadow from his brow, what wonder then that
his countenance should always be stern. The Indians
called him Eta Keazah, or Sullen Face.
But after the lapse of years, the boy, who brooded over
the wrongs of his father, eagerly seeks an opportunity to
avenge his own. His sister has never been forgotten; but
he remembers her as we do a beautiful dream; and she is
the spirit that hovers round him while his eyes are closed
in sleep.
But there are others who hold a place in his heart. His
wife is always ready to receive him with a welcome, and
his young son calls upon him to teach him to send the
arrow to the heart of the buffalo. But the sufferings of his
tribe, from want of food and other privations, are ever before
his eyes. Vengeance upon the white man, who has caused
them!
CHAPTER II.
Winter
is the season of trial for the Sioux, especially
for the women and children. The incursions of the English
half-breeds and Cree Indians, into the Sisseton country,
have caused their buffalo to recede, and so little other game
is to be found, that indescribable sufferings are endured
every winter by the Sissetons.
Starvation forces the hunters to seek for the buffalo in
the depth of winter. Their families must accompany
them, for they have not the smallest portion of food to
leave with them; and who will protect them from the
Chippeways!
However inclement the season, their home must be for a
time on the open prairie. As far as the eye can reach, it
is a desert of snow. Not a stick of timber can be seen.
A storm is coming on too; nothing is heard but the
howling
blast, which mocks the cries of famished children.
The drifting of the snow makes it impossible to see what
course they are to take; they have only to sit down and
let the snow fall upon them. It is a relief when they are
quite covered with it, for it shelters them from the
keenness
of the blast!
Alas! for the children; the cry of those who can speak
is, Give me food! while the dying infant clings to its mother's
breast, seeking to draw, with its parting breath, the means
of life.
But the storm is over; the piercing cold seizes upon the
exhausted frames of the sufferers.
The children have hardly strength to stand; the father
places one upon his back and goes forward; the mother
wraps her dead child in her blanket, and lays it in the
snow; another is clinging to her, she has no time to weep
for the dead; nature calls upon her to make an effort for
the living. She takes her child and follows the rest. It
would be a comfort to her, could she hope to find her
infant's body when summer returns to bury it. She
shudders, and remembers that the wolves of the prairie are
starving too!
Food is found at last; the strength of the buffalo yields
to the arrow of the Sioux. We will have food and not die,
is the joyful cry of all, and when their fierce appetities are
appeased, they carry with them on their return to their
village, the skins of the animals with the remainder of the
meat.
The sufferings of famine and fatigue, however, are
followed
by those of disease; the strength of many is laid
low. They must watch, too, for their enemies are at
hand.
CHAPTER III.
In
the summer of 1844 a large party of half-breeds and
Indians from Red river,English subjects,trespassed
upon the hunting grounds of the Sioux. There were
several
hundred hunters, and many carts drawn by oxen for
the purpose of carrying away the buffalo they had killed.
One of this party had left his companions, and was riding
alone at some distance from them. A Dahcotah knew that
his nation would suffer from the destruction of their game
fresh in his memory, too, were the sufferings of the past
winter. What wonder then that the arrow which was
intended
for the buffalo, should find its way to the heart of
the trespasser!
This act enraged the half-breeds; they could not find
the Sioux who committed itbut a few days after they fell
in with a party of others, who were also hunting, and killed
seven of them. The rest escaped, and carried the news of
the death of their braves to their village. One of the killed
was a relative of Sullen Face. The sad news spread rapidly
through the village, and nothing was heard but
lamentation
.
The women cut long gashes on their arms, and as
the blood flowed from the wound they would cry, Where is
my husband? my son? my brother?
Soon the cry of revenge is heard above that of
lamentation
.
It is not possible, said Sullen Face, that we can
allow these English to starve us, and take the lives of our
warriors. They have taken from us the food that would
nourish our wives and children; and more, they have killed
seven of our bravest men! we will have revengewe will
watch for them, and bring home their scalps, that our women
may dance round them!
A war party was soon formed, and Sullen Face, at the
head of more than fifty warriors, stationed himself in the
vicinity of the road by which the half-breeds from Red
river drive their cattle to Fort Snelling.
Some days after, there was an unusual excitement in the
Sioux village on Swan lake, about twenty miles northwest of
Traverse des Sioux. A number of Indians were gazing at
an object not very distant, and in order to discover what it
was, the chief of the village, Sleepy Eyes, had sent one of
his young men out, while the rest continued to regard it
with looks of curiosity and awe.
They observed that as the Sioux approached it, he
slackened
his pace, when suddenly he gave a loud cry and ran
towards the village.
He soon reached them, and pale with terror, exclaimed,
It is a spirit, it is white as the snow that covers our
prairies in the winter. It looked at me and spoke not.
For a short time, his fears infected the others, but after a
while several determined to go and bring a more satisfactory
report to their chief. They returned with the body, as it
seemed only, of a white man; worn to a skeleton, with his
feet cut and bleeding, unable to speak from exhaustion;
nothing but the beating of his heart told that he lived.
The Indian women dressed his feet, and gave him food,
wiped the blood from his limbs, and, after a consultation,
they agreed to send word to the missionaries at Traverse
des Sioux, that there was a white man sick and suffering
with them.
The missionaries came immediately; took the man to
their home, and with kind nursing he was soon able to
account for the miserable situation in which he had been
found.
We left the state of Missouri, said the man, whose
name was Bennett, for the purpose of carrying cattle to
Fort Snelling. My companions' names were Watson and
Turner. We did not know the road, but supposed a map
would guide us, with what information we could get on the
way. We lost our way, however, and were eagerly looking
for some person who could set us right. Early one
morning
some Sioux came up with us, and seemed inclined to
join our party. One of them left hastily as if sent on a
message; after a while a number of warriors, accompanied
by the Indian who had left the first party, came towards
us. Their leader had a dark countenance, and seemed to
have great influence over them. We tried to make them
understand that we had lost our way; we showed them
the map, but they did not comprehend us.
After angrily addressing his men for a few moments, the
leader shot Watson through the shoulder, and another sent
an arrow through his body and killed him. They then
struck Watson's brother and wounded him.
In the mean time the other Indians had been killing our
cattle; and some of the animals having run away, they
made Watson, who was sadly bruised with the blows he
had received from them, mount a horse and go with them
to hunt the rest of the cattle. We never heard of him
again. The Indians say he disappeared from among the
bushes, and they could not find him; but the probability is
that they killed him. Some seemed to wish to kill Turner
and myselfbut after a while they told us to go, giving us
our horses and a little food. We determined to retrace our
steps. It was the best thing we could do; but our horses
gave out, and we were obliged to leave them and proceed
on foot.
We were soon out of provisions, and having no means
of killing game, our hearts began to fail us. Turner was
unwell, and on arriving at a branch of Crow river, about
one hundred miles northwest of Fort Snelling, he found
himself unable to swim. I tried to carry him across on my
back, but could not do it; he was drowned, and I barely
succeeded in reaching the shore. After resting, I proceeded
on my journey. When I came in sight of the Indian
village
,
much as I needed food and rest, I dreaded to show
myself, for fear of meeting Watson's fate. I was spared the
necessity of deciding. I fainted and fell to the ground.
They found me, and proved kinder than I anticipated.
Why they should have molested us I know not. There
is something in it that I do not understand.
But it is easily explained. Sullen Face supposed them to
belong to the party that had killed his friends, and through
this error he had shed innocent blood.
CHAPTER IV.
Who
that has seen Fort Snelling will not bear testimony
to its beautiful situation! Whichever way we turn,
nature
calls for our admiration. But beautiful as it is by
day, it is at night that its majesty and loveliness speak to
the soul. Look to the north, (while the Aurora Borealis is
flashing above us, and the sound of the waters of St.
Anthony's
Falls meets the ear,) the high bluffs of the
Mississippi
seem to guard its waters as they glide along. To the
south, the St. Peter's has wandered off, preferring gentle
prairies to rugged cliffs. To the east we see the meeting
of the waters; gladly as the returning child meets the
welcoming
smile of the parent, do the waves of the St. Peter's
flow into the Mississippi. On the west, there is prairie far
as the eye can reach.
But it is to the free only that nature is beautiful. Can
the prisoner gaze with pleasure on the brightness of the
sky, or listen to the rippling of the waves? they make him
feel his fetters the more.
I am here, with my heavy chain!
And I look on a torrent sweeping by,
And an eagle rushing to the sky,
And a host to its battle plain.
Must I pine in my fetters here!
With the wild wave's foam and the free bird's flight,
And the tall spears glancing on my sight,
And the trumpet in mine ear?
The summer of 1845 found Sullen Face a prisoner at
Fort Snelling. Government having been informed of the
murder of Watson by two Dahcotah Indians, orders were
received at Fort Snelling that two companies should
proceed
to the Sisseton country, and take the murderers, that
they might be tried by the laws of the United States.
Now for excitement, the charm of garrison life. Officers
are of course always ready to go where glory waits them,
but who ever heard of one being ready to go when the order
came?
Alas! for the young officer who has a wife to leave; it
will be weeks before he meets again her gentle smile!
Still morealas for him who has no wife at all! for he
has not a shirt with buttons on it, and most of what he has
are in the wash. He will have to borrow of Selden; but
here's the difficulty, Selden is going too, and is worse off
than himself. But no matter! what with pins and twine
and trusting to chance, they will get along.
Then the married men are inquiring for tin reflectors,
for hard bread, though healthy, is never tempting. India
rubber cloaks are in requisition too.
Those who are going, claim the doctor in case of accidents.
Those who stay, their wives at least, want him for fear
of measles; while the disciple of Esculapius, though he
knows there will be better cooking if he remain at home, is
certain there will be food for fun if he go. It is soon
decided
the
doctor goes.
Then the privates share in the pleasure of the day. How
should a soldier be employed but in active service? besides,
what a capital chance to desert! One, who is tired of
calling
All's well through the long night, with only the
7
rocks and trees to hear him, hopes that it will be his happy
fate to find out there is danger near, and to give the alarm.
Another vows, that if trouble wont come, why he will
bring it by quarrelling with the first rascally Indian he
meets. All is ready. Rations are put up for the men;
hams, buffalo tongues, pies and cake for the officers. The
battalion marches out to the sound of the drum and fife;
they are soon down the hillthey enter their boats;
handkerchiefs
are waved from the fort, caps are raised and
flourished over the waterthey are almost out of sight
they are gone.
When the troops reached their destination, Sullen Face
and Forked Horn were not there, but the chief gave them
three of his warriors, (who were with the party of Sullen
Face at the time of the murder,) promising that when the
two murderers returned they would come to Fort Snelling,
and give themselves up.
There was nothing then to prevent the immediate return
of our troops. Their tramp had been a delightful one, and
so far success had crowned their expedition. They were in
the highest spirits. But a little incident occurred on their
return, that was rather calculated to show the
transitoriness
of earthly joys. One dark night, when those who were
awake were thinking, and those who slept were dreaming
of their welcome home, there was evidently a disturbance.
The sleepers roused themselves; guns were discharged.
What could it be?
The cause was soon ascertained. To speak poetically,
the birds had flownin plain language, the prisoners had
run away. They were not bound, their honor had been
trusted to;but you cannot place much reliance on the
honor of an Indian with a prison in prospect. I doubt if a
white man could be trusted under such circumstances.
True, there was a guard, but, as I said, 'twas a dark
night.
The troops returned in fine health, covered with dust and
fleas, if not with glory.
CHAPTER V.
It
is time to return to Sullen Face. He and Forked
Horn, on their return to the village, were informed of what
had occurred during their absence. They offered to fulfil
the engagement of the chief, and accompanied by others of
the band, they started for Fort Snelling. The wife of
Sullen Face had insisted upon accompanying him, and
influenced by a presentiment that he should never return to
his native village, he allowed her to do so. Their little boy
quite forgot his fatigue as he listened to his father's voice,
and held his hand. When they were near the fort, notice
of their approach was sent to the commanding officer.
The entire force of the garrison marched out to receive
the prisoners. A large number of Indians assembled to
witness the scenetheir gay dresses and wild appearance
adding to its interest.
Sullen Face and Forked Horn, with the Sioux who had
accompanied them, advanced to meet the battalion. The
little boy dressed as a warrior, his war-eagle plumes waving
proudly over his head, held his father's hand. In a moment
the iron grasp of the soldier was on the prisoner's shoulder;
they entered the gate of the fort; and he, who had felt that
the winds of Heaven were not more free than a Dahcotah
warrior, was now a prisoner in the power of the white man.
But he entered not his cell until he had sung a warrior's
song. Should his enemies think that he feared them? Had
he not yielded himself up?
It was hard to be composed in parting with his wife and
child. Go my son, he said, you will soon be old enough
to kill the buffalo for your mother. But to his wife he
only said, I have done no wrong, and fear not the power
of my enemies. The Sissetons returned to the village,
leaving the prisoners at Fort Snelling, until they should be
sent to Dubuque for trial.
They frequently walked about the fort, accompanied by
a guard. Sullen Face seemed to be indifferent to his fate,
and was impressed with the idea that he never would return
to his home. Beautiful country! said he, as he gazed
towards the point where the waters of the Mississippi and
St. Peter's meet. I shall never look upon you again,
the waters of the rivers unite, but I have parted forever
from country and friends. My spirit tells me so. Then
welcome death! they guard me now with sword and
bayonet
,
but the soul of the Dahcotah is free.
After their removal to Dubuque, the two prisoners from
Fort Snelling, with others who had been concerned in the
murder, suffered much from sickness. Sullen Face would
not complain, but the others tried to induce him to make
his escape. He, at first, refused to do so, but finding his
companions determined upon going, he at last consented.
Their plans succeeded, and after leaving the immediate
neighborhood, they broke their shackles with stones. They
were obliged, however, to hide themselves for a time among
the rocks, to elude the sheriff and his party. They were
not taken, and as soon as they deemed it prudent, they
resumed
their route.
Two of the prisoners died near Prairie du Chien. Sullen
Face, Forked Horn, and another Sioux, pursued their
journey with difficulty, for they were near perishing from
want of food. They found a place where the Winnebagoes
had encamped, and they parched the corn that lay scattered
on the ground.
Disease had taken a strong hold upon the frame of Sullen
Face; he constantly required the assistance of his
companions
.
When they were near Prairie le Gros, he became
so ill that he was unable to proceed. He insisted upon his
friends leaving him; this they at first refused to do, but
fearing that they would be found and carried back to prison,
they consentedand the dying warrior found himself alone.
Some Indians who were passing by saw him and gently
carried him to their wigwam. But he heeded not their
kindness. Death had dimned the brightness of his eye, and
his fast-failing strength told of the long journey to the
spirits' land.
It was not thus, he said, that I thought to die!
Where are the warriors of the Sissetons? Do they listen
to my death song? I hoped to have triumphed over the
white man, but his power has prevailed. My spirit drooped
within his hated walls? But hark! there is music in my
ears'tis the voice of the sister of my youthCome
with me my brother, we wait for you in the house of the
spirits! we will sit by the banks of a lake more beautiful
than that by which we wandered in our childhood; you
will roam over the hunting grounds of your forefathers, and
there the white man may never come.
His eyes are closing fast in death, but his lips murmur
Wenona! I come! I come!
TONWA-YAH-PE-KIN;
THE SPIES.
CHAPTER I.
It
was in the spring of 1848, that several Dahcotahs
were carefully making their way along the forests near the
borders of the Chippeway country. There had recently
been a fight near the spot where they were, and the
Dahcotahs
were seeking the bodies of their friends who had
been slain, that they might take them home to bury them.
They moved noiselessly along, for their enemies were
near. Occasionally, one of them would imitate the cry of
a bird or of some animal, so that if the attention of their
enemies should be drawn to the spot, the slight noise they
made in moving might be attributed to any but the right
cause.
They had almost given up the hope of finding their
friends, and this was the close of their last day's efforts to
that intent. In the morning they intended to return to
their village.
It was a bright clear evening, and the rays of the setting
sun fell upon some objects further on. For a time the
Dahcotahs gazed in silence; but no movement gave sign
of what it was that excited their curiosity. All at once
there was a fearful foreboding; they remembered why they
were there, and they determined to venture near enough to
find out what was the nature of the object on which the
rays of the sun seemed to rest as if to attract their notice.
A few more steps and they were relieved from their
terrible
suspense, but their worst fears were realized.
The Dahcotahs recently killed had been skinned by the
Chippeways, while their bodies were yet warm with life,
and the skins were stretched upon poles; while on separate
poles the hands were placed, with one finger of each hand
pointing to the Dahcotah country. The savages were in a
fearful rage. They had to endure a twofold insult.
There were the bodies of their friends, treated as if they
were but beasts, and evidently put there to be seen by the
Dahcotahs. And besides, the hands pointing to the
country
of the Dahcotahsdid it not plainly say to the spies,
go back to your country and say to your warriors, that the
Chippeways despise them, that they are not worthy to be
treated as men?
The spies returned as cautiously as they had ventured
near the fatal spot, and it was not until they were out of
reach of danger from their foes, that they gave vent to
their indignation. Then their smothered rage burst forth.
They hastened to return and tell the event of their
journey
.
They forgot how grieved the wives and sisters of the
dead would be at being deprived of the solace of burying
the remains of their friendsthey only thought of revenge
for the insult they had received.
When they arrived at their village, they called together
their chiefs and braves, and related to them what they had
seen. A council of war was held, which resulted in
immediate
preparations being made to resent the indignity
offered
to their friends, and the insult to the whole tribe.
The war-dance is always celebrated before a war party
goes out to find an enemy, and there is in every village a
war chief, who conducts the party. The war dance is
performed
inside of a wigwam, and not out of door, as is
usually represented.
The Owl felt himself qualified in every respect to
conduct
the present party. He was a great warrior, and a
juggler besides; and he had a reputation acquired from an
act performed when he was a very young man, which
showed as much cunning as bravery; for one of these
qualities
is as necessary to a Dahcotah war chief as the other.
He was one of a party of Dahcotahs who went to war
against the Chippeways, but without success. On their
way back the Owl got separated from the rest of the
party, and he climbed a tree to see if he could discover his
comrades. While in the tree a war party of the
Chippeways
came in sight and stopped quite near the tree to
make their camp.
The Owl was in a sad predicament; he knew not what
to do to effect his escape. As he knew he had not the
power to contend with his enemies, he determined to have
recourse to stratagem. When it was quite dark he
commenced
hooting like an owl, having previously transformed
himself into one. The Chippeways looked up towards the
tree and asked the owl what he was doing there. The owl
replied that he had come to see a large war party of
Dahcotahs
who would soon pass by. The Chippeways took
the hint, and took to their heels too, and ran home. The
Owl then resumed his form, got down from the tree and
returned home.
This wonderful incident, which he related of himself, gave
him a great reputation and a name besides; for until now
he had been called Chask, a name always given to the
oldest son; but the Indians after this gave him the name
of the Owl.
It being decided that the war party should leave as soon
as their preparations could be made, the war chief sent for
those who were to dance. The dance was performed every
third or fourth night until the party left. For each dance
the war chief had a new set of performers; only so many
were asked at a time as could conveniently dance inside the
wigwam. While some were dancing, others were
preparing
for the expedition, getting extra mocassins made,
drying meat, or parching corn.
When all was ready, the party set out, with every
confidence
in their war chief. He was to direct them where to
find the enemy, and at the same time to protect them
from being killed themselves.
For a few days they hunted as they went along, and
they would build large fires at night, and tell long stories,
to make the time pass pleasantly.
The party was composed of about twenty warriors, and
they all obeyed implicitly the orders of their war chief, who
appointed some warriors to see that his directions were
carried out by the whole party. Wo to him who violates
a single regulation! his gun is broken, his blanket cut to
pieces, and he is told to return home. Such was the fate
of Iron Eyes, who wandered from the party to shoot a bird
on the wing, contrary to the orders of their chief. But
although disgraced and forbidden to join in the attempt to
punish the Chippeways for the outrage they had commited,
he did not return to his village; he followed the tracks of
the war party, determining to see the fun if he could not
partake of it.
On the fourth night after they left home, the warriors
were all assembled to hear the war song of their chief.
They were yet in their own country, seated on the edge of
a prairie, and back of them as far as the eye could reach,
there was nothing to be seen but the half melted snow; no
rocks, no trees, relieved the sameness of the view. On the
opposite side of the Mississippi, high bluffs, with their worn
sides and broken rocks, hung over the river; and in the
centre of its waters lay the sacred isles, whose many trees
and bushes wanted only the warm breath of summer to
display their luxuriance. The war chief commenced. He
prophesied that they would see deer on the next day, but
that they must begin to be careful, for they would then
have entered their enemies' country. He told them how
brave they were, and that he was braver still. He told them
the Chippeways were worse than prairie dogs. To all of
which the warriors responded, Ho!
When they found themselves near their enemies, the
chief forbade a gun being fired off; no straggling was
allowed; none but the spies were to go beyond a certain
distance from the party.
But after they entered the Chippeway country the
duties of the war chief were still more important. He had
to prophesy where the enemy was to be found, and about
their number; and besides, he had to charm the spirits of
their enemies, that they might be unable to contend with
the Dahcotahs. The spirits on this occasion took the form
of a bear.
About nine o'clock at night this ceremony commences.
The warriors all lie down as if asleep, when the war chief
signifies the approach of the spirits to his men, by the
earnestness of his exertions in singing.
The song continues, and increases in energy as the spirit
gets nearer to the hole in the ground, which the chief dug
and filled with water, previous to commencing his song.
Near this hole he placed a hoop, against which are laid all the
war implements of the chief. Before the song commences
the warriors sit and look steadfastly at their leader. But
when the spirit approaches this hole, the warriors hardly
dare breathe, for fear of frightening it away.
At last the spirit gets close to the hole. The war chief
strikes it with his rattle and kills it; this ensures to the
Dahcotahs success in battle. And most solemnly did the
Owl assert to his soldiers, the fact that he had thus dealt
with the bear spirit, while they as earnestly believed it.
The next morning, four of the warriors went in advance
as spies; one of them carried a pipe, presented as an
offering
to deceive the spirits of their enemies. About noon
they sat down to rest, and waited until the remainder of
the party came up. When they were all together again,
they rested and smoked; and other spies were appointed,
who took the pipe and went forward again.
They had not proceeded far when they perceived signs
of their enemies. In the sand near the borders of a prairie
were the footprints of Chippeways, and fresh too. They
congratulated each other by looks, too cautious even to
whisper. In a few moments a hundred Chippeways could
be called up, but still the Dahcotahs plunge into the
thick forest that skirts the edge of the prairie, in order to
find out what prospect they have for delighting themselves
with the long wished for revenge.
It was not long before a group of Chippeways was
discovered
,
all unapprehensive of evil. At their camp the
Chippeways had made pickets, for they knew they might
expect retaliation; but those who fell a sacrifice were not
expecting their foes.
The spies were not far aheadthey returned to the party,
and then retraced their steps. The low cries of animals
were imitated to prevent any alarm being given by the
breaking of a twig or the rustling of the leaves. They
were very near the Chippeways, when the war chief gave
the signal on a bone whistle, and the Dahcotahs fired.
Every one of the Chippeways felltwo men, three women,
and two children.
Then came the tomahawk and scalping knifethe
former to finish the work of death, the latter to bear a
trophy to their country, to say, Our comrades are avenged.
Nor was that all. The bodies were cut to pieces, and then
the warriors commenced their homeward journey.
They allowed themselves but little rest until they were
out of their enemies' country. But when they were out of
the reach of attack, when their feet trod again upon
Dahcotah
soil, then they stopped to stretch each scalp on a
hoop, which was attached to a slender pole. This is
always the work of the war chief.
They look eagerly for the welcome sight of home. The
cone-shaped teepees rise before their view. They know
that their young wives will rejoice to see the scalps, as
much as to know that the wanderers have returned.
When they are near their village the war chief raises
the song of victory; the other warriors join their voices to
his. The welcome sound rouses the inhabitants of the
village from their duties or amusements. The warriors
enter the village in triumph, one by one, each bearing the
scalp he took; and the stout warrior, the aged woman, and
the feeble child, all press forward to feast their eyes with
the sight of the scalps.
There was a jubilee in the village for weeks. Day and
night did the savages dance round the scalps. But how
soon may their rejoicings be lost in cries of terror! Even
now they tremble at the sound of their own voices when
evening draws nearfor it is their turn to suffer. They
expect their foes, but they do not dread them the less.
CHAPTER II.
Many
of the customs of the Dahcotahs are to be
attributed
to their superstitions. Their teepees are always made
of buffalo-skins; nothing would induce them to use
deer-skin
for that purpose. Many years ago a woman made a
teepee of deer-skin, and was taken suddenly ill, and died
immediately after. Some reason must be found for the
cause of her death, and as no other was known, the Indians
concluded that she brought her death upon herself by using
deer-skin for her teepee. They have always, since, used
buffalo-skin for that purpose.
Nothing would induce a Dahcotah woman to look into a
looking-glass; for the medicine men say that death will be
the consequence.
But there is no superstition which influences them more
than their belief in Haokah, or the Giant. They say this
being is possessed of superhuman powers: indeed he is
deemed so powerful, as to be able to take the thunder in his
hand and cast it to the ground. He dresses in many colors,
and wears a forked hat. One side of his face is red, the
other blue, his eyes are also of different colors. He always
carries a bow and arrow in his hand, but never has occasion
to use it, as one look will kill the animal he wants.
They sing songs to this giant, and once in a long time
dance in honor of him; but so severe is the latter custom,
that it is rarely performed. The following incident will
show how great is their reverence for this singular being.
An Indian made a vapor bath, and placed inside of it a rude
image of the giant, made of birch bark. This he intended
to pray to while bathing.
After the hot stone was placed inside of the wigwam,
several Indians went in to assist in giving the bath to their
sick friend. One of them commenced pouring the water
on the hot stone, and the water flew on the others, and
scalded them badly; the image of the giant was also
displaced
;
the Indians never dreamed of attributing their burns
to the natural cause, but concluded that the giant was
displeased
at their placing his image there, and they
considered
it as an instance of his mercy that they were not
scalded to death.
However defective may be the religion of the Dahcotahs,
they are faithful in acting up to all its requirements. Every
feast and custom among them is celebrated as a part of
their religion.
After the scalp-dance had been performed long enough,
the Dahcotahs of the villages turned their attention to
making sugar. Many groves of sugar trees were in sight
of their village, and on this occasion the generous sap
rewarded
their labors.
Nor were they ungrateful; for when the medicine men
announced that they must keep the sugar-feast, all left
their occupation, anxious to celebrate it. Neither need it
be concluded that this occasioned them no loss of time; for
they were all occupied with the construction of their
summer
wigwams, which are made of the bark of trees, which
must be peeled off in the spring.
But every villager assembled to keep the feast. A
certain
quantity of sugar was dealt out to each individual,
and any one of them who could not eat all that was given
him was obliged to pay leggins, or a blanket, or something
valuable, to the medicine man. On this occasion, indeed
on most occasions, the Dahcotahs have no difficulty in
disposing
of any quantity of food.
When the feast was over, however, the skill of their
doctors
was in requisition; for almost all of them were made
quite ill by excess, and were seen at evening lying at full
length on the ground, groaning and writhing with pain.
CHAPTER III.
The
day after the sugar feast, the Owl told his wife to
get ready her canoe, as he wanted to spear some fish. She
would rather have staid at home, as she was not fully
recovered
from her last night's indisposition. But there was
no hesitating when the war chief spoke; so she placed her
child upon her back, and seated herself in the stern of the
canoe, paddling gently along the shore where the fish
usually
lie. Her husband stood in the bow of the canoe with
a spear about six feet in length. As he saw the fish lying
in the water, he threw the spear into them, still keeping
hold of it.
When the war chief was tired, his wife would stop
paddling
,
and nurse her child while he smoked. If the Owl
were loquaciously inclined, he would point out to his wife
the place where he shot a deer, or where he killed the man
who had threatened his life. Indeed, if you took his word
for it, there was not a foot of ground in the country which
had not been a scene of some exploit.
The woman believed them all; for, like a good wife, she
shone by the reflected light of her husband's fame.
When they returned home, she made her fire and put
the fish to cook, and towards evening many of the Indians
were assembled in the wigwam of the war-chief, and
partook
of the fish he had caught in the morning.
Unk-ta-he,
[12]
[12]
The God of the Waters.
said one of the oldest men in the tribe
(and reverenced as a medicine man of extraordinary
powers
),
Unk-ta-he is as powerful as the thunder-bird. Each
wants to be the greatest god of the Dahcotahs, and they
have had many battles. My father was a great medicine
man; he was killed many years ago, and his spirit
wandered
about the earth. The Thunder-bird wanted him,
and Unk-ta-he wanted him, for they said he would make a
wonderful medicine man. Some of the sons of Unk-ta-he
fought against the sons of the Thunder, and the young
thunder-birds were killed, and then Unk-ta-he took the
spirit of my father, to teach him many mysterious things.
When my father had lived a long time with Unk-ta-he
in the waters under the earth, he took the form of a
Dahcotah
again, and lived in this village. He taught me all that
I know, and when I go to the land of spirits, my son must
dance alone all night, and he will learn from me the secret
of the medicine of our clan.
All listened attentively to the old man, for not an Indian
there but believed that he could by a spell cause their
instant
death; and many wonderful miracles had the Elk
wrought in his day.
In the corner of the wigwam sat the Bound Spirit, whose
vacant look told the sad tale of her want of reason.
Generally
she sat quiet, but if the cry of an infant fell upon her
ear, she would start, and her shriek could be heard
throughout
the village.
The Bound Spirit was a Sisseton. In the depth of
winter
,
she had left her village to seek her friends in some of
the neighboring bands. She was a widow, and there was
no one to provide her food.
Accompanied by several other Indians, she left her home,
which was made wretched by her desolate conditionthat
home where she had been very happy while her husband
lived. It had since been the scene of her want and misery.
The small portion of food they had taken for their
journey
was exhausted. Rejoiced would they have been to
have had the bark of trees for food; but they were on the
open prairie. There was nothing to satisfy the wretched
cravings of hunger, and her childthe very child that
clung to her bosomwas killed by the unhappy mother,
and its tender limbs supplied to her the means of life.
She reached the place of destination, but it was through
instinct, for forgetting and forgotten by all was the wretched
maniac who entered her native village.
The Indians feared her; they longed to kill her, but were
afraid to do so. They said she had no heart.
Sometimes she would go in the morning to the shore,
and there, with only her head out of water, would she lie
all day.
Now, she has been weeping over the infant who sleeps
by her. She is perfectly harmless, and the wife of the
war chief kindly gives her food and shelter whenever she
wishes it.
But it is not often she eatsonly when desperate from
long fastingand when her appetite is satisfied, she seems
to live over the scene, the memory of which has made her
what she is.
After all but she had eaten of the fish, the Elk related
to them the story of the large fish that obstructed the
passage
of the St. Croix river. The scene of this tradition was
far from them, but the Dahcotahs tell each other over and
over again the stories which have been handed down from
their fathers, and these incidents are known throughout the
tribe. Two Dahcotahs went to war against their
enemies
.
On returning home, they stopped at the Lake St.
Croix, hungry and much fatigued.
One of them caught a fish, cooked it, and asked his
comrade to eat, but he refused. The other argued with
him, and begged of him to eat, but still he declined.
The owner of the fish continued to invite his friend to
partake of it, until he, wearied by his importunities,
consented
to eat, but added with a mysterious look, `My
friend, I hope you will not get out of patience with me.'
After saying this, he ate heartily of the fish.
He then seemed to be very thirsty, and asked his
companion
to bring him some water out of the lake; he did so,
but very soon the thirst, which was quenched for a time
only, returned; more was given him, but the terrible thirst
continued, and at last the Indian, who had begged his
companion
to eat, began to be tired of bringing him water to
drink. He therefore told him he would bring him no more,
and requested him to go down to the water and drink. He
did so, and after drinking a great quantity, while his friend
was asleep, he turned himself into a large fish and stretched
himself full length across the St. Croix.
This fish for a long time obstructed the passage of the
St. Croix; so much so that the Indians were obliged to go
round it by land.
Some time ago the Indians were on a hunting
excursion
up the river, and when they got near the fish a woman
of the party darted ahead in her canoe.
She made a dish of bark, worked the edges of it very
handsomely, filled it with water, and placed some red down
in it. She then placed the dish near the fish in the river,
and entreated the fish to go to its own elements, and not to
obstruct the passage of the river and give them so much
trouble.
The fish obeyed, and settled down in the water, and
has never since been seen.
The woman who made this request of the fish, was
loved by him when he was a Dahcotah, and for that reason
he obeyed her wishes.
Nor was this the only legend with which he amused his
listeners. The night was half spent when they separated
to rest, with as firm a faith in the stories of the old
medicine
man, as we have in the annals of the Revolution.
valued by the friends of an Indian girl, he was said to be
the best hunter of the tribe.
Marry him, my daughter, said the mother, your
father is old; he cannot now hunt deer for you and me, and
what shall we do for food? Chask will hunt the deer and
buffalo, and we shall be comfortable and happy.
Yes, said her father, your mother speaks well.
Chask is a great warrior too. When your brother died, did
he not kill his worst enemy and hang up his scalp at his
grave?
But Wenona persevered in her refusal. I do not love
him, I will not marry him, was her constant reply.
But Chask, trusting to time and her parent's influence,
was not discouraged. He killed game and supplied the
wants of the family. Besides, he had twice bought her,
according to Indian custom.
He had given her parents cloth and blankets, calico and
guns. The girl entreated them not to receive them, but
the lover refused to take them back, and, finally, they were
taken into the wigwam.
Just as the band was about leaving the village for the
hunt, he came again with many presents; whatever would
make the family comfortable on their journey, and a
decided
promise was then given that the maiden should
become
his wife.
She knew it would be useless to contend, so she seemed
to be willing to submit to her fate. After encamping for
a time opposite the Maiden's Rock to rest from their
journey, the hunters determined to go further down the
river. They had crossed over to the other side, and were
seated nearly under the rock.
Their women were in their canoes coming over, when
suddenly a loud cry was heard from an old woman, the
mother of Wenona.
The canoe had nearly reached the shore, and the mother
continued to shriek, gazing at the projecting rock.
The Indians eagerly inquired of her what was the
matter? Do you not see my daughter? she said; she
is standing close to the edge of the rock!
She was there indeed, loudly and wildly singing her
dirge, an invocation to the Spirit of the Rock, calm and
unconcerned in her dangerous position, while all was terror
and excitement among her friends below her.
The hunters, so soon as they perceived her, hastily
ascended the bluff, while her parents called to her and
entreated her to go back from the edge of the rock.
Come down to us, my child, they cried; do not
destroy
your life; you will kill us, we have no child but
you.
Having finished her song, the maiden answered her
parents. You have forced me to leave you. I was
always a good daughter, and never disobeyed you; and
could I have married the man I love, I should have been
happy, and would never have left you. But you have been
cruel to me; you have turned my beloved from the
wigwam
;
you would have forced me to marry a man I hated;
I go to the house of spirits.
By this time the hunters had nearly reached her. She
turned towards them for a moment with a smile of scorn,
as if to intimate to them that their efforts were in vain.
But when they were quite near, so that they held out their
8
arms towards her in their eagerness to draw her from her
dangerous station, she threw herself from the rock.
The first blow she received from the side of the rock
must have killed her, for she fell like a dead bird, amidst
the shouts of the hunters above, and the shrieks of the
women below.
Her body was arrayed in her handsomest clothing,
placed upon a scaffold, and afterwards buried.
But the Dahcotahs say that her spirit does not watch
over her earthly remains; for her spirit was offended when
she brought trouble upon her aged mother and father.
Such is the story told by the Dahcotahs; and why not
apply to them for their own traditions?
Neither is there any reason to doubt the actual
occurrence
of the incident.
Not a season passes away but we hear of some
Dahcotah
girl who puts an end to her life in consequence of
jealousy, or from the fear of being forced to marry some
one she dislikes. A short time ago a very young girl hung
herself, rather than become the wife of a man who was
already the husband of one of her sisters.
The parents told her they had promised her, and insisted
upon her fulfilling the engagement. Even her sister did
not object, nay, rather seemed anxious to forward the
scheme, which would give her a rival from among her
nearest relations.
The young girl finally ran away, and the lover, leaving
his wife, pursued the fugitive, and soon overtook her. He
renewed his entreaties, and finding her still obstinate, he
told her that she should become his wife, and that he would
kill her if she made any more trouble.
This last argument seemed to have the desired effect,
for the girl expressed her willingness to return home.
After they arrived, the man went to his wigwam to tell
his wife of the return of her sister, and that everything
was now in readiness for their marriage.
But one hour after, the girl was missing; and when
found, was hanging to a tree, forever free from the power
of her tormentors. Her friends celebrated the ceremonies
of death instead of marriage.
It must be conceded that an Indian girl, when desperate
with her love affairs, chooses a most unromantic way of
ending her troubles. She almost invariably hangs herself;
when there are so many beautiful lakes near her where
she could die an easier death, and at the same time one
that would tell better, than where she fastens an old
leather strap about her neck, and dies literally by choking.
But there is this to be taken into consideration. When
she hangs herself near the village, she can manage affairs
so that she can be cut down if she concludes to live a little
longer; for this frequently occurs, and the suicide lives
forty and sometimes sixty years after. But when Wenona
took the resolution of ending her earthly sorrows, no doubt
there were other passions beside love influencing her
mind.
Love was the most powerful. With him she loved, life
would have been all happinesswithout him, all misery.
Such was the reasoning of her young heart.
But she resented the importunity of the hunter whose
pretensions her parents favored. How often she had told
him she would die before she would become his wife; and
he would smile, as if he had but little faith in the words of
a woman. Now he should see that her hatred to him was
not assumed; and she would die such a death that he might
know that she feared neither him nor a death of agony.
And while her parents mourned their unkindness, her
lover would admire that firmness which made death more
welcome than the triumph of his rival.
And sacred is the spot where the devoted girl closed her
earthly sorrows. Spirits are ever hovering near the scene.
The laugh of the Dahcotah is checked when his canoe glides
near the spot. He points to the bluff, and as the shades of
evening are throwing dimness and a mystery around the
beauty of the lake, and of the mountains, he fancies he can
see the arms of the girl as she tosses them wildly in the air.
Some have averred they heard her voice as she called to the
spirits of the rock, and ever will the traveller, as he passes
the bluff, admire the wondrous beauty of the picture, and
remember the story of the lover's leap.
There is a tradition among the Dahcotahs which fixes a
date to the incident, as well as to the death of the rival
lovers of Wenona.
They say that it occurred about the time stated, and
that the band of Indians went and obtained the porcupines,
and then they returned and settled on the St. Croix river.
Shortly after the tragical death of Wenona, the band
went again down the Mississippi, and they camped at what
they call the medicine wood. Here a child died, and the
body was laid on a scaffold. The father in the middle of
the night went out to mourn for his child. While he leant
against the scaffold weeping, he saw a man watching him.
The stranger did not appear to be a Dahcotah, and the
mourner was alarmed, and returned to the camp. In the
morning he told the Indians of the circumstance, and they
raised the camp and went into the pine country.
The body of the child was carried along, and in the night
the father went out again to lament its death. The same
figure appeared to him, and again he returned, alarmed at
the circumstance.
In the morning the Indians moved their camp again, and
at night the same occurrence took place.
The Dahcotahs are slaves to superstition, and they now
dreaded a serious evil. Their fears were not confirmed in
the way they anticipated, for their foes came bodily, and
when daylight appeared, one thousand Chippeway warriors
appeared before them, and the shrill whistle and terrible
whoop of war was heard in earnest.
Dreadful were the shouts of the Chippeways, for the
Dahcotahs were totally unprepared for them, and many
were laid low at the first discharge of the rifles.
The merciless Chippeways continued the work of death.
The women and children fled to their canoes, but the
Chippeways
were too quick for them; and they only entered
their canoes to meet as certain a fate as those who
remained
.
The women had not their paddles with them, and there
was an eddy in the current; as soon as the canoe was
pushed from the shore, it would whirl round, and the
delighted
Chippeways caught the canoes, and pulled them
ashore again, while others let fall upon their victims the
uplifted tomahawk.
When the Chippeways had killed until they were tired,
they took what they wanted from the Sioux camp, and
started for home, taking one Dahcotah boy prisoner. The
party had not travelled far, when a number of Dahcotahs
attacked the Chippeways, but the latter succeeded in
killing
many of the Dahcotahs. One of the latter fled, and
was in his canoe on the lake St. Croix, when the
Chippeways
suddenly came upon him.
The little Dahcotah saw his only chance for libertyhe
plunged in the water and made for the canoe of the
Dahcotah
.
In a moment he had reached and entered it, and
the two Dahcotahs were out of sight before the arrows of
their enemies could reach them.
A very few of that band escaped; one of them says that
when they were first attacked by the Chippeways, he saw
he had but one chance, so he dived down to the bottom of
the river, and the Chippeways could not see him.
He found the water at the bottom of the river very cold,
and when he had gone some distance, he ventured where
the water was warmer, which he knew was near the shore.
He then came out of the water and made his escape.
Even this latter trifling incident has been handed down
from father to son, and is believed universally by the
Dahcotahs
.
And according to their tradition, the lovers and
family of Wenona perished in this battle. At all events,
there is no one who can prove that their tradition or my
translation may not be true.
THE INDIAN IN A TRANCE.
About
forty years ago, Ahak-tah, The Male Elk, was
taken sick with a sore throat. It was in the winter too,
and sickness and cold together are hard to bear. Want
was an evil from which they were suffering; though the
Dahcotahs were not so poor then as they are now. They
had not given so much of their lands to the white people;
and they depended more upon their own exertions for
support
than they do at present.
The medicine men did all they could to cure Ahaktah;
they tried to charm away the animal that had entered into
his body; they used the sacred rattle. But Ahaktah's
throat got worse; he died, and while his wives and
children
wept for him, he had started on his long journey to
the land of spirits.
He was wrapped in scarlet cloth, and laid upon a scaffold.
His wives sat weeping in their teepee, when a cry from
their young children drew their attention to the door.
There stood he for whom they mourned. The dead man
again took his place among those who sat beside the
household
fire. Tears of grief were shed no morefood was
given to Ahaktah, and when he was refreshed he thus
addressed
his wondering family:
While you were weeping for me, my spirit was on its
way to the great city where our fathers, who have taught
us all the wonders of our sacred medicine, of Haokah the
giant, and of the Thunder bird, are now living. Twice has
the sun ceased to shine since I left you, and in that short
time I have seen many strange things. First, I passed
through a beautiful country; the forest-trees were larger
than any you have ever seen. Birds of all colors filled
them, and their music was as loud as when our medicine
men play for us to celebrate the scalp dance. The broad
river was full of fish, and the loon screamed as she swam
across the lakes. I had no difficulty in finding my way,
for there was a road through this country. It seemed as
if there must have been many travellers there, though I
saw no one.
This great road was made by the spirits of those who
were killed in battle. No warrior, however brave he may
have been, has ever assisted in making this road, except
those who sang their death songs under the tomahawk of
their enemies. Neither did any woman ever assist. She
is not considered worthy to touch the war implements of a
Dahcotah warrior, and she was not permitted to do
anything
towards completing the path in which the braves of
the Dahcotahs would walk, when they joined their
forefathers
in the land of spirits.
As I pursued my journey, I saw near the banks of the
river a teepee; I entered it, and saw paint and all that a
warrior needed to dress himself in order to be fit to enter
the city of spirits. I sat down and plaited my hair, I put
vermilion on my cheeks, and arranged the war-eagle
feathers
in my head. Here, I said to myself, did my father rest
when he was on the same journey. I was tired, but I could
not waitI longed to see my friends who had travelled this
path before meI longed to tell them that the Dahcotahs
were true to the customs of their forefathersI longed to
tell them that we had drunk deep of the blood of the
Chippeways
,
that we had eaten the hearts of our enemies, that
we had torn their infants from their mothers' breasts, and
dashed them to the earth.
I continued my journey, looking eagerly around me to
see some one, but all was desolate; and beautiful as
everything
was, I would have been glad to have seen the face
of a friend.
It was evening when a large city burst upon my sight.
The houses were built regularly on the shores of the river.
As far as I could see, the homes of the spirits of my
forefathers
were in view.
But still I saw no one. I descended the hill towards
the river, which I must cross to reach the city of spirits. I
saw no canoe, but I feared nothing, I was so near my
journey's
end. The river was wide and deep, and the waves
were swiftly following one another, when I plunged among
them; soon I reached the opposite shore, and as I again
stood on the land, I heard some one cry, `Here he comes!
here he comes!' I approached the nearest house and
entered
;
everything looked awful and mysterious.
In the corner of the room sat a figure whom I
recognized
.
It was my mother's brother, Flying Wind, the
medicine
man. I remembered him, for it was he who taught
me to use my bow and arrow.
In a bark dish, in the corner of the room, was some
wild rice. I was very hungry, for I had not eaten since I
8*
left the earth. I asked my uncle for some rice to eat, but
he did not give it to me. Had I eaten of the food for
spirits, I never should have returned to earth.
At last my uncle spoke to me. `My nephew,' said he,
`why are you travelling without a bow and arrow? how
can you provide yourself with food when you have no
means of killing game? When my home was on the
Mississippi
,
the warriors of the Dahcotahs were never without
their bows and arrowseither to secure their food or to
strike to the hearts of their enemies.'
I then remembered that I had been travelling without
my bow and arrows. `But where,' said I to my uncle,
`where are the spirits of my forefathers? where is my
brother who fell under the tomahawk of his enemy? where
is my sister who threw herself into the power of Unkt-ahe,
rather than to live and see her rival the wife of the Sun?
where are the spirits of the Dahcotah braves whose deeds
are still told from father to son among us?'
`The Dahcotah braves are still watching for their
enemies
the
hunters are bringing in the deer and the buffalo
our women are planting corn and tanning deer-skin.
But you will not now see them; your step is firm and
your eye is bright; you must return to earth, and when
your limbs are feeble, when your eye is dim, then will you
return and find your home in the city of spirits.'
So saying, he arose and gave me a bow and arrow. I
took it, and while trying it I left the house; but how I do
not know.
The next thing that I remember was being seated
on the top of the cliffs of Eagle's Nest, below Lake Pepin.
I heard a sound, and soon distinguished my mother's voice;
she was weeping. I knew that she was bending over my
body. I could see her as she cut off her hair, and I felt sad
when I heard her cry, `My son! my son!' Then I
recollect
being on the top of the half-side mountain on Lake
Pepin. Afterwards I was on the mountain near Red
Wing's village, and again I stood on a rock, on a point of
land near where the waters of the Mississippi and St.
Peter's meet, on the `Maiden's Jumping Rock;'
[13]
[13]
Near Fort Snelling is a high rock called the Maiden's Jumping Rock;
where formerly the Dahcotah girls used to jump for amusement, a distance of
many feet from the top to the ground.
here I
recovered my right mind.
The daughter of Ahaktah says that her father retained
the wahkun bow and arrow that was given him by his
uncle, and that he was always successful in hunting or in
war; that he enjoyed fine health, and lived to be a very old
man; and she is living now to tell the story.
OECHE-MONESAH;
THE WANDERER.
Chaske
was tired of living in the village, where the
young men, finding plenty of small game to support life,
and yielding to the languor and indolence produced by a
summer's sun, played at checker's, or drank, or slept, from
morn till night, and seemed to forget that they were the
greatest warriors and hunters in the world. This did very
well for a time; but, as I said, Chask got tired of it. So
he determined to go on a long journey, where he might
meet with some adventures.
Early one morning he shouldered his quiver of arrows,
and drawing out one arrow from the quiver, he shot it in
the direction he intended to go.
Now, said he, I will follow my arrow. But it
seemed as if he were destined never to find it, for morning
and noon had passed away, and the setting sun warned
him, not only of the approach of night, but of musquitoes
too. He thought he would build a fire to drive the
musquitoes away; besides, he was both hungry and tired,
though he had not yet found his arrow, and had nothing
to eat.
When he was hesitating as to what he should do, he
saw in the bushes a dead elk, and behold! his arrow was
sticking in its side. He drew the arrow out, then cut out
the tongue, and after making a fire, he put the tongue
upon a stick to roast. But while the tongue was roasting,
Chask fell asleep and slept many hours.
At day-break a woman came up to him and shook him,
as if to awake him. Chask started and rubbed his eyes,
and the woman pointed to the path which led across the
prairies. Was he dreaming? No, he felt sure he was
awake. So he got up and followed the woman.
He thought it very strange that the woman did not
speak to him. I will ask her who she is, said he; but
as he turned to address her she raised her arms in the air,
and changing her form to that of a beautiful bird, blue as
the sky that hangs over the morning's mist, she flew away.
Chask was surprised and delighted too. He loved
adventures
;
had he not left home to seek them? so he pursued
his journey, quite forgetting his supper, which was cooking
when he fell asleep.
He shot his arrow off again and followed it. It was late
in the evening when he found it, and then it was in the
heart of a moose. I will not be cheated out of my
supper to-night, said he; so he cut the tongue out of the
moose and placed it before the fire to roast. Hardly had
he seated himself to smoke, when sleep overcame him, and
he knew nothing until morning, when a woman approached
and shook him as before, pointing to the path.
He arose quickly and followed her; and as he touched
her arm, determined to find out who she was, she, turning
upon him a brow black as night, was suddenly changed
into a crow.
The Dahcotah was completely puzzled. He had never
cared for women; on the contrary, had avoided them. He
never wasted his time telling them they were beautiful, or
playing on the flute to charm their senses. He thought
he had left all such things behind him, but already had he
been twice baffled by a woman. Still he continued his
journey. He had this consolation, the Dahcotah girls did
not turn into birds and fly away. At least there was the
charm of novelty in the incidents. The next day he killed
a bear, but as usual he fell asleep while the tongue was
roasting, and this time he was waked by a porcupine.
The fourth day he found his arrow in a buffalo. Now,
said he, I will eat at last, and I will find out, too, who
and what it is that wakes me.
But he fell asleep as usual, and was waked in the
morning by a female who touched him lightly and pointed
to the path. Her back was turned towards him, and
instead of rising to follow her, he caught her in his arms,
determined to see and talk with her.
Finding herself a prisoner, the girl turned her face to
him, and Chask had never seen anything so beautiful.
Her skin was white as the fairest flower that droops its
head over the banks of the Lac qui parle. Her hair
was not plaited, neither was it black like the Dahcotah
maidens', but it hung in golden ringlets about her face and
neck. The warm blood tinted her cheeks as she met the
ardent gaze of the Dahcotah, and Chask could not ask
her who she was. How could he speak when his heart
was throbbing, and every pulse beating wildly?
Let me go, said the girl; why do you seek to
detain me? I am a beaver-woman,
[14]
[14]
According to the wise men of the Dahcotahs, beavers and bears have
souls. They have many traditions about bear and beaver-women.
and you are a
Dahcotah
warrior. Turn from me and find a wife among the
dark-faced maidens of your tribe.
I have always despised them, said the Dahcotah,
but you are more beautiful than the Spirits of the water.
I love you, and will make you my wife.
Then you must give up your people, replied the girl,
for I cannot live as the Dahcotah women. Come with
me to my white lodge, and we will be happy; for see the
bright water as it falls on the rocks. We will sit by its
banks during the heat of the day, and when we are tired,
the music of its waves will lull us to sleep.
So she took Chask by the hand, and they walked on till
they came to an empty white lodge, and there they lived
and were very happy. They were still happier when their
little boy began to play about the lodge; for although they
loved each other very much, still it was lonely where they
lived, and the child was company for them both.
There was one thing, however, that troubled the
Dahcotah
;
he could not turn his mind from it, and day after
day passed without relieving him from his perplexity.
His beautiful wife never ate with him. When he
returned
in the evening from hunting, she was always glad
to see him, and while he rested himself and smoked, she
would cook his meat for him, and seem anxious to make
him comfortable. But he had never seen her eat; and
when he would tell her that he did not like to eat alone,
and beg her to sit down and eat with him, she would say
she was not hungry; and then employ herself about her
wigwam, as if she did not wish him to say any more
about it.
Chask made up his mind that he would find out what
his wife lived upon. So the next morning he took his bow
and arrows, as if he were going out on a day's hunt. After
going a short distance from the lodge, he hid himself in the
trees, where he could watch the motions of his wife.
She left the lodge after a while, and with an axe in her
hand she approached a grove of poplar trees. After
carefully
looking round to satisfy herself that there was no one
near, she cut down a number of the small and tender
poplars
,
and, carrying them home, ate them as if she enjoyed
them very much. Chask was infinitely relieved when he
saw that his wife did eat; for it frightened him to think
that she lived on nothing but air. But it was so droll to
think she should eat young trees! surely venison was a
great deal better.
But, like a good husband, he thought it was his duty to
humor his wife's fancies. And then he loved her tenderly
he had given up country and home for her. She was so
good and kind, and her beautiful hair! Chask called her
The Mocassin Flower, for her golden ringlets reminded
him of that beautiful flower. She shall not have to cut
the trees down herself, said Chask, I will bring her food
while she prepares mine. So he went out to hunt, and
returned in the evening; and while his wife was cooking
his supper, he went to the poplar grove and cut a number
of young trees; he then brought them to the lodge, and,
laying them down, he said to his wife, I have found out
at last what you like.
No one would suppose but that the beaver-woman
would have been grateful to her husband for thinking of
her. Instead of that, she was very angry; and, taking her
child in her arms, she left the lodge. Chask was
astonished
to see his gentle wife angry, but he concluded he
would eat his supper, and then follow her, hoping that in
the meantime she would recover her good temper.
When he went out, she was nowhere to be seen. He
called herhe thought at first that she had hid herself.
But, as night came on, and neither she nor the child
returned
,
the deserted husband grew desperate; he could not
stay in his lodge, and the only thing that he could do was
to start in search of her.
He walked all night, but saw no trace of her. About
sunrise he came to a stream, and following it up a little
way he came to a beaver dam, and on it sat his wife with
her child in her arms. And beautiful she looked, with her
long tresses falling into the water.
Chask was delighted to find her. Why did you leave
me? called he. I should have died of grief if I had not
found you.
Did I not tell you that I could not live like the
Dahcotah
women? replied Mocassin Flower. You need not
have watched me to find out what I eat. Return to your
own people; you will find there women enough who eat
venison.
The little boy clapped his hands with delight when he
saw his father, and wanted to go to him; but his mother
would not let him. She tied a string to his leg and told
him to go, and the child would plunge into the water, and
when he had nearly reached the shore where his father sat,
then would the beaver-woman draw him back.
In the meantime the Dahcotah had been trying to
persuade
his wife to come to him, and return to the lodge; but
she refused to do so, and sat combing her long hair. The
child had cried itself to sleep; and the Dahcotah, worn out
with fatigue and grief, thought he would go to sleep too.
After a while a woman came and touched him on the
shoulder, and awaked him as of old. He started and looked
at her, and perceiving it was not his wife, felt inclined to
take little notice of her.
What, said she, does a Dahcotah warrior still love
a woman who hates him?
Mocassin Flower loves me well, replied the Dahcotah;
she has been a good wife.
Yes, replied the woman, she was for a time; but
she sighs to return homeher heart yearns towards the
lover of her youth.
Chask was very angry. Can this be true? he said;
and he looked towards the beaver dam where his wife still
sat. In the meantime the woman who had waked him,
brought him some food in bark dishes worked with
porcupine
.
Eat, she said to the Dahcotah; you are hungry.
But who can tell the fury that Mocassin Flower was in
when she saw that strange woman bringing her husband
food. Who are you, she cried, that are troubling
yourself about my husband? I know you well; you are
the `Bear-Woman.'
And if I am, said the Bear woman, do not the souls
of the bears enjoy forever the heaven of the Dahcotah?
Poor Chask! he could not prevent their quarrelling, so,
being very hungry, he soon disposed of what the Bear
woman
had brought him. When he had done eating, she
took the bark dishes. Come with me, she said; you
cannot live in the water, and I will take you to a beautiful
lodge, and we will be happy.
The Dahcotah turned to his wife, but she gave him no
encouragement to remain. Well, said he, I always
loved adventures, and I will go and seek some more.
The new wife was not half so pretty as the old one.
Then she was so wilful, and ordered him aboutas if
women
were anything but dogs in comparison with a
Dahcotah
warrior. Yes, he who had scorned the Dahcotah girls,
as they smiled upon him, was now the slave of a
bear-woman
;
but there was one comfortthere were no
warriors
to laugh at him.
For a while they got on well enough. His wife had
twin childrenone was a fine young Dahcotah, and the
other was a smart active little bear, and it was very
amusing
to see them play together. But in all their fights the
young Dahcotah had the advantage; though the little bear
would roll and tumble, and stick his claws into the
Dahcotah
,
yet it always ended by the little bear's capering off
and roaring after his mother. Perhaps this was the
reason
,
but for some reason or other the mother did not seem
contented and happy. One morning she woke up very
early, and while telling her husband that she had a bad
dream, the dog commenced barking outside the lodge.
What can be the matter? said Chask.
Oh! said the woman, I know; there is a hunter out
there who wants to kill me, but I am not afraid.
So saying, she put her head out of the door, which the
hunter seeing, shot his arrow; but instead of hurting her,
the arrow fell to the ground, and the bear-woman catching
up her little child, ran away and was soon out of sight.
Ha! said Chaske, I had better have married a
Dahcotah
girl, for they do not run away from their husbands
except when another wife comes to take their place. But
I have been twice deserted. So saying, he took the little
Dahcotah in his arms, and followed his wife. Towards
evening he came up with her, but she did not seem glad to
see him. He asked her why she left him; she replied, I
want to live with my own people. Well, said the
Dahcotah
,
I will go with you. The woman consented, though
it was plain she did not want him; for she hated her
Dahcotah child, and would not look at him.
After travelling a few days, they approached a grove of
trees, which grew in a large circle. Do you see that nest
of trees? said the woman. There is the great village of
the bears. There are many young men there that loved
me, and they will hate you because I preferred you to
them. Take your boy, then, and return to your people.
But the Dahcotah feared not, and they approached the
village
of the bears.
There was a great commotion among the bears as they
discovered them. They were glad to see the young
bear-woman
back again, but they hated the Dahcotah, and
determined on his death. However, they received him
hospitably, conducted him and his wife to a large lodge,
gave them food, and the tired travellers were soon asleep.
But the Dahcotah soon perceived he was among enemies,
and he kept a careful look out upon them. The little
Dahcotah was always quarrelling with the young bears;
and on one occasion, being pretty hungry, a cub annoying
him at the time very much, he deliberately shot the cub
with his bow and arrow, and ate him up. This aroused
the vengeance of the bears; they had a consultation among
themselves, and swore they would kill both father and son.
It would be impossible to tell of the troubles of Chask.
His wife, he could see, loved one of the bears, and was
anxious for his own death; but whenever he contended
with the bears he came off victor. Whether in running a
foot race, or shooting with a bow and arrow, or whatever it
might be, he always won the prize, and this made his
enemies
still more venomous.
Four years had now passed since Chask left his native
village, and nothing had ever been heard of him. But at
length the wanderer returned.
But who would have recognized, in the crest-fallen,
melancholy-looking
Indian, the gay warrior that had left home
but a few years before? The little boy that held his hand
was cheerful enough, and seemed to recognize acquaintances,
instead of looking for the first time on the faces of his
father's friends.
How did the young girls laugh when he told of the
desertion of his first wife; but when he continued his story,
and told them of the faithlessness of the bear woman also,
you heard nothing but shouts of derision. Was it not a
triumph for the Dahcotah women? How had he scorned
them before he went away! Did he not say that women
were only dogs, or worse than dogs?
But there was one among his old acquaintances who
would not join in the laughter. As she looked on the
care-worn countenance of the warrior, she would fain have
offered to put new mocassins upon his feet, and bring him
food. But she dared not subject herself to the ridicule of
her companionsthough as night came on, she sought him
when there was no one to heed her.
Chask, she calledand the Dahcotah turned hastily
towards her, attracted by the kindness of her voicethere
are no women who love as the Dahcotah women. I would
have gone to the ends of the earth with you, but you
despised
me. You have come back, and are laughed at. Care
has broken your spirit, or you would not submit to the
sneers of your old friends, and the contempt of those who
once feared you. I will be your wife, and, mingling again
in the feasts and customs of your race, you will soon be the
bold and fearless warrior that you were when you left us.
And her words were true; for the Indians soon learned
that they were not at liberty to talk to Chask of his
wanderings
.
He never spoke of his former wives, except to
compare them with his present, who was as faithful and
obedient as they were false and troublesome. And he
found, says Chequered Cloud, that there was no land
like the Dahcotah's, no river like the Father of waters, and
no happiness like that of following the deer across the open
prairies, or of listening, in the long summer days, to the
wisdom of the medicine men.
And she who had loved him in his youth, and wept for him
in his absence, now lies by his sidefor Chask has taken
another long journey. Death has touched him, but not
lightly, and pointed to the path which leads to the Land of
Spiritsand he did not go alone; for her life closed with his,
and together their spirits watch over the mortal frames that
they once tenanted.
Look at the white woman's life, said Chequered Cloud,
as she concluded the story of Chask, and then at the
Dahcotah's. You sleep on a soft bed, while the Dahcotah
woman lays her head upon the ground, with only her
blanket for a covering; when you are hungry you eat, but
for days has the Dahcotah woman wanted for food, and
there was none to give it. Your children are happy, and
fear nothing; ours have crouched in the earth at night,
when the whoop and yell of the Chippeways sent terror to
their young hearts, and trembling to their tender limbs.
And when the fire-water of the white man has maddened
the senses of the Dahcotah, so that the blow of his war club
falls upon his wife instead of his enemy, even then the
Dahcotah woman must live and suffer on. But,
Chequered
Cloud, the spirit of the Dahcotah watches over the
body which remains on earth. Did you not say the soul
went to the house of spirits?
The Dahcotah has four souls, replied the old woman;
one wanders about the earth, and requires food; another
protects the body; the third goes to the Land of Spirits,
while the fourth forever hovers around his native village.
I wish, said I, that you would believe in the God of
the white people. You would then learn that there is but
one soul, and that that soul will be rewarded for the good it
has done in this life, or punished for the evil.
The Great Spirit, she replied, is the God of the
Dahcotah. He made all things but thunder and wild rice.
When we do wrong we are punished in this world. If we
do not live up to the laws of our forefathers, the spirits of
the dead will punish us. We must keep up the customs
of our tribe. If we are afraid that the thunder will strike
us, we dance in honor of it, and destroy its power. Our
great medicine feasts are given in honor of our sacred
medicine
,
which will not only heal the sick, but will preserve us
in danger; and we make feasts for the dead.
Our children are taught to do right. They are not
to injure one who has not harmed them; but where is the
Dahcotah who will not rejoice as he takes the life of his
enemy?
But, said I, you honor the thunder, and yet it
strikes you. What is the thunder, and where does it come
from?
Thunder is a large bird, flying through the air; its
bright tracks are seen in the heavens, before you hear the
clapping of its wings. But it is the young ones who do
the mischief. The parent bird would not hurt a Dahcotah.
Long ago a thunder bird fell dead from the heavens; and
our fathers saw it as it lay not far from Little Crow's
village.
It had a face like a Dahcotah warrior, with a nose like
an eagle's bill. Its body was long and slender, its wings
were large, and on them was painted the lightning. Our
warriors were once out hunting in the winter, when a
terrible
storm came on, and a large thunder bird descended to
the earth, wearing snow-shoes; he took but a few steps
and then rose up, leaving his tracks in the snow. That
winter our hunters killed many bears.
TAH-WE-CHU-KIN;
THE WIFE.
In
February, 1837, a party of Dahcotahs (Warpetonian)
fell in with Hole-in-the-Day, and his band. When
Chippeways
and Dahcotahs meet there is generally bloodshed;
and, however highly Hole-in-the-Day may be esteemed as
a warrior, it is certain that he showed great treachery
towards the Dahcotahs on many occasions.
Now they met for peaceable purposes. Hole-in-the-Day
wished permission to hunt on the Dahcotah lands without
danger from the tomahawk of his enemies. He proposed
to pay them certain articles, which he should receive from
the United States Government when he drew his
annuities
,
as a return for the privilege he demanded.
The Dahcotahs and Chippeways were seated together.
They had smoked the pipe of peace. The snow had
drifted, and lay piled in masses behind them, contrasting
its whiteness with their dark countenances and their gay
ornaments and clothing. For some years there had been
peace between these two tribes; hating each other, as they
did, they had managed to live without shedding each
other's blood.
Hole-in-the-Day was the master spirit among the
Chippeways
.
9
He was the greatest hunter and warrior in the
nation; he had won the admiration of his people, and they
had made him chief. His word was law to them; he
stood firmly on the height to which he had elevated
himself
.
He laid aside his pipe and arose. His iron frame
seemed not to feel the keen wind that was shaking the
feathers in the heads of the many warriors who fixed their
eyes upon him.
He addressed the Dahcotah warriors. All nations,
said he, as yet continue the practice of war, but as for
me, I now abandon it. I hold firmly the hand of the
Americans. If you, in future, strike me twice or even
three times, I will pass over and not revenge it. If wars
should continue, you and I will not take part in them.
You shall not fight, neither will I. There shall be no
more war in that part of the country lying between Pine
Island and the place called Hanwi catintipi, (They shot
them in the night). Over this extent of country we will
hold the pipe firmly. You shall hold it by the bowl, and
we will hold it by the stem. The pipe shall be in your
keeping. So saying, Hole-in-the-Day advanced and
presented
the Dahcotahs with a pipe.
After a moment he continued his speech. On account
of your misconduct, we did desire your death, and if you
had met us last winter to treat of peace, however great
your numbers, we should have killed you all. White men
had ordered us to do so, and we should have done it;
because the Mendewakantonwans had informed us that
you intended by treachery to kill us.
The Dahcotah chief then replied to him saying, that the
Dahcotahs were willing that the Chippeways should hunt
on their lands to the borders of the prairie, but that they
should not enter the prairie. The Chippeways then agreed
to pay them a large quantity of sugar, a keg of powder,
and a quantity of lead and tobacco.
After their engagement was concluded, Hole-in-the-Day
rose again and said, In the name of the Great Spirit,
this peace shall be forever, and, turning to Wandiokiya
(the Man that talks to the Eagle), a Dahcotah who had been
taught by the missionaries to read and write, requested
him to commit to writing the agreement which had just
been made.
Wandiokiya did so, and has since forwarded the writing
to the Rev. Mr. P, who resides near Fort Snelling.
The Dahcotah adds, We have now learned that the
object of Hole-in-the-Day was to deceive and kill us; and
he and his people have done so, showing that they neither
fear God nor the chief of the American people.
In this manner they deceived us, deceived us in the
name of the Gods.
Hole-in-the-Day led the band of murderers.
Wandiokiya
.
CHAPTER II.
We
shall see how faithfully the Chippeway chief kept
the treaty that he had called upon the Great Spirit to
witness. There has been great diversity of opinion
concerning
Hole-in-the-Day. The Chippeways and
Dahcotahs
all feared him. Some of the white people who
knew him admired, while others detested his character.
He was certainly, what all the Chippeways have been,
a friend of the white people, and equally an enemy to the
Dahcotahs. He encouraged all attempts that were made
towards the civilization of his people; he tried to induce
them to cultivate the ground; indeed, he sometimes
assumed the duties which among savages are supposed to
belong exclusively to females, and has been frequently
seen to work in his garden. Had it been possible, he
would even have forced the Chippeways to civilization.
He had three wivesall sisters. He was fond of them,
but if they irritated him, by disputing among themselves,
or neglecting any thing which he found necessary to his
comfort, he was very violent. Blows were the only
arguments
he used on such occasions.
The present chief is one of his children; several of them
died young, and their father felt their loss most keenly.
Grave and stoical as was his deportment, his feelings were
very strong, and not easily controlled.
He was a man of deep thought, and of great ambition.
The latter passion was gratified to as great a degree as
was possible. Loved by his tribe, feared by his enemies,
respected and well treated by the white people, what more
could a savage ask? Among the Indians he was a great
man, but he was truly great in cunning and deceit.
On this occasion, however, the Dahcotahs had perfect
confidence in him, and it was on the first day of April, in
the same year, that they arrived at the place appointed to
meet the Chippeways, near the east branch of the
Chippeway
river, about thirty miles northeast of Lac qui parle.
The women raised the teepees, six in number, and prepared
the scanty portion of food for their families. Here they
remained, until their patience was almost exhausted,
constantly
expecting Hole-in-the-Day to appear; but day after
day passed, and they were still disappointed. Now and
then the reports of fire-arms were heard near them, but
still the Chippeways did not visit the camp of the Dahcotahs.
Famine now showed itself among them. They had
neither
corn nor flour. Had the wild ducks flown over their
heads in clouds, there was but little powder and shot to
kill thembut there were few to be seen. Some of the
Indians proposed moving their camp where game was more
plentywhere they might see deer, and use their bows and
arrows to some purpose. But others said, if they were not
at the appointed place of meeting, they would violate the
contract, and lose their claim to the articles that
Hole-in-the-day
had promised to deliver to them.
It was finally concluded that the party should divide, one
half moving off in search of food, the other half remaining
where they were, in hopes that Hole-in-the-Day would make
his appearance.
Three teepees then remained, and they were occupied by
seventeen persons, all women and children excepting four.
It was drawing on towards evening, when the Dahtocahs
heard the sound of footsteps, and their satisfaction was very
great, when they perceived the Chippeway chief approach,
accompanied by ten of his men. These men had been
present at the council of peace in February.
One of the Dahcotahs, named Red Face, had left his
family in the morning, to attend to the traps he had set for
beaver. He had not returned when the Chippeways arrived.
His two wives were with the Dahcotahs who received the
Chippeways. One of these women had two children; the
other was quite young, and, according to Indian ideas,
beautiful too. She was the favorite wife.
The Dahcotahs received the Chippeways with real
pleasure
,
in full faith and confidence. Hole-in-the-Day has
been long in coming, said one of the Dahcotahs; his
friends have wished to smoke the pipe of peace with him,
but some of them have left us to seek for food. We
welcome
you, and will eat together, and our friendship shall
last forever. Hole-in-the-Day met his advances with every
appearance of cordiality. One thing, however, the
Dahcotahs
observed, that the Chippeways did not fire their guns
off when they arrived, which is done by Indians when they
make a visit of friendship.
The party passed the evening in conversation. All the
provisions of the Dahcotahs were called in requisition to
feast the Chippeways. After eating, the pipe went round
again, and at a late hour they laid down to sleep, the
Chippeways
dividing their party, several in each teepee.
Hole-in-the-day lay down by the side of his host, so
motionless you would have thought that sleep had paralyzed
his limbs and senses; his regular breathing intimates a
heart at peace with himself and his foes; but that heart
was beating fast, for in a moment he raises himself
cautiously
,
gazes and smiles too upon the sleeping Dahcotah
beside him. He gives the appointed signal, and
instantaneously
plunges his knife into the heart of the trusting
Dahcotah. It was child's play afterwards to quiet the
shrill shrieks of the terrified wife. A moment more, and
she and her child lay side by side, never to awake again.
For a short time broken and shrill cries were heard from
the other teepees, but they were soon over. The two wives
of Red Face had laid down without a fear, though their
protector was absent. The elder of the two clasped her
children to her heart, consoled, in a measure, while listening
to their calm breathing, for the loss of the love of her
husband
.
She knew that the affections of a husband might
vary, but the tie between mother and child is indissoluble.
The young wife wondered that Red Face was not by
her side. But he would return to-morrow, and her
welcome
would be all the greeting that he would wish for.
While her thoughts are assuming the form of dreams, she
sees the fatal weapon pointed at the mother and child.
The bullet that kills the sleeping infant on its mother's
breast, wounds the mother also; but she flies in horror,
though not soon enough to escape the sight of her other
pleading child, her warrior son, vainly clasping his hands in
entreaty to the savage, who, with another blow from his
tomahawk, puts an end to his sufferings. The wretched
mother escapes, for Hole-in-the-Day enters the teepee,
and takes prisoner the younger wife. She escapes a
present deathwhat will be her future fate?
CHAPTER III.
The
elder of the two wives escaped from the murderous
Chippeways. Again and again, in the darkness of the
night, she turns back to flee from her deadly foe, but far
more from the picture of her children, murdered before her
eyes. She knew the direction in which the Dahcotahs who
had left the party had encamped, and she directed her steps
to find them. One would think she would have asked
death from her enemiesher husband loved her no more,
her children were deadbut she clung to life.
She reached the teepees at last, and hastened to tell of
her sorrows, and of the treachery of Hole-in-the-Day. For a
moment the utmost consternation prevailed among the
Indians, but revenge was the second thought, and rapidly
were their preparations made to seek the scene of the
murder
.
The distance was accomplished in a short time, and
the desolation lay before their eyes.
The fires in the teepees were not gone out; the smoke
was ascending to the heavens; while the voices of the
murdered
Dahcotahs seemed to call upon their relatives for
revenge. There lay the warriors, who, brave as
Hole-in-the-Day
,
had laid aside their weapons, and reposed on the
faith of their enemies, their strong limbs powerless, their
faces turned towards the light, which fell upon their glassy
eyes. See the mother, as she bends over the bodies of her
innocent children!her boy, who walked so proudly, and
said he would kill deer for his mother; her infant, whose
life had been taken, as it were, from her very heart. She
strains them to her bosom, but the head leans not towards
her, and the arms are stiff in death.
Red Face has asked for his young wife. She is alive,
but, far worse than death, she is a prisoner to the
Chippeways
.
His children are dead before his eyes, and their
mother, always obedient and attentive, does not hear him
when he speaks to her. The remains of the feast are
scattered
on the ground; the pipe of peace lies broken among
them.
In the course of the morning the Rev. Mr.,
missionary
among the Dahcotahs, with the assistance of an
Indian named Round Wind, collected the bodies and buried
them.
Of the fourteen persons who were in the three teepees,
no more than four escaped; two young men and two
women.
The Chippeways fled as quickly as possible from the
country of the Dahcotahs, with their prisonersad change
for her. A favorite wife finds herself in the power of ten
warriors, the enemies of her people. The cries of her
murdered
friends are yet sounding in her ears; and she knows
not how soon their fate may be hers. Every step of the
weary journey she pursues, takes her farther from her
country
.
She dares not weep, she cannot understand the
language
of her enemies, but she understands their looks, and
knows she must obey them. She wishes they would take
her life; she would take it herself, but she is watched, and
it is impossible.
She sees by their angry gestures and their occasional
looks towards her, that she is the subject of their dispute,
until the chief raises his eyes and speaks to the
Chippeways
and
the difference ceases.
At length her journey is at an end. They arrive at the
village, and Hole-in-the-Day and his warriors are received
with manifestations of delight. They welcomed him as if
he had performed a deed of valor instead of one of
cowardice
.
The women gaze alternately upon the scalps and upon
9*
the prisoner. She, poor girl, is calm now; there is but
one thought that makes her tired limbs shake with terror.
She sees with a woman's quickness that there is no female
among those who are looking at her as beautiful as she is.
It may be that she may be required to light the household
fires for one of her enemies. She sees the admiring
countenance
of one of the young Chippeway warriors fixed
upon her; worn out with fatigue, she cannot support the
wretched thought. For a while she is insensible even to
her sorrows.
On recovering, food is given her, and she tries to eat.
Nothing but death can relieve her. Where are the spirits
of the rocks and rivers of her land? Have they forgotten
her too?
Hole-in-the-Day took her to his teepee. She was his
prisoner, he chose to adopt her, and treated her with every
kindness. He ordered his men not to take her life; she
was to be as safe in his teepee as if she were his wife or
child.
For a few days she is allowed to remain quiet; but at
length she is brought out to be present at a council where
her fate was to be decided.
Hole-in-the-Day took his place in the council, and
ordered
the prisoner to be placed near him. Her pale and
resigned countenance was a contrast to the angry and
excited
faces that lowered upon her; but the chief looked
unconcerned
as to the event. However his warriors might
contend, the result of the council would depend upon him;
his unbounded influence always prevailed.
After several speeches had been made, Stormy Wind
rose and addressed the chief. His opinion was that the
prisoner should suffer death. The Dahcotahs had always
been enemies, and it was the glory of the Chippeways to
take the lives of those they hated. His chief had taken
the prisoner to his teepee; she was safe; she was a
member
of his familywho would harm her there? but now
they were in council to decide upon her fate. He was an
old man, had seen many wintershe had often travelled
far and suffered much to take the life of an enemy; and
here, where there is one in their power, should they lose the
opportunity of revenge? She was but a woman, but the
Dahcotah blood flowed in her veins. She was not fit to
live. The Eagle spoke next. He was glad that the
chief had taken the prisoner to his teepeeit had been
always
customary occasionally to adopt a prisoner, and the
chief did well to keep up the customs of their tribe. The
prisoner was young, she could be taught to love the
Chippeway
nation; the white people did not murder their
prisoners
;
the Chippeways were the friends of the white
people
;
let them do as they did, be kind to the prisoner and
spare her life. The Eagle would marry the Dahcotah girl;
he would teach her to speak the language of her adopted
tribe; she should make his mocassins, and her children
would be Chippeways. Let the chief tell the Eagle to
take the girl home to his teepee.
The Eagle's speech created an excitement. The Indians
rose one after the other, insisting upon the death of their
prisoner. One or two seconded the Eagle's motion to keep
her among them, but the voices of the others prevailed.
The prisoner saw by the faces of the savages what their
words portended. When the Eagle rose to speak, she
recognized
the warrior whose looks had frightened her; she
knew he was pleading for her life too; but the memory of
her husband took away the fear of death. Death with a
thousand terrors, rather than live a wife, a slave to the
Chippeways! The angry Chippeways are silenced, for
their chief addresses them in a voice of thunder; every
voice is hushed, every countenance is respectfully turned
towards the leader, whose words are to decide the fate of
the unhappy woman before them.
Where is the warrior that will not listen to the words
of his chief? my voice is loud and you shall hear. I
have taken a Dahcotah woman prisoner; I have chosen to
spare her life; she has lived in my teepee; she is one of
my family; you have assembled in council to-day to
decide
her fateI have decided it. When I took her to my
teepee, she became as my child or as the child of my friend.
You
shall not take her life, nor shall
you
marry her. She
is my prisonershe shall remain in my teepee.
Seeing some motion of discontent among those who
wished to take her life, he continued, while his eyes shot
fire and his broad chest heaved with anger:
Come then and take her life. Let me see the brave
warrior who will take the life of my prisoner? Come! she
is here; why do you not raise your tomahawks? It is
easy to take a woman's scalp.
Not a warrior moves. The prisoner looks at the chief
and at his warriors. Hole-in-the-Day leads her from the
council and points to his teepee, which is again her home,
and where she is as safe as she would be in her husband's
teepee, by the banks of the Mine So-to.
CHAPTER IV.
While
the wife of Red Face lived from day to day in
suspense as to her fate, her husband made every effort for
her recovery. Knowing that she was still alive, he could
not give up the hope of seeing her again. Accordingly, the
facts were made known at Fort Snelling, and the
Chippeway
interpreter was sent up to Hole-in-the-Day's village,
with an order from the government to bring her down.
She had been expected for some time, when an
excitement
among a number of old squaws, who were standing
outside of the gate of the fort, showed that something
unusual
was occasioning expressions of pleasure; and as the
wife of Red Face advanced towards the house of the
interpreter
,
their gratification was raised to the utmost.
Red Face and some of the Dahcotah warriors were soon
there tooand the long separated husband and wife were
again united.
But whatever they might have felt on the occasion of
meeting again, they showed but little joy. Red Face
entered
the room where were assembled the Indians and the
officers of the garrison. He shook hands with the officers
and with the interpreter, and, without looking at his wife,
took his seat with the other Dahcotahs.
But her composure soon left her. When she saw him
enter, the blood mantled in her pale cheekpale with long
anxiety and recent fatigue. She listened while the
Dahcotahs
talked with the agent and the commanding officer;
and at last, as if her feelings could not longer be restrained,
she arose, crossed the room, and took her seat at his feet!
The chief Hole-in-the-Day has been dead some years,
and, in one of the public prints, it was stated that he was
thrown from his carriage and killed. This was a genteel
mode of dying, which cannot, with truth, be attributed to
him.
He always deplored the habit of drinking, to which the
Indians are so much addicted. In his latter years, however,
he could not withstand the temptation; and, on one
occasion
,
being exceedingly drunk, he was put into an
oxcart
,
and being rather restive, was thrown out, and the
cart wheel went over him.
Thus died Hole-in-the-Dayone of the most noted
Indians
of the present day; and his eldest son reigns in his
stead.
EXPLANATION OF THE DRAWING.
1. The giant.
2. A frog that the giant uses for an arrow-point.
3. A large bird that that the giant keeps in his court.
4. Another bird.
5. An ornament over the door leading into the court.
6. An ornament over a door.
7. Part of court ornamented with down.
8. Part of do. do. with red down.
9. A bear; 10, a deer; 11, an elk; 12, a buffalo.
13, 14. Incense-offering.
15. A rattle of deer's claws, used when singing.
16. A long flute or whistle.
17, 18, 19, 20. Are meteors that the giant sends out for his defence, or to
protect him from invasion.
21, 22, 23, 24. The giant surrounded with lightnings, with which he kills all
kinds of animals that molest him.
25. Red down in small bunches fastened to the railing of the court.
26. The same. One of these bunches of red down disappears every time
an animal is found dead inside the court.
27, 28. Touchwood, and a large fungus that grows on trees.These are
eaten by any animal that enters the court, and this food causes their death.
29. A streak of lightning going from the giant's hat.
30. Giant's head and hat. 31. His bow and arrow.
WAH-ZEE-YAH;
ANOTHER OF THE
GIANT GODS OF THE DAHCOTAHS.
Wah-zee-yah
had a son who was killed by Etokah
Wachastah, Man of the South. Wah-zee-yah is the god
of the winter, and Etokah Wachastah is the god of the
summer. When there is a cold spell early in the warm
weather, the Dahcotahs say Wah-zee-yah is looking back.
When the son of Wah-zee-yah was killed, there were six
on each side; the Beings of the south were too strong for
those of the north, and conquered them. When the battle
was over, a fox was seen running off with one of the Beings
of the north.
These gods of the Dahcotahs are said to be inferior to
the Great Spirit; but if an Indian wants to perform a
deed of valor, he prays to Haokah the Giant. When they
are in trouble, or in fear of anything, they pray to the
Great Spirit. You frequently see a pole with a deer-skin,
or a blanket hung to it; these are offerings made to the
Great Spirit, to propitiate him. White Dog, who lives
near Fort Snelling, says he has often prayed to the Great
Spirit to keep him from sin, and to enable him and his
family to do right. When he wishes to make an offering
to the Great Spirit, he takes a scarlet blanket, and paints
a circle of blue in the centre, (blue is an emblem of peace,)
and puts ten bells, or silver brooches to it. This offering
costs him $20. Christians are too apt to give less liberally
to the true God. When White Dog goes to war, he makes
this offering.
White Dog says he never saw the giant, but that Iron
Members, who died last summer, saw one of the giants
several years ago.
Iron Members was going hunting, and when he was
near Shah-co-pee's village, he met the Giant. He wore a
three-cornered hat, and one side was bright as the sun; so
bright one could not look upon it; and he had a crooked
thing upon his shoulder.
Iron Members was on a hill; near which was a deep
ravine, when suddenly his eye rested upon something so
bright that it pained him to look at it. He looked down
the ravine and there stood the Giant. Notwithstanding
his position, his head reached to the top of the trees. The
Giant was going northwards, and did not notice the Indian
or stop; he says he watched the Giant; and, as he went
forward, the trees and bushes seemed to make way for him.
The visit was one of good luck, the Indians say, for there
was excellent hunting that season.
The Dahcotahs believe firmly the story of Iron
Members
.
He was one of their wisest men. He was a great
warrior and knew how to kill his enemies. White Dog
says that at night, when they were on a war party, Iron
Members would extinguish all the fires of the Dahcotahs,
and then direct his men where to find the Chippeways.
He would take a spoonful of sugar, and the same quantity
of whiskey, and make an offering to the spirits of their
enemies; he would sing to them, and charm them so that
they would come up so close to him that he would knock
them on the head with his rattle, and kill them. These
spirits approach in the form of a bear. After this is done,
they soon find their enemies and conquer them.
The Dahcotahs think their medicine possesses
supernatural
powers; they burn incense,leaves of the white
cedar tree,in order to destroy the supernatural powers of
a person who dislikes them. They consider the burning
of incense a preventive of evil, and believe it wards off
danger from lightning. They say that the cedar tree is
wahkun (spiritual) and on that account they burn its
leaves to ward off danger. The temple of Solomon was
built of cedar.
Unktahe, the god of the waters, is much reverenced by
the Dahcotahs. Morgan's bluff, near Fort Snelling, is
called God's house by the Dahcotahs; they say it is
the residence of Unktahe, and under the hill is a
subterranean
passage, through which they say the water-god
passes when he enters the St. Peter's. He is said to be as
large as a white man's house.
Near Lac qui parle is a hill called the Giant's house.
On one occasion the Rev. Mr.  was walking with
a Dahcotah, and as they approached this hill the Dahcotah
exclaimed, Do you not see him, there he is. And
although no one else saw the Giant, he persisted in
watching him for a few moments as he passed over the
hill.
Near Lac qui parle, is living an old Dahcotah woman of
a singular appearance. Her face is very black, and her
hair singed and faded-looking. She was asked by a
stranger to account for her singular appearance. I
dreamed of the Giant, she said; and I was frightened
when I woke; and I told my husband that I would give a
dance to the Giant to propitiate him; but my husband
said that I was not able to go through the Giant's dance;
that I would only fail, and bring disgrace upon him and
all my family. The Giant was very angry with me, and
punished me by burning my face black, and my hair as
you see it. Her husband might well fear that she would
not be able to perform this dance.
It would be impossible to give any idea of the number
of the gods of the Dahcotahs. All nature is animated
with them; every mountain, every tree, is worshipped, as
among the Greeks of old, and again, like the Egyptians,
the commonest animals are the objects of their adoration.
May the time soon come when they will acknowledge
but one God, the Creator of the Earth and Heaven, the
Sovereign of the universe!
STORMS IN LIFE AND NATURE;
UNKTAHE AND THE THUNDER BIRD.
Ever, says Checkered Cloud, will Unktahe, the god
of the waters, and Wahkeon, (Thunder,) do battle against
each other. Sometimes the thunder birds are conquerors
often the god of the waters chases his enemies back to
the distant clouds.
Many times, too, will the daughters of the nation go
into the pathless prairies to weep; it is their custom; and
while there is sickness, and want, and death, so long will
they leave the haunts of men to weep where none but the
Great Spirit may witness their tears. It is only, they
believe
,
in the City of spirits, that the sorrows of Dahcotah
women will ceasethere, will their tears be dried forever.
Many winters have passed away since Harpstenah brought
the dead body of her husband to his native village to be
buried; my authority is the medicine woman, whose
lodge, for many years, was to be seen on the banks of Lake
Calhoun.
This village is now deserted. The remains of a few
houses are to be seen, and the broken ground in which were
planted the poles of their teepees. Silence reigns where
the merry laugh of the villagers often met in chorus. The
scene of the feast and dance is now covered with long
grass, but desolation saddens all its green.
CHAPTER I.
Dark
and heavy clouds hung over the village of Sleepy
Eyes, one of the chiefs of the Sioux. The thunder birds
flapped their wings angrily as they flew along, and where
they hovered over the Father of many waters, the waves
rose up, and heaved to and fro. Unktahe was eager to
fight against his ancient enemies; for as the storm spirits
shrieked wildly, the waters tossed above each other; the
large forest trees were uptorn from their roots, and fell
over into the turbid waters, where they lay powerless amid
the scene of strife; and while the vivid lightning pierced
the darkness, peal after peal was echoed by the
neighboring
hills.
One human figure was seen outside the many teepees
that rose side by side in the village. Sleepy Eyes alone
dared to stand and gaze upon the tempest which was
triumphing
over all the powers of nature. As the lightning
fell upon the tall form of the chief, he turned his keen
glance from the swift-flying clouds to the waters, where
dwelt the god whose anger he had ever been taught to fear.
He longed, though trembling, to see the countenance of
the being whose appearance is the sure warning of calamity.
His superstitious fears told him to turn, lest the deity
should rise before him; while his native courage, and love
of the marvellous, chained him to the spot.
The storm raged wilder and louderthe driving wind
scattered the hail around him, and at length the chief raised
the door of his teepee, and joined his frightened household.
Trembling and crouching to the ground were the mothers
and children, as the teepee shook from the force of the wind.
The young children hid their faces close against their
mothers breasts. Every head was covered, to avoid the
streaked lightning as it glanced over the bent and terrified
forms, that seemed to cling to the earth for protection.
At the end of the village, almost on the edge of the high
bluff that towered above the river, rose a teepee, smaller
than the rest. The open door revealed the wasted form of
Harpstenah, an aged woman.
Aged, but not with years! Evil had been the days of
her pilgrimage.
The fire that had burned in the wigwam was all gone
out, the dead ashes lay in the centre, ever and anon
scattered
by the wind over the wretched household articles
that lay around. Gone out, too, were the flames that once
lighted with happiness the heart of Harpstenah.
The sorrows of earth, more pitiless than the winds of
heaven, had scattered forever the hopes that had made her
a being of light and life. The head that lies on the earth
was once pillowed on the breast of the lover of her youth.
The arm that is heavily thrown from her once clasped his
children to her heart.
What if the rain pours in upon her, or the driving wind
and hail scatter her wild locks? She feels it not. Life is
there, but the consciousness of life is gone forever.
A heavier cloud hangs about her heart than that which
darkens nature. She fears not the thunder, nor sees the
angry lightning. She has laid upon the scaffold her
youngest
son, the last of the many ties that bound her to earth.
One week before, her son entered the wigwam. He was
not alone; his comrade, The Hail that Strikes,
accompanied
him.
Harpstenah had been tanning deer-skin near her door.
She had planted two poles firmly in the ground, and on
them she had stretched the deer-skin. With an iron
instrument
she constantly scraped the skin, throwing water
upon it. She had smoked it too, and now it was ready to
make into mocassins or leggins. She had determined,
while she was tanning the deer-skin, how she would
embroider
them. They should be richer and handsomer even
than those of their chief's son; nay, gayer than those worn
by the chief himself. She had beads and stained porcupine
quills; all were ready for her to sew.
The vension for the evening meal was cooked and placed
in a wooden bowl before the fire, when the two young men
entered.
The son hardly noticed his mother's greeting, as he
invited
his friend to partake of the venison. After eating, he
filled his pipe, smoked, and offered it to the other. They
seemed inclined to waste but little time in talking, for the
pipe was put by, and they were about to leave the teepee,
when the son's steps were arrested by his mother's asking
him if he were going out again on a hunt. There is
food enough, she added, and I thought you would
remain
at home and prepare to join in the dance of the sun,
which will be celebrated to-morrow. You promised me to
do so, and a Dahcotah values his word.
The young man hesitated, for he loved his mother, and
he knew it would grieve her to be told the expedition upon
which he was going.
The eyes of his comrade flashed fire, and his lip curled
scornfully, as he turned towards the son of Harpstenah.
Are you afraid to tell your mother the truth, he said,
or do you fear the `long knives'
[15]
[15]
Officers and soldiers are called long knives among the Sioux, from their
wearing swords.
will carry you a
prisoner
to their fort?
I
will tell you where we are going,
he added. The Dahcotahs have bought us whiskey, and
we are going to meet them and help bring it up. And
now cryyou are a womanbut it is time for us to be
gone.
The son lingeredhe could not bear to see his mother's
tears. He knew the sorrows she had endured, he knew
too (for she had often assured him) that should harm come
to him she would not survive it. The knife she carried in
her belt was ready to do its deadly work. She implored
him to stay, calling to his mind the deaths of his father
and of his murdered brothers; she bade him remember the
tears they had shed together, and the promises he had often
made, never to add to the trials she had endured.
It was all in vain; for his friend, impatient to be gone,
laughed at him for listening to the words of his mother.
Is not a woman a dog? he said. Do you intend to
stay all night to hear your mother talk? If so, tell me,
that I may seek another comradeone who fears neither a
white man nor a woman.
10
This appeal had its effect, for the young men left the
teepee together. They were soon out of sight, while
Harpstenah
sat weeping, and swaying her body to and fro,
lamenting
the hour she was born. There is no sorrow in
the land of spirits, she cried; oh! that I were dead!
The party left the village that night to procure the
whiskey
.
They were careful to keep watch for the Chippeways,
so easy would it be for their enemies to spring up from
behind
a tree, or to be concealed among the bushes and long
grass that skirted the open prairies. Day and night they
were on their guard; the chirping of the small bird by
day, as well as the hooting of an owl by nighteither
might be the feigned voice of a tomahawked enemy. And
as they approached St. Anthony's Falls, they had still
another
cause for caution. Here their friends were to meet
them with the fire water. Here, too, they might see the
soldiers from Fort Snelling, who would snatch the
untasted
prize from their lips, and carry them prisoners to
the forta disgrace that would cling to them forever.
Concealed under a rock, they found the kegs of liquor,
and, while placing them in their canoes, they were joined
by the Indians who had been keeping guard over it, and at
the same time watching for the soldiers.
In a few hours they were relieved of their fears. The
flag that waved from the tower at Fort Snelling, had been
long out of sight. They kept their canoes side by side,
passing away the time in conversation.
The women who were paddling felt no fatigue. They
knew that at night they were to have a feast. Already
the fires of the maddening drink had made the blood in
their dull veins course quickly. They anticipated the
excitement
that would make them forget they had ever been
cold or hungry; and bring to them bright dreams of that
world where sorrow is unknown.
We must be far on our journey to-night, said the
Rattler; the long knives are ever on the watch for
Dahcotahs
with whiskey.
The laws of the white people are very just, said an
old man of the party; they let their people live near us
and sell us whiskey, they take our furs from us, and get
much money.
They
have the right to bring their liquor
near us, and sell it, but if
we
buy it we are punished. When
I was young, he added, bitterly, the Dahcotahs were
free; they went and came as they chose. There were no
soldiers sent to our villages to frighten our women and
children, and to take our young men prisoners. The
Dahcotahs
are all women nowthere are no warriors among
them, or they would not submit to the power of the long
knives.
We must submit to them, said the Rattler; it
would be in vain to attempt to contend with them. We
have learned that the long knives
can work in the night
.
A few nights ago, some young men belonging to the village
of Marpuah Wechastah, had been drinking. They knew
that the Chippeway interpreter was away, and that his
wife was alone. They went, like cowards as they were,
to frighten a woman. They yelled and sung, they beat
against her door, shouting and laughing when they found
she was afraid to come out. When they returned home it
was just day; they drank and slept till night, and then
they assembled, four young men in one teepee, to pass
the night in drinking.
The father of White Deer came to the teepee. `My
son,' said he, `it is better for you to stop drinking and go
away. You have an uncle among the Tetons, go and visit
him. You brought the fire water here, you frightened the
wife of the Interpreter, and for this trouble you will be
punished. Your father is old, save him the disgrace of
seeing his son a prisoner at the Fort.'
`Fear not, my father,' said the young man, `your son
will never be a prisoner. I wear a charm over my heart,
which will ever make me free as the wind. The
white
men cannot work in the night;
they are sleeping even
now. We will have a merry night, and when the sun is
high, and the long knives come to seek me, you may laugh
at them, and tell them to follow me to the country of the
Tetons.' The father left the teepee, and White Deer
struck the keg with his tomahawk. The fire water dulled
their senses, for they heard not their enemies until they
were upon them.
It was in the dead of nightall but the revellers slept
when the soldiers from the fort surrounded the village.
The mother of White Deer heard the barking of her dog.
She looked out of the door of her teepee. She saw nothing,
for it was dark; but she knew there was danger near.
Our warriors, roused from their sleep, determined to find
out the cause of the alarm; they were thrust back into
their teepees by the bayonets of the long knives, and the
voice of the Interpreter was heard, crying, `The first
Dahcotah
that leaves his lodge shall be shot.'
The soldiers found out from the old chief the teepee of
the revellers. The young men did not hear them as they
approached; they were drinking and shouting. White
Deer had raised the cup to his lips, when the soldier's grasp
was upon him. It was too late for him to fly.
There was an unopened keg of liquor in the teepee.
The soldiers struck it to pieces, and the fire water covered
the ground.
The hands of White Deer were bound with an iron
chain; he threw from him his clothes and his blanket.
He was a prisoner, and needed not the clothing of a
Dahcotah
,
born free.
The grey morning dawned as they entered the large
door of the fort. His old father soon followed him; he
offered to stay, himself, as a prisoner, if his young son
could be set free.
It is in vain, then, that we would contend with the
white man; they keep a watch over all our actions. They
work in the night
.
The long knives will ever triumph, when the medicine
men of our nation speak as you do, said Two Stars. I
have lived near them always, and have never been their
prisoner. I have suffered from cold in the winter, and have
never asked clothing, and from hunger, and have never
asked food. My wife has never stood at the gate to ask
bread, nor have my daughters adorned themselves to attract
the eyes of their young men. I will live and die on the
land of my forefathers, without asking a favor of an
enemy
.
They call themselves the friends of the Dahcotahs.
They are our friends when they want our lands or our furs.
They are our worst enemies; they have trampled us
under foot. We do not chase the deer on the prairies as
eagerly as they have hunted us down. They steal from us
our rights, and then gain us over by fair words. I hate
them; and had not our warriors turned women, and learned
to fear them, I would gladly climb their walls, and shout
the war cry in their ears. The Great Spirit has indeed
forsaken his children, when their warriors and wise men
talk of submission to their foes.
CHAPTER II.
Well
might Harpstenah sit in her lodge and weep.
The sorrows of her life passed in review before her. Yet
she was once the belle of an Indian village; no step so
light, no laugh so merry as hers. She possessed too, a
spirit and a firmness not often found among women.
She was by birth the third daughter, who is always
called Harpstenah among the Sioux. Her sisters were
married, and she had seen but fourteen summers when
old Cloudy Sky, the medicine man, came to her parents to
buy her for his wife.
They dared not refuse him, for they were afraid
to offend a medicine man, and a war chief besides.
Cloudy Sky was willing to pay them well for their child.
So she was told that her fate for life was determined upon.
Her promised bridegroom had seen the snows of eighty
winters.
It was a bright night in the moon for strawberries.
[16]
[16]
The month of June.
Harpstenah had wept herself to sleep, and she had reason
too, for her young companions had laughed at her, and told
her that she was to have for a husband an old man
without
a nose. And it was true, though Cloudy Sky could
once have boasted of a fine aquiline. He had been
drinking
freely, and picked a quarrel with one of his sworn
friends. After some preliminary blows, Cloudy Sky seized
his antagonist and cut his ear sadly, but in return he had
his nose bitten off.
She had wept the more when her mother told her that in
four days she was to go to the teepee of her husband. It
was in vain to contend. She lay down beside the fire;
deep sleep came upon her; she forgot the events of the
past day; for a time she ceased to think of the young
man she loved, and the old one she hated. In her dreams
she had travelled a long journey, and was seated on the
river shore, to rest her tired limbs. The red light of the
dying sun illumined the prairies, she could not have
endured its scorching rays, were it not for the sheltering
branches of the tree under which she had found a
resting-place
.
The waters of the river beat against her feet. She
would fain move, but something chained her to the spot.
She tried to call her mother, but her lips were sealed, and
her voice powerless. She would have turned her face from
the waters, but even this was impossible. Stronger and
stronger beat the waves, and then parted, revealing the
dreaded form of the fairy of the waters.
Harpstenah looked upon death as inevitable; she had
ever feared that terrible race of beings whose home was in
the waters. And now the fairy stood before her!
Why do you tremble maiden? Only the wicked need
fear the anger of the gods. You have never offended us,
nor the spirits of the dead. You have danced in the
scalp-dance
,
and have reverenced the customs of the Sioux.
You have shed many tears. You love Red Deer, and
your father has sold you to Cloudy Sky, the medicine
man. It is with you to marry the man you love, or the
one you hate.
If you know everything, sighed the girl, then you
must know that in four days I am to take my seat beside
Cloudy Sky in his wigwam. He has twice brought calico
and cloth, and laid them at the door of my father's
teepee.
You shall not marry Cloudy Sky, if you have a strong
heart, and fear nothing, replied the fairy. The spirits of
the water have determined on the death of Cloudy Sky.
He has already lived three times on earth. For many
years he wandered through the air with the sons of the
thunder bird; like them he was ever fighting against the
friends of Unktahe.
With his own hand he killed the son of that god, and
for that was he sent to earth to be a medicine man. But
long ago we have said that the time should come, when
we would destroy him from the earth. It is for you to
take his life when he sleeps. Can a Dahcotoh woman
want courage when she is to be forced to marry a man she
hates?
The waters closed over the fairy as he disappeared, and
the waves beat harder against Harpstenah's feet. She
awoke with the words echoing in her heart, Can a Sioux
woman want courage when she is to be forced to marry a
man she hates? The words of the fairy were wise and
true, thought the maiden. Our medicine men say that
the fairies of the water are all wieked; that they are ever
seeking to do harm to the Dahcotahs. My dream has
made my heart light. I will take the life of the war chief.
At the worst they can but take mine.
As she looked round the teepee, her eye rested upon the
faces of her parents. The bright moonlight had found its
way into the teepee. There lay her father, his haughty
countenance calm and subdued, for the image of death
had chased away the impression left on his features of a
fierce struggle with a hard life. How often had he warned
her of the danger of offending Cloudy Sky, that sickness,
famine, death itself, might be the result. Her mother too,
had wearied her with warnings. But she remembered her
dream, and with all a Sioux woman's faith in revelations,
she determined to let it influence her course.
Red Deer had often vowed to take the life of his rival,
though he knew it would have assuredly cost him his
own. The family of Cloudy Sky was a large one; there
were many who would esteem it a sacred duty to avenge
his death. Besides he would gain nothing by it, for the
parents of Harpstenah would never consent to her marriage
with the murderer of the war chief.
How often had Red Deer tried to induce the young girl
to leave the village, and return with him as his wife. Have
we not always loved each other, he said. When we were
children, you made me mocassins, and paddled the canoe
for me, and I brought the wild duck, which I shot while it
was flying, to you. You promised me to be my wife, when
I should be a great hunter, and had brought to you the
scalp of an enemy. I have kept my promise, but you have
broken yours.
10*
I know it, she replied; but I fear to keep my word.
They would kill you, and the spirits of my dead brothers
would haunt me for disobeying my parents. Cloudy Sky
says that if I do not marry him he will cast a spell upon
me; he says that the brightness would leave my eye, and
the color my cheek; that my step should be slow and weary,
and soon would I be laid in the earth beside my brothers.
The spirit that should watch beside my body would be
offended
for my sin in disobeying the counsel of the aged. You,
too, should die, he says, not by the tomahawk, as a warrior
should die, but by a lingering diseasefever should enter
your veins, your strength would soon be gone, you would
no longer be able to defend yourself from your enemies.
Let me die, rather than bring such trouble upon you.
Red Deer could not reply, for he believed that Cloudy
Sky could do all that he threatened. Nerved, then, by her
devotion to her lover, her hatred of Cloudy Sky, and her
faith in her dream, Harpstenah determined her heart should
not fail her; she would obey the mandate of the water
god; she would bury her knife in the heart of the
medicine
man.
CHAPTER III.
In
their hours for eating, the Sioux accommodate
themselves
to circumstances. If food be plenty, they eat three
or four times a day; if scarce, they eat but once.
Sometimes
they go without food for several days, and often they
are obliged to live for weeks on the bark of trees, skins, or
anything that will save them from dying of famine.
When game and corn are plenty, the kettle is always
boiling, and they are invariably hospitable and generous,
always offering to a visitor such as they have it in their
power to give.
The stars were still keeping watch, when Harpstenah
was called by her mother to assist her. The father's
morning
meal was prepared early, for he was going out to hunt.
Wild duck, pigeons, and snipe, could be had in abundance;
the timid grouse, too, could be roused up on the prairies.
Larger game was there, too, for the deer flew swiftly past,
and had even stopped to drink on the opposite shore of the
Spirit Lake.
When they assembled to eat, the old man lifted up his
handsMay the Great Spirit have mercy upon us, and
give me good luck in hunting.
Meat and boiled corn were eaten from wooden bowls,
and the father went his way, leaving his wife and daughter
to attend to their domestic cares.
Harpstenah was cutting wood near the lodge, when
Cloudy Sky presented himself. He went into the teepee
and lighted his pipe, and then, seating himself outside,
began to smoke. He was, in truth, a sorry figure for a
bridegroom. Always repulsive in his looks, his present
dress was not calculated to improve him. He wore
mourning
for his enemy, whom he had killed.
His face was painted perfectly black; nothing but the
whites of his eyes relieved the universal darkness. His
blanket was torn and oldhis hair unbraided, and on the
top of his head he wore a knot of swan's down.
Every mark of grief or respect he could have shown a
dead brother, he now assumed in honor of the man whom
he had hatedwhose life he had destroyedwho had
belonged
to the hateful tribe which had ever been the enemy
of his nation.
He looked very important as he puffed away, now
watching
Harpstenah, who appeared to be unconscious of his
presence, now fixing his eyes on her mother, who was busily
employed mending mocassins.
Having finished smoking; he used a fan which was
attached to the other end of his pipe-stem. It was a very
warm day, and the perspiration that was bursting from his
forehead mingled with the black paint and slowly found
its way down his face.
Where is your husband? at length he asked of the
mother.
He saw a deer fly past this morning, she replied, and
he has gone to seek it, that I may dry it.
Does he come back to-night?
He does; he said you were to give a medicine feast
to-morrow, and that he would be here.
Harpstenah knew well why the medicine feast was to be
given. Cloudy Sky could not, according to the laws of the
Sioux, throw off his mourning, until he had killed an enemy
or given a medicine dance. She knew that he wanted to
wear a new blanket, and plait his hair, and paint his face a
more becoming color. But she knew his looks could not be
improved, and she went on cutting wood, as unconcernedly
as if the old war chief were her grandfather, instead of her
affianced husband. He might gain the good will of her
parents, he might even propitiate the spirits of the dead:
She would take his life, surely as the senseless wood yielded
to the strength of the arm that was cleaving it.
You will be at the feast too, said Cloudy Sky to the
mother; you have always foretold truly. There is not a
woman in the band who can tell what is going to happen
as well as you. There is no nation so great as the
Dahcotah
,
continued the medicine man, as he saw several
idlers approach, and stretch themselves on the grass to listen
to him. There is no nation so great as the Dahcotah
but our people are not so great now as they were formerly.
When our forefathers killed buffaloes on these prairies, that
the white people now ride across as if they were their own,
mighty giants lived among them; they strode over the
widest rivers, and the tallest trees; they could lay their
hands upon the highest hills, as they walked the earth.
But they were not men of war. They did not fight great
battles, as do the Thunder Bird and his warriors.
There were large animals, too, in those days; so large
that the stoutest of our warriors were but as children beside
them. Their bones have been preserved through many
generations. They are sacred to us, and we keep them
because they will cure us when we are sick, and will save
us from danger.
I have lived three times on earth. When my body was
first laid upon the scaffold, my spirit wandered through the
air. I followed the Thunder Birds as they darted among
the clouds. When the heavens were black, and the rain
fell in big drops, and the streaked lightning frightened our
women and children, I was a warrior, fighting beside the
sons of the Thunder Bird.
Unktahe rose up before us; sixty of his friends were
with him: the waters heaved and pitched, as the spirits
left them to seek vengeance against the Thunder Birds.
They showed us their terrible horns, but they tried to
frighten us in vain. We were but forty; we flew towards
them, holding our shields before our breasts; the wind tore
up the trees, and threw down the teepees, as we passed
along.
All day we fought; when we were tired we rested
awhile, and then the winds were still, and the sun showed
himself from behind the dark clouds. But soon our anger
rose. The winds flew along swifter than the eagle, as the
Thunder Birds clapped their wings, and again we fought
against our foes.
The son of Unktahe came towards me; his eyes shone
like fire, but I was not afraid. I remembered I had been
a Sioux warrior. He held his shield before him, as he
tried to strike me with his spear. I turned his shield aside,
and struck him to the heart.
He fell, and the waters whirled round as they received
his body. The sons of Unktahe shouted fearful cries of
rage, but our yells of triumph drowned them.
The water spirits shrank to their home, while we
returned to the clouds. The large rain drops fell slowly,
and the bow of bright colors rested between the heavens
and the earth. The strife was over, and we were
conquerors
.
I know that Unktahe hates methat he would kill
me if he couldbut the Thunder bird has greater power
than he; the friend of the `Man of the West'
[17]
[17]
Thunder is sometimes called the Man of the West.
is safe
from harm.
Harpstenah had ceased her work, and was listening to
the boaster. It was all true, she said to herself; the
fairy of the water told me that he had offended her race.
I will do their bidding. Cloudy Sky may boast of his
power, but ere two nights have passed away, he will find
he cannot despise the anger of the water spirits, nor the
courage of a Dahcotah woman.
CHAPTER IV.
The approach of night brought with it but little
inclination
to sleep to the excited girl. Her father slept, tired
with the day's hunt; and her mother dreamed of seeing
her daughter the wife of a war chief and a medicine man.
The village was built on the shores of the lake now
known as Lake Calhoun. By the light of the moon the
teepees were reflected in its waters. It was bright as day;
so clear was the lake, that the agates near the shore
sparkled
in its waters. The cry of the whippoorwill alone
disturbed
the repose of nature, except when the wild scream
of the loon was heard as she gracefully swept the waters.
Seated on the shore, Harpstenah waited to hear the low
whistle of her lover. The villagers were almost all asleep,
now and then the laugh of some rioters was heard breaking
in upon the stillness of night. She had not seen her lover
for many days; from the time that her marriage was
determined
upon, the young warrior had kept aloof from her.
She had seized her opportunity to tell him that he must
meet her where they had often met, where none should
know of their meeting. She told him to come when the
moon rose, as her father would be tired, and her mother
wished to sleep well before the medicine feast.
Many fears oppressed her heart, for he had not answered
her when she spoke to him, and he might not intend to
come. Long she waited in vain, and she now arose to
return
to the teepee, when the low signal met her ear.
She did not wait to hear it a second time, but made her
way along the shore: now her steps were printed in the
wet sand, now planted on the rocks near the shore; not a
sound followed her movements until she stood on the
appointed
place. The bright moonlight fell upon her features,
and her rich dress, as she waited with folded arms for her
lover to address her. Her okendokenda of bright colors
was slightly open at the neck, and revealed brooches of
brass and silver that covered her bosom; a heavy necklace
of crimson beads hung around her throat; bracelets of
brass clasped her wrists, and her long plaited hair was
ornamented
at the end of the braids with trinkets of silver.
Her cloth petticoat was richly decorated with ribbons,
and her leggins and mocassins proved that she had spent
much time and labor on the adorning of a person naturally
well formed, and graceful.
Why have you wished to meet me, Harpstenah? said
the young man, gloomily. Have you come to tell me of
the presents Cloudy Sky has made you, or do you wish to
say that you are ashamed to break the promise you made
me to be my wife?
I have come to say again that I will be your wife,
she replied: and for the presents Cloudy Sky left for me,
I have trampled them under my feet. See, I wear near
my heart the brooches you have given me.
Women are ever dogs and liars, said Red Deer, but
why do you speak such words to me, when you know you
have agreed to marry Cloudy Sky? Your cousin told me
your father had chosen him to carry you into the teepee of
the old man. Your father beat you, and you agreed to
marry him. You are a coward to mind a little pain. Go,
marry the old medicine man; he will beat you as he has
his other wives; he may strike you with his tomahawk
and kill you, as he did his first wife; or he will sell you to
the traders, as he did the other; he will tell you to steal
pork and whiskey for him, and then when it is found out,
he will take you and say you are a thief, and that he has
beaten you for it. Go, the young should ever mate with
the young, but you will soon lie on the scaffold, and by his
hand too.
The proud eagle seeks to frighten the timid bird that
follows it, said the maiden; but Red Deer should not
speak such angry words to the woman that will venture
her life for him. Cloudy Sky boasts that he is the friend
of the thunder bird; in my dreams, I have seen the fairy
of the waters, and he told me that Cloudy Sky should die
by my hand. My words are true. Cloudy Sky was once
with the sons of the thunder birds when they fought against
Unktahe. He killed a son of the water god, and the spirits
of the water have determined on his death.
Red Deer, my heart is strong. I do not fear the
medicine
man, for the power of Unktahe is greater than his.
But you must go far away and visit the Tetons; if you
are here, they will accuse you of his death, and will kill
you. But as I have promised to marry him, no one will
think that I have murdered him. It will be long ere I see
you again, but in the moon that we gather wild rice,
[18]
[18]
September.
return
,
and I will be your wife. Go, now, she added, say
to your mother that you are going to visit your friends,
and before the day comes be far away. To-morrow Cloudy
Sky gives a medicine feast, and to-morrow night Haokah
will make my heart strong, and I will kill the medicine
man. His soul will travel a long journey to the land of
spirits. There let him drink, and boast, and frighten
women
.
Red Deer heard her, mute with astonishment. The
color mantled in her cheek, and her determined
countenance
assured him that she was in earnest. He charged
her to remember the secret spells of the medicine man. If
she loved him it was far better to go with him now;
they would soon be out of the reach of her family.
To this she would not listen, and repeating to him her
intention of executing all she had told him of, she left
him.
He watched her as she returned to her teepee;
sometimes
her form was lost in the thick bushes, he could see
her again as she made her way along the pebbled shore,
and when she had entered her teepee he returned home.
He collected his implements of war and hunting, and,
telling his mother he was going on a long journey, he left
the village.
CHAPTER V.
The
feast given in honor of their medicine was
celebrated
the next day, and Cloudy Sky was thus relieved
of the necessity of wearing mourning for his enemy.
His face was carefully washed of the black paint that
disfigured it; his hair, plentifully greased, was braided and
ornamented. His leggins were new, and his white blanket
was marked according to Indian custom. On it was
painted a black hand, that all might know that he had
killed his enemy. But for all he did not look either young
or handsome, and Harpstenah's young friends were
astonished
that she witnessed the preparations for her marriage
with so much indifference.
But she was unconscious alike of their sympathy and
ridicule; her soul was occupied with the reflection that
upon her energy depended her future fate. Never did her
spirit shrink from its appointed task. Nor was she entirely
governed by selfish motives; she believed herself an
instrument
in the hand of the gods.
Mechanically she performed her ordinary duties. The
wood was cut and the evening meal was cooked;
afterwards
she cut down branches of trees, and swept the
wigwam
.
In the evening, the villagers had assembled on the
shores of the lake to enjoy the cool air after the heat of the
day.
Hours passed away as gossipping and amusement
engaged
them all. At length they entered their teepees to
seek rest, and Harpstenah and her mother were the last at
the door of their teepee, where a group had been seated
on the ground, discussing their own and others' affairs.
No harm can come to you, my daughter, when you are
the wife of so great a medicine man. If any one hate you
and wish to do you an injury, Cloudy Sky will destroy
their power. Has he not lived with the Thunder Birds,
did he not learn from them to cure the sick, and to destroy
his enemies? He is a great warrior too.
I know it, my mother, replied the girl, but we have
sat long in the moonlight, the wind that stirred the waters
of the spirit lake is gone. I must sleep, that I may be
ready to dress myself when you call me. My hair must
be braided in many braids, and the strings are not yet
sewed to my mocassins. You too are tired; let us go in
and sleep.
Sleep came to the motherto the daughter courage
and energy. Not in vain had she prayed to Haokah the
Giant, to give her power to perform a great deed. Assured
that her parents were sleeping heavily, she rose and sought
the lodge of the medicine man.
When she reached the teepee, she stopped involuntarily
before the door, near which hung, on a pole, the medicine
bag of the old man. The medicine known only to the
clan had been preserved for ages. Sacred had it ever been
from the touch of woman. It was placed there to guard
the medicine man from evil, and to bring punishment on
those who sought to do him harm. Harpstenah's strength
failed her. What was she about to do?
Could she provoke with impunity the anger of the spirits
of the dead? Would not the Great Spirit bring terrible
vengeance upon her head. Ready to sink to the earth
with terror, the words of the fairy of the waters reassured
her. Can a Dahcotah woman want courage when she is
to be forced to marry a man she hates?
The tumult within is stilledthe strong beating of
her heart has ceasedher hand is upon the handle of her
knife, as the moonlight falls upon its glittering blade.
Too glorious a night for so dark a deed! See! they are
confronted, the old man and the maiden! The tyrant and
his victim; the slave dealer and the noble soul he had
trafficked for!
Pale, but firm with high resolve, the girl looked for one
moment at the man she had fearedwhose looks had
checked her childish mirth, whose anger she had been
taught to dread, even to the sacrificing of her heart's best
hopes.
Restlessly the old man slept; perchance he saw the
piercing eyes that were fixed upon him, for he muttered of
the road to the land of spirits. Listen to him, as he boasts
of the warrior's work.
Many brave men have made this road. The friend of
the Thunder Birds was worthy. Strike the woman who
would dare assist a warrior. Strike
Deep in his heart she plunged the ready steel, and as
she drew it out, the life blood came quickly. She alone
heard his dying groan.
She left the teepeeher work was done. It was easy to
wash the stains on her knife in the waters of the lake.
When her mother arose, she looked at the pale
countenance
of her daughter. In vain she sought to understand
her muttered words. Harpstenah, as she tried to sleep,
fancied she heard the wild laugh of the water spirits.
Clouds had obscured the moon, and distant thunder rolled
along the sky; and, roused by the clamorous grief of the
many women assembled in the lodge, she heard from
them of the dark tragedy in which she had been the
principal
actor.
The murderer was not to be found. Red Deer was
known to be far away. It only remained to bury Cloudy
Sky, with all the honors due to a medicine man.
Harpstenah joined in the weeping of the mournersthe
fountains of a Sioux woman's tears are easily unlocked.
She threw her blanket upon the dead body.
Many were the rich presents made to the inanimate clay
which yesterday influenced those who still trembled lest
the spirit of the dead war-chief would haunt them. The
richest cloth enrobed his body, and, a short distance from
the village, he was placed upon a scaffold.
Food was placed beside him; it would be long before
his soul would reach the city of spirits; his strength would
fail him, were it not for the refreshment of the tender flesh
of the wild deer he had loved to chase, and the cooling
waters he had drank on earth, for many, many winters.
But after the death of Cloudy Sky, the heart of
Harpstenah
grew light. She joined again in the ball plays on
the prairies. It needed no vermilion on her cheek to show
the brightness of her eye, for the flush of hope and
happiness
was there.
The dark deed was forgotten; and when, in the time
that the leaves began to fall, they prepared the wild rice
for winter's use, Red Deer was at her side.
He was a good hunter, and the parents were old. Red
Deer ever kept them supplied with gameand winter
found her a wife, and a happy one too; for Red Deer
loved her in very truthand the secret of the death of the
medicine man was buried in their hearts.
CHAPTER VI.
Ten
years had passed away since their marriage, and
Red Deer had never brought another wife to his teepee.
Harpstenah was without a rival in his affections, if we
except the three strong boys who were growing up beside
them.
Chask (the oldest son) could hunt for his mother, and it
was well that he could, for his father's strength was gone.
Consumption wasted his limbs, and the once powerful arm
could not now support his drooping head.
The father and mother had followed Cloudy Sky to the
world of spirits; they were both anxious to depart from
earth, for age had made them feeble, and the hardships of
ninety years made them eager to have their strength
renewed
,
in the country where their ancestors were still in
the vigor of early youth. The band at Lake Calhoun
were going on a hunt for porcupines; a long hunt, and
Harpstenah tried to deter her husband from attempting
the journey; but he thought the animating exercise of the
chase would be a restorative to his feeble frame, and they
set out with the rest.
When the hunters had obtained a large number of those
valued animals, the women struck their teepees and
prepared
for their return. Harpstenah's lodge alone remained,
for in it lay the dying manby his side his patient wife.
The play of the children had ceasedthey watched with
silent awe the pale face and bright eye of their father
they heard him charge their mother to place food that his
soul might be refreshed on its long journey. Not a tear
dimmed her eye as she promised all he asked.
There is one thing, my wife, he said, which still
keeps my spirit on earth. My soul cannot travel the road
to the city of spiritsthat long road made by the bravest
of our warriorswhile it remembers the body which it has
so long inhabited shall be buried far from its native village.
Your words were wise when you told me I had not strength
to travel so far, and now my body must lie far from my
homefar from the place of my birthfrom the village
where I have danced the dog feast, and from the shores of
the `spirit lakes' where my father taught me to use my
bow and arrow.
Your body shall lie on the scaffold near your native
village, his wife replied. When I turn from this place, I
will take with me my husband; and my young children
shall walk by my side. My heart is as brave now as it
was when I took the life of the medicine man. The love
that gave me courage then, will give me strength now.
Fear not for me; my limbs will not be weary, and when
the Great Spirit calls me, I will hear his voice, and follow
you to the land of spirits, where there will be no more
sickness nor trouble.
Many stars shone out that night; they assisted in the
solemn and the sacred watch. The mother looked at the
faces of her sleeping sons, and listened to their heavy
breathing
;
they had but started on the journey of life.
She turned to her husband: it was but the wreck of a
deserted house, the tenant had departed
The warrior was already far on his journey; ere this,
he had reached the lodge where the freed spirit adorns itself
ere entering upon its new abode.
Some days after, Harpstenah entered her native village,
bearing a precious burden. Strapped to her back was the
body of her husband. By day, she had borne it all the
weary way; at night, she had stopped to rest and to weep.
Nor did her strength fail her, until she reached her home;
then, insensible to sorrow and fatigue, she sunk to the earth.
The women relieved her from the burden, and afterwards
helped her to bury her dead.
Many waters could not quench her love, nor could the
floods drown it. It was strong as death.
Well might she sit in her lodge and weep! The village
where she passed her childhood and youth was deserted.
Her husband forgotten by all but herself. Her two sons
were murdered by the Chippeways, while defending their
mother and their young brother.
Well might she weep! and tremble too, for death among
the Dahcotahs comes as often by the fire water purchased
from the white people, as from the murderous tomahawk
and scalping-knife of the Chippeways.
Nor were her fears useless; she never again saw her
son, until his body was brought to her, his dark features
stiff in death. The death blow was given, too, by the
11
friend who had shamed him from listening to his mother's
voice.
What wonder that she should not heed the noise of the
tempest! The storms of her life had been fiercer than the
warring of the elements. But while the fountains of
heaven were unsealed, those of her heart were closed
forever
.
Never more should tears relieve her, who had shed
so many. Often had she gone into the prairies to weep,
far from the sight of her companions. Her voice was heard
from a distance. The wind would waft the melancholy
sound back to the village.
It is only Harpstenah, said the women. She has
gone to the prairies to weep for her husband and her
children
.
The storm raged during the night, but ceased with the
coming of day. The widowed wife and childless mother
was found dead under the scaffold where lay the body of
her son.
The Thunder Bird was avenged for the death of his
friend. The strength of Red Deer had wasted under a
lingering disease; his children were dead; their mother
lay beside her youngest son.
The spirit of the waters had not appeared in vain.
When the countenance of Unktahe rests upon a Dahcotah,
it is the sure prognostic of coming evil. The fury of the
storm spirits was spent when the soul of Harpstenah
followed
her lost ones.
Dimly, as the lengthened shadows of evening fall around
them, are seen the outstretched arms of the suffering
Dahcotah
women, as they appeal to us for assistanceand
not to proud man!
He, in the halls of legislation, decides when the lands of
the red man are neededone party makes a bargain which
the other is forced to accept.
But in a woman's heart God has placed sympathies to
which the sorrows of the Dahcotah women appeal. Listen!
for they tell you they would fain know of a balm for the
many griefs they endure; they would be taught to avoid
the many sins they commit; and, oh! how gladly would
many of them have their young children accustomed to
shudder at the sight of a fellow creature's blood. Like us,
they pour out the best affections of early youth on a
beloved
object. Like us, they have clasped their children to
their hearts in devoted love. Like us, too, they have wept
as they laid them in the quiet earth.
But they must fiercely grapple with trials which we have
never conceived. Winter after winter passes, and they
perish from disease, and murder, and famine.
There is a way to relieve themwould you know it?
Assist the missionaries who are giving their lives to them
and God. Send them money, that they may clothe the
feeble infant, and feed its starving mother.
Send them money, that they may supply the wants of
those who are sent to school, and thus encourage others to
attend.
As the day of these forgotten ones is passing away, so
is ours. They were born to suffer, we to relieve. Let
their deathless souls be taught the way of life, that they
and we, after the harsh discords of earth shall have ceased,
may listen together to the harmonies of Heaven.
HAOKAH OZAPE;
THE
DANCE TO THE GIANT.
CHAPTER I.
The
dance to the Giant is now rarely celebrated among
the Dahcotahs. So severe is the sacrifice to this deity,
that there are few who have courage to attempt it; and yet
Haokah is universally reverenced and feared among the
Sioux.
They believe in the existence of many Giants, but
Haokah is one of the principal. He is styled the
antinatural
god. In summer he feels cold, in winter he
suffers from the heat; hot water is cold to him, and the
contrary.
The Dahcotah warrior, however brave he may be,
believes that when he dreams of Haokah, calamity is
impending
and can only be avoided by some sort of sacrifice
to this god.
The incident on which this story is founded, occurred
while I resided among the Sioux. I allude to the desertion
of Wenona by her lover. It serves to show the blind and
ignorant devotion of the Dahcotah to his religion.
And as man is ever alike in every country, and under
every circumstance of lifeas he often from selfish motives
tramples upon the heart that trusts himso does woman
utterly condemn a sister, feeling no sympathy for her
sorrow, but only hatred of her fault.
Jealous for the honor of the long-reverenced feasts of the
Dahcotahsthe Deer Killer thought not for a moment
of the sorrow and disgrace he would bring upon Wenona,
while Wauska loved the warrior more than ever,
triumphing
in his preference of her, above her companion. And
Wenona
A cloud came o'er the prospect of her life,
And evening did set in
Early, and dark and deadly.
But she loved too truly to be jealous, and departed
without
the revenge that most Indian women would have
sought, and accomplished too. Her silence on the subject
of her early trial induced her friends to believe that her
mind was affected, a situation caused by long and intense
suffering, and followed by neglect; in such cases the
invalid
is said to
have no heart
.
The girl from whom I have attempted to draw the
character of Wauska, I knew well.
Good looking, with teeth like pearls, her laugh was
perfect
music. Often have I been roused from my sewing
or reading, by hearing the ringing notes, as they were
answered by the children. She generally announced
herself
by a laugh, and was welcomed by one in return.
She was pettish withal, and easily offended, and if
refused
calico for an okendokenda, or beads, or ribbon to
ornament some part of her dress, she would sullenly rest
her chin on her hand, until pacified with a present, or the
promise of one.
It is in Indian life as in oursyouth believes and trusts,
and advancing years bring the consciousness of the trials
of life; the necessity of enduring, and in some cases the
power to overcome them. Who but she who suffers it,
can conceive the Sioux woman's greatest trialto feel that
the love that is her right, is gone! to see another take
the place by the household fire, that was hers; to be last
where she was first.
It may require some apology that Wauska should have
vowed destruction upon herself if the Deer Killer took
another wife, and yet should have lived on and become
that most unromantic of all charactersa virago. She
was reconciled in time to what was inevitable, and as
there are many wives among the Sioux, there must be the
proportion of scolding ones. So I plead guilty to the
charge of wanting sentiment, choosing rather to be true to
nature. And there is this consideration: if there be among
the Dahcotahs some Catharines, there are many Petruchios.
A group of Indian girls were seated on the grass,
Wauska in the centre, her merry musical laugh echoed back
by all but Wenona. The leaves of the large forest tree
under which they were sheltered seemed to vibrate to the
joyous sounds, stirred as they were by a light breeze that
blew from the St. Peter's. Hark! they laugh again, and
old John wakes up from his noon-day nap and turns a
curious, reproving look to the noisy party, and Shah-co-pee,
the orator of the Sioux, moves towards them, anxious to
find out the cause of their mirth.
Old John, after a hearty stretch, joins them too, and
now the fumes of the pipe ascend, and mix with the odor
of the sweet-scented prairie grass that the young girls are
braiding.
But neither Shah-co-pee the chief, nor old John the
medicine man, could find out the secret; they coaxed and
threatened in turnsbut all in vain, for their curiosity was
not gratified. They might have noticed, however, that
Wenona's face was pale, and her eyes red with weeping.
She was idle too, while the others plaited busily, and there
was a subdued look of sadness about her countenance,
contrasting strangely with the merry faces of the others.
Why did you not tell Shah-co-pee what we were
laughing
at, Wenona? said Wanska. Your secret is known
now. The Deer-killer told all at the Virgin's feast. Why
did you not make him promise not to come? If I had
been you, I would have lain sick the day of the feast, I
would have struck my foot, so that I could not walk, or,
I would have died before I entered the ring.
The Deer-killer promised to marry me, replied
Wenona
.
He said that when he returned from his hunt I
should be his wife. But I know well why he has disgraced
me; you have tried to make him love you, and now he is
waiting to take you to his lodge. He is not a great
warrior
,
or he would have kept his word.
Wenona! said Wanska, interrupting her, you have
not minded the advice of your grandmother. She told you
never to trust the promises of the bravest warriors. You
should not have believed his words, until he took you to his
wigwam. But do not be afraid that I will marry the
Deer-killer
.
There was never but one woman among the
Dahcotahs
who did not marry, and I am going to be the
second.
You had better hush, Wanska, said the Bright Star.
You know she had her nose cut off because she refused
to be a wife, and somebody may cut yours off too. It is
better to be the mother of warriors than to have every one
laughing at you.
Enah! then I will be married, rather than have my
nose cut off, but I will not be the Deer-killer's wife. So
Wenona may stop crying.
He says he will never marry me, said Wenona; and
it will do me no good for you to refuse to be his wife. But
you are a liar, like him; for you know you love him. I
am going far away, and the man who has broken his faith
to the maiden who trusted him, will never be a good
husband
.
If I were Wenona, and you married the Deer-killer,
said the Bright Star to Wanska, you should not live
long after it. She is a coward or she would not let you
laugh at her as you did. I believe
she has no heart
since
the Virgin's feast; sometimes she laughs so loud that we
can hear her from our teepee, and then she bends her head
and weeps. When her mother places food before her she
says, `Will he bring the meat of the young deer for me to
dress for him, and will my lodge be ever full of food, that
I may offer it to the hungry and weary stranger who stops
to rest himself?' If I were in her place, Wanska, added
the Bright Star, I would try and be a medicine woman,
and I would throw a spell upon the Deer-killer, and upon
you too, if you married him.
The Deer-killer is coming, said another of the girls.
He has been watching us; and now that he sees Wenona
has gone away, he is coming to talk to Wanska. He
wears many eagle feathers: Wenona may well weep that
she cannot be his wife, for there is not a warrior in the
village
who steps so proudly as he.
But he advanced and passed them indifferently. By
and by they separated, when he followed Wanska to her
father's teepee.
Her mother and father had gone to dispose of game in
exchange for bread and flour, and the Deer-killer seated
himself uninvited on the floor of the lodge.
The teepee of the warrior is lonely when he returns
from hunting, said he to the maiden. Wanska must
come to the lodge of the Deer-killer. She shall ever have
the tender flesh of the deer and buffalo to refresh her, and
no other wife shall be there to make her unhappy.
Wanska is very happy now, she replied. Her father
is a good hunter. He has gone to-day to carry ducks and
pigeons to the Fort. The promises of the Deer-killer are
like the branch that breaks in my hand. Wenona's face
is pale, and her eyes are red like blood from weeping. The
Deer-killer promised to make her his wife, and now that
he has broken his word to her, he tells Wanska that he
will never take another wife, but she cannot trust him.
Wanska was well named the Merry Heart, the
warrior
replied; she laughs at Wenona and calls her a fool,
and then she wishes me to marry her. Who would listen
to a woman's words? And yet the voice of the Merry
Heart is sweeter than a bird'sher laugh makes my spirit
glad. When she sits in my lodge and sings to the children
who will call me father, I shall be happy. Many women
11*
have loved the Deer-killer, but never has he cared to sit
beside one, till he heard the voice of Wanska as she sang
in the scalp-dance, and saw her bear the scalp of her enemy
upon her shoulders.
Wanska's face was pale while she listened to him. She
approached him, and laid her small hand upon his arm
I have heard your words, and my heart says they are
good. I have loved you ever since we were children.
When I was told that you were always by the side of
Wenona, the laugh of my companions was hateful to me
the light of the sun was darkness to my eyes. When
Wenona returned to her village with her parents, I said in
the presence of the Great Spirit that she should not live
after you had made her your wife. But her looks told me
that there was sadness in her heart, and then I knew you
could not love her.
You promise me you will never bring another wife to
your wigwam. Deer-killer! the wife of the white man is
happy, for her husband loves her alone. The children of
the second wife do not mock the woman who is no longer
beloved, nor strike her children before her eyes. When I
am your wife I shall be happy while you love me; there
will be no night in my teepee while I know your heart is
faithful and true; but should you break your word to me,
and bring to your lodge another wife, you shall see me no
more, and the voice whose sound is music to your ears
you will never hear again.
Promises come as readily to the lips of an Indian lover
as trustfulness does to the heart of the woman who listens
to them; and the Deer-killer was believed.
Wanska had been often at the Fort, and she had seen
the difference between the life of a white and that of an
Indian woman. She had thought that the Great Spirit
was unmindful of the cares of his children.
And who would have thought that care was known to
Wanska, with her merry laugh, and her never-ceasing
jokes, whether played upon her young companions, or on
the old medicine man who kept everybody but her in awe
of him.
She seemed to be everywhere too, at the same time.
Her canoe dances lightly over the St. Peter's, and her
companions try in vain to keep up with her. Soon her
clear voice is heard as she sings, keeping time with the
strokes of the axe she uses so skilfully. A peal of laughter
rouses the old woman, her mother, who goes to bring the
truant home, but she is gone, and when she returns, in
time to see the red sun fade away in the bright horizon,
she tells her mother that she went out with two or three
other girls, to assist the hunters in bringing in the deer
they had killed. And her mother for once does not scold,
for she remembers how she used to love to wander on the
prairies, when her heart was as light and happy as her
child's.
When Wanska was told that the Deer-killer loved
Wenona
,
no one heard her sighs, and for tears, she was too proud
to shed any. Wenona's fault had met with ridicule and
contempt; there was neither sympathy nor excuse found for
her. And now that the Deer-killer had slighted Wenona,
and had promised to love her alone, there was nothing
wanting to her happiness.
Bright tears of joy fell from her eyes when her lover
said there was a spell over him when he loved Wenona,
but now his spirit was free; that he would ever love her
truly, and that when her parents returned he would bring
rich presents and lay them at the door of the lodge.
Wanska was indeed the Merry Heart, for she loved
the Deer-killer more than life itself, and life was to her
a long perspective of brightness. She would lightly
tread the journey of existence by his side, and when
wearied with the joys of this world, they would together
travel the road that leads to the Heaven of the
Dahcotahs
.
She sat dreaming of the future after the Deer-killer
had left her, nor knew of her parents' return until she
heard her mother's sharp voice as she asked her if the
corn would boil when the fire was out, and where was the
bread that she was told to have ready on their return?
Bread and corn! when Wanska had forgot all but that
she was beloved. She arose quickly, and her light laugh
drowned her mother's scolding. Soon her good humor
was infectious, for her mother told her that she had needles
and thread in plenty, besides more flour and sugar, and
that her father was going out early in the morning to kill
more game for the Long Knives who loved it so well.
CHAPTER II.
A few
months ago, the Deer-killer had told Wenona
that Wanska was noisy and tiresome, and that her soft
dark eyes were far more beautiful than Wanska's
laughing
ones. They were not at home then, for Wenona had
accompanied her parents on a visit to some relations who
lived far above the village of Shah-co-pee.
While there the Deer-killer came in with some
warriors
who had been on a war party; there Wenona was
assured that her rival, the Merry Heart, was forgotten.
And well might the Deer-killer and Wenona have loved
each other. Youth turns to youth as the flower to the
sun, and he was brave and noble in his pride and power;
and she, gentle and loving, though an Indian woman; so
quiet too, and all unlike Wanska, who was the noisiest
little gossip in the village.
Often had they wandered together through the solemn
temples of the earth, nor did she ever fear, with the
warrior
child for a protector. She had followed him when he
ascended the cliffs where the tracks of the eagle were seen;
and with him she felt safe when the wind was tossing
their canoe on the Mississippi, when the storm spirits had
arisen in their power. They were still children when
Wenona would know his step among many others, but
they were no longer children when Wenona left
Shah-co-pee's
village, for she loved with a woman's devotion
and more than loved. She had trembled when she saw
the Deer-killer watch Wanska as she tripped merrily
about the village. Sleeping or waking, his image was ever
before her; he was the idol to which her spirit bowed, the
sun of her little world.
The dance to the giant was to be celebrated at the
village where they were visiting; the father of Wenona
and Old John the medicine man, were to join in it.
The maiden had been nothing loth to undertake the
journey
,
for the Deer-killer had gone on a war party against
the Chippeways, and she thought that in the course of
their journey they might meet himand when away from
Wanska, he would return to her side. He could not
despise the love she had given him. Hope, that bright
star of youth, hovered over her, and its light was reflected
on her heart.
When they arrived at the village of the chief Markeda,
or Burning Earth, the haughty brow of the chief was
subdued with care. He had dreamed of Haokah the
giant, and he knew there was sorrow or danger
threatening
him. He had sinned against the giant, and what
might be the consequence of offending him? Was his
powerful arm to be laid low, and the strong pulse to cease
its beatings? Did his dream portend the loss of his young
wife? She was almost as dear to him as the fleet hunter
that bore him to the chase.
It might be that the angry god would send their enemies
among them, and his tall sons would gladden his sight no
more. Sickness and hunger, phantom-like, haunted his
waking and sleeping hours.
There was one hope; he might yet ward off the danger,
for the uplifted arm of the god had not fallen. He hoped
to appease the anger of the giant by dancing in his honor.
We have travelled far, said old John the medicine
man, to Markeda, and are tired. When we have slept
we will dance with you, for we are of the giant's party.
Great is Haokah, the giant of the Dahcotahs, the
chief replied; it is a long time since we have danced to
him.
I had been hunting with my warriors, we chased the
buffalo, and our arrows pierced their sides; they turned
upon us, bellowing, their heads beating the ground; their
terrible eyes glared upon us even in death; they rolled in
the dust, for their strength was gone. We brought them
to the village for our women to prepare for us when we
should need them. I had eaten and was refreshed; and,
tired as my limbs were, I could not sleep at first, but at
last the fire grew dim before my eyes, and I slept.
I stood on the prairie alone, in my dream, and the
giant appeared before me. So tall was he that the clouds
seemed to float about his head. I trembled at the sound
of his voice, it was as if the angry winds were loosed upon
the earth.
`The warriors of the Dahcotahs are turned women,'
said he; `that they no longer dance in honor of the giant,
nor sing his songs. Markeda is not a coward, but let him
tremble; he is not a child, but he may shed tears if the
anger of the giant comes upon him.'
Glad was I when I woke from my dreamand now,
lest I am punished for my sins, I will make a sacrifice to
the giant. Should I not fear him who is so powerful?
Can he not take the thunder in his hand and cast it to the
earth?
The heart of the warrior should be brave when he
dances to the giant. My wigwam is ready, and the friends
of the giant are ready also.
Give me your mocassins, said the young wife of
Markeda to old John; they are torn, and I will mend
them. You have come from afar, and are welcome.
Sleep, and when you awake, you will find them beside
you. As she assisted him to take them off, the medicine
man looked admiringly into her face. The young wife
of Markeda is as beautiful as the white flowers that spring
up on the prairies. Her husband would mourn for her if
the giant should close her eyes. They are bright now, as
the stars, but death would dim them, should not the anger
of the giant be appeased.
The Bounding Fawn turned pale at the mention of
the angry giant; she sat down, without replying, to her
work; wondering the while, if the soul of her early love
thought of her, now that it wandered in the Spirit's land.
It might be that he would love her again when they should
meet there. The sound of her child's voice, awakening
out of sleep, aroused her, and called to her mind who was
its father.
They tore me away from my lover, and made me come
to the teepee of the chief, was her bitter reflection.
Enah! that I cannot love the father of my child.
She rose and left the teepee. Where is the heaven of
the Dahcotahs, she murmured, as she looked up to the
silent stars. It may be that I shall see him again. He
will love my child too, and I will forget the many tears I
have shed.
CHAPTER III.
The
dance to the Giant is always performed inside the
wigwam. Early in the morning the dancers were
assembled
in the chief's lodge. Their dress was such as is
appointed for the occasion. Their hats were made of the
bark of trees, such as tradition says the Giant wears.
They were large, and made forked like the lightning.
Their leggins were made of skins. Their ear-rings were
of the bark of trees, and were about one foot long.
The chief rose ere the dawn of day, and stood before the
fire. As the flames flickered, and the shadows of the
dancers played fantastically about the wigwam, they looked
more like Lucifer and a party of attendant spirits, than
like human beings worshipping their God.
Markeda stood by the fire without noticing his guests,
who awaited his motions in silence. At last, moving
slowly, he placed a kettle of water on the fire, and then
threw into it a large piece of buffalo meat.
Lighting his pipe, he seated himself, and then the
dancers advanced to the fire and lit theirs; and soon they
were enveloped in a cloud of smoke.
When the water began to boil, the Indians arose, and,
dancing round the fire, imitated the voice of the Giant.
Hah-hah! hah hah! they sung, and each endeavored
to drown the voice of the other. Now they crouch as
they dance, looking diminutive and contemptible, as those
who are degrading themselves in their most sacred duties.
Then they rise up, and show their full height. Stalwart
warriors as they are, their keen eyes flash as they glance
from the fire to each others' faces, distorted with the effort
of uttering such discordant sounds. Now their broad
chests heave with the exertion, and their breath comes
quickly.
They seat themselves, to rest and smoke. Again the
hellish sounds are heard, and the wife of the chief trembles
for fear of the Giant, and her child clings closer to her
breast. The water boils, and, hissing, falls over into the
fire, the flames are darkened for a moment, and then burst
up brighter than before.
Markeda addresses the dancersWarriors! the Giant
is powerfulthe water which boils before us will be cold
when touched by a friend of the Giant. Haokah will not
that his friends should suffer when offering him a
sacrifice
.
The warriors then advanced together, and each one puts
his hand into the kettle and takes the meat from the
boiling
water; and although suffering from the scalds produced,
yet their calmness in enduring the pain, would induce the
belief that the water really felt to them cool and pleasant.
The meat is then taken out, and put into a wooden dish,
and the water left boiling on the fire. The dancers eat
the meat while hot, and again they arrange themselves to
dance. And now, the mighty power of the Giant is
shown, for Markeda advances to the kettle, and taking
some water out of it he throws it upon his bare back,
singing all the while, The water is cold.
Old John advances and does the same, followed by
the next in turn, until the water is exhausted from the
kettle, and then the warriors exclaim, How great is the
power of Haokah! we have thrown boiling water upon
ourselves and we have not been scalded.
The dance is overthe sacrifice is made. Markeda
seeks his young wife and fears not. He had fancied that
her cheeks were pale of late, but now they are flushed
brilliantly
,
his heart is at rest.
The warriors disperse, all but the medicine man, and
the chief's store of buffalo meat diminishes rapidly under
the magic touch of the epicure.
Yes! an epicure thou wert old John! for I mind me
well when thou camest at dinner time, and how thou
saidst thou couldst eat the food of the Indian when thou
wert hungry, but the food of the white man was better
far. And thou! a Dahcotah warrior, a famous hunter,
and a medicine man. Shame! that thou shouldst have
loved venison dressed with wine more than when the
tender meat was cooked according to the taste of the
women of thy nation. I have forgotten thy Indian name,
renegade as thou wert! but thou answerest as well to
old John!
Thou art now forgotten clay, though strong and
vigorous
when in wisdom the Sioux were punished for a
fault they did not commit. Their money was not paid
themtheir provisions were withheld. Many were laid
low, and thou hast found before now that God is the Great
Spirit, and the Giant Haokah is not.
And it may be that thou wouldst fain have those thou
hast left on earth know of His power, who is above all
spirits, and of His goodness who would have all come unto
Him.
CHAPTER IV.
Wenona
had not hoped in vain, for her lover was with
her, and Wanska seemed to be forgotten. The warrior's
flute would draw her out from her uncle's lodge while the
moon rose o'er the cold waters. Wrapped in her blanket,
she would hasten to meet him, and listen to his assurances
of affection, wondering the while that she had ever feared
he loved another.
She had been some months at the village of Markeda,
and she went to meet her lover with a heavy heart. Her
mother had noticed that her looks were sad and heavy,
and Wenona knew that it would not be long ere she should
be a happy wife, or a mark for the bitter scorn of her
companions
.
The Deer-killer had promised, day after day, that he
would make her his wife, but he ever found a ready
excuse
;
and now he was going on a long hunt, and she and
her parents were to return to their village. His quiver
was full of arrows, and his leggins were tightly girded upon
him. Wenona's full heart was nigh bursting as she heard
that the party were to leave to-morrow. Should he desert
her, her parents would kill her for disgracing them; and
her rival, Wanska, how would she triumph over her fall?
You say that you love me, said she to the Deer-killer,
and yet you treat me cruelly. Why should you leave
me without saying that I am your wife? Who would
watch for your coming as I would? and you will disgrace
me when I have loved you so truly. Staytell them you
have made me your wife, and then will I wait for you at
the door of my teepee.
The warrior could not stay from the chase, but he
promised her that he would soon return to their village,
and then she should be his wife.
Wenona wept when he left her; shadows had fallen
upon her heart, and yet she hoped on. Turning her weary
steps homeward, she arrived there when the maidens of
the village were preparing to celebrate the Virgin's Feast.
There was no time to deliberateshould she absent
herself
,
she would be suspected, and yet a little while ere the
Deer-killer would return, and her anxious heart would be
at rest.
The feast was prepared, and the crier called for all
virgins
to enter the sacred ring.
Wenona went forward with a beating heart; she was not
a wife, and soon must be a mother. Wanska, the Merry
Heart, was there, and many others who wondered at the
pale looks of Wenonashe who had been on a journey,
and who ought to have returned with color bright as the
dying sun, whose light illumined earth, sky and water.
As they entered the ring a party of warriors approached
the circle. Wenona does not look towards them, and yet
the throbbings of her heart were not to be endured. Her
trembling limbs refused to sustain her, as the Deer-killer,
stalking towards the ring, calls aloudTake her from
the sacred feast; should she eat with the maidens?she,
under whose bosom lies a warrior's child? She is
unworthy
.
And as the unhappy girl, with features of stone and
glaring eyes, gazed upon him bewildered, he rudely led her
from the ring.
Wenona bowed her head and wenteven as night came
on when the sun went down. Nor did the heart of the
Deer-killer reproach him, for how dare she offend the Great
Spirit! Were not the customs of his race holy and
sacred?
Little to Wenona were her father's reproaches, or her
mother's curse; that she was no more beloved was all she
remembered.
Again was the Deer-killer by the side of Wanska, and
she paid the penalty. Her husband brought other wives
to his wigwam, though Wanska was ever the favorite one.
With her own hand would she put the others out of the
wigwam, laughing when they threatened to tell their lord
when he returned, for Wanska managed to tell her own
story first, and, termagant as she was, she always had her
own way.
Wenona has ceased to weep, and far away in the
country
of the Sissetons she toils and watches as all Indian
women toil and watch. Her young son follows her as she
seeks the suffering Dahcotah, and charms the disease to
leave his feeble frame.
She tells to the child and the aged woman her dreams;
she warns the warrior what he shall meet with when he
goes to battle; and ever, as the young girls assemble to pass
away the idle hours, she stops and whispers to them.
In vain do they ask of her husband: she only points
to her son and says, My hair, which is now like snow,
was once black and braided like his, and my eyes as bright.
They have wept until tears come no more. Listen not to
the warrior who says he loves. And she passes from
their sight as the morning mists.
U-MI-NE-WAH-CHIPPE;
OR,
TO DANCE AROUND.
I have
noticed the many singular notions of the Sioux
concerning thunder, and especially the fact that they believe
it to be a large bird. They represent it thus.
This figure is often seen worked with
porcupine
quills on their ornaments. Ke-on means
to fly. Thunder is called Wah-ke-on or All-flier.
U-mi-ne-wah-chippe
is a dance given by some one who fears
thunder and thus endeavors to propitiate the god and save
his own life.
A ring is made, of about sixty feet in circumference, by
sticking saplings in the ground, and bending their tops
down, fastening them together. In the centre of this ring
a pole is placed. The pole is about fifteen feet in height
and painted red. From this swings a piece of birch bark,
cut so as to represent thunder. At the foot of the pole
stand two boys and two girls.
The two boys represent war: they are painted red, and
hold war-clubs in their hands. The girls have their faces
painted with blue clay: they represent peace.
On one side of the circle a kind of booth is erected, and
about twenty feet from it a wigwam. There are four
entrances
to this circle.
When all the arrangements for the dance are concluded,
the man who gives the dance emerges from his wigwam
dressed up as hideously as possible, crawling on all fours
towards the booth. He must sing four tunes before
reaching
it.
In the meantime the medicine men, who are seated in
the wigwam, beat time on the drum, and the young men
and squaws keep time to the music by first hopping on one
foot, and then on the othermoving around inside the ring
as fast as they can. This is continued for about five
minutes
,
until the music stops. After resting a few moments,
the second tune commences, and lasts the same length of
time, then the third, and the fourth; the Indian
meanwhile
making his way towards the booth. At the end
of each tune, a whoop is raised by the men dancers.
After the Indian has reached his booth inside the ring,
he must sing four more tunes as before. At the end of
the fourth tune the squaws all run out of the ring as fast
as possible, and must leave by the same way that they
entered
,
the other three entrances being reserved for the men,
who, carrying their war implements, might be accidentally
touched by one of the squawsand the war implements
of the Sioux warrior have from time immemorial been held
sacred from the touch of woman. For the same reason the
men form the inner ring in dancing round the pole, their
war implements being placed at the foot of the pole.
When the last tune is ended, the young men shoot at the
image of thunder which is hanging to the pole, and when
it falls a general rush is made by the warriors to get hold
of it. There is placed at the foot of the pole a bowl of
water colored with blue clay. While the men are trying to
seize the parts of the bark representation of their god, they
at the same time are eagerly endeavoring to drink the
water in the bowl, every drop of which must be drank.
The warriors then seize on the two boys and girlsthe
representations of war and peaceand use them as roughly
as possibletaking their pipes and war-clubs from them,
and rolling them in the dirt until the paint is entirely
rubbed off from their faces. Much as they dislike this part
of the dance, they submit to it through fear, believing
that after this performance the power of thunder is
destroyed
.
Now that the water is drank up and the guardians of the
Thunder bird are deprived of their war-clubs and pipes, a
terrible wailing commences. No description could convey an
idea of the noise made by their crying and lamentation.
All join in, exerting to the utmost the strength of their
lungs.
Before the men shoot at thunder, the squaws must leave
the ring. No one sings at this dance but the warrior who
gives it; and while the visitors, the dancers, and the
medicine
men, women and children, all are arrayed in their
gayest
clothing, the host must be dressed in his meanest.
In the dance Ahahkah Koyah, or to make the Elk a
figure of thunder, is also made and fought against. The
Sioux have a great deference for the majesty of thunder,
and, consequently for their own skill in prevailing or
seeming
to prevail against it.
A Sioux is always alarmed after dreaming of an elk,
and soon prevails upon some of his friends to assist him in
dancing, to prevent any evil consequences resulting from
his dream. Those willing to join in must lay aside all
12
clothing, painting their bodies with a reddish gray color,
like the elk's. Each Indian must procure two long
saplings
,
leaving the boughs upon them. These are to aid the
Indians in running. The saplings must be about twelve feet
in length. With them they tear down the bark image of
thunder, which is hung with a string to the top of the
pole.
All being ready, the elks run off at a gallop, assisted by
their saplings, to within about two hundred yards of the
pole, when they stop for a while, and then start again for
the pole, to which is attached the figure of thunder.
They continue running round and round this pole,
constantly
striking the figure of thunder with their saplings,
endeavoring to knock it down, which after a while they
succeed in accomplishing.
The ceremony is now ended, and the dreamer has nothing
to fear from elks until he dreams again.
There is no end to the superstitions and fancies
entertained
by the Sioux concerning thunder. On the cradle of
the Indian child we frequently see the figure of thunder
represented. It is generally carved on the wood by the
father of the child, with representations of the Elk,
accompanied
with hieroglyphie looking figures, but thunder is
regarded
as the type of all animals that fly.
There are many medicine feastsand I saw one
celebrated
near the Oak Grove mission, and near, also, to the
villages
of Good Road, and the chief Man in the Clouds. It
was on a dark cold day about the first of March. We left
the fort at about nine o'clock and followed the road on the
St. Peter's river, which had been used for many months, but
which, though still strong, was beginning to look unsafe.
As we advanced towards the scene of the feast, many
Indians from every direction were collecting, and
hurrying
forward, either to join in the ceremony about to be
celebrated, or to be spectators. We ascended quite a high
hill, and were then at the spot where all the
arrangements
were made to celebrate one of the most sacred forms
of their religion. Many of the Indians to be engaged in the
performance were entirely without protection from the severe
coldtheir bodies being painted and their heads adorned
with their choicest ornaments, but throwing aside even
their blankets, according to the laws of the ceremony. The
Indians continued to assemble. At eleven o'clock, the dance
commenced. Although I could not faithfully describe, yet
I never can forget the scene. The dark lowering skythe
mantle of snow and ice thrown over all the objects that
surrounded us, except the fierce human beings who were
thus, under Heaven's arch for a roof, about to offer to their
deities a solemn worship.
Then the music commenced, and the horrid sounds
increased
the wildness of the scene; and the contortions of the
medicine man, as he went round and round, made his
countenance
horrible beyond expression. The devoted
attention
of the savages, given to every part of the ceremony,
made it in a measure interesting. There were hundreds
of human beings believing in a Great Spirit, and anxious
to offer him acceptable service; but how degraded in that
service! How fallen from its high estate was the soul that
God had made, when it stooped to worship the bones of
animals
,
the senseless rock, the very earth that we stood upon!
The aged man, trembling with feebleness, ready to depart
to the spirit's land, weary with the weight of his
infirmities
the
warrior treading the earth with the pride of
middle
agethe young with nothing to regret and everything
to look forward to,all uniting in a worship which they
ignorantly believe to be religion, but which we know to be
idolatry.
I was glad to leave the scene, and turn towards the house
of the Rev. Mr. Pond, who lives near the spot where the
feast was celebrated. Here, pursuing his duties and studies,
does this excellent man improve every moment of his time
to the advantage of the Sioux. Always ready to converse
kindly with them in order to gain their confidencegiving
medicine to the sick, and food to the hungry; doing all that
lies in his power to administer to their temporal comfort,
he labors to improve their condition as a people. How can
it better be done than by introducing the Christian religion
among them? This the missionaries are gradually doing;
and did they receive proper assistance from government,
and from religious societies, they would indeed go on their
way rejoicing.
Placed under the government of the United States, these
helpless, unhappy beings are dependent upon us for the
means of subsistence, in a measure, and how much more
for the knowledge of the true God? Churches will soon
rise where the odious feast and medicine dance are
celebrated
,
but will the Indians worship there? When the
foundations of these churches are laid, the bones of the
original owners of the country will be thrown outbut
where will be the souls of those who were thrust out of
their country and their rights to make way for us?
I have seen where literally two or three were met
together
where
in a distant country the few who celebrated
the death of the Redeemer were assembledwhere the
beautiful service of our church was read, and the hearts
that heard it responded to its animating truths. We
rejoiced
that the religion which was our comfort was not
confined
to places; here were no altars, nor marble tablets
but here in this humble house we knew God would meet
and be with us.
An Indian silently opened the church door and entered.
As strange to him was the solemn decorum of this scene,
as to us were the useless ceremonies we every day
witnessed
.
He watched the countenance of the clergyman,
but he knew not that he was preaching the doctrine of a
universal religion. He saw the sacred book upon the desk,
but he could not read the glorious doctrine of a world
redeemed
by a Saviour's blood. He heard the voice of prayer,
but how could his soul like ours rise as on eagle's wings,
and ascend to the throne of God! Who was he, this
intruder
?
It may be a descendant of those who guarded the
oracles of God, who for a time preserved them for us.
No wonder he tired and turned away. Not his the fault
that he did not join in the solemn service, but ours. If we
disregard the temporal wants of the Dahcotah, can we
shut our ears against their cry, that rises up day after day,
and year after year,Show us the path to happiness and
God?